These proteins bind tightly to specific molecules, offering the prospect of such applications as the diagnosis and treatment of cancer and the separation and purification of materials.In addition, Mr. Frashier will push for development of a line of protein-based adhesive and coating products. 
William Gates, founder and chairman of Microsoft Corp., became the personal computer industry's first billion-dollar man yesterday.The 31-year-old Harvard University dropout holds 11,018,955 shares, or about a 42% stake in Microsoft, which supplies, among other things, the internal program that controls the basic functions of International Business Machines Inc.'s PC line of personal computers and compatible machines. 
Terms weren't disclosed, but industry sources said the price was about $2.5 million.The sale includes the rights to Germaine Monteil in North and South America and in the Far East, as well as the worldwide rights to the Diane Von Furstenberg cosmetics and fragrance lines and U.S. distribution rights to Lancaster beauty products. 
AMC executives have said they are frustrated about the timing of the bid, contending AMC was just about to turn the corner after a string of troubled years.The company's Jeep sales are strong and AMC is just now introducing lines of larger Renault cars that could finally give it a position in a broader segment of the auto market -- but only if currently skeptical buyers start returning to AMC's showrooms. 
Separately, James E. Edwards, an AT&T senior vice president who preceded Mr. Cassoni as head of the computer division, said he is leaving the company, effective Monday.According to managers in the computer, or Data Systems, division, AT&T will announce new products that include an addition to its 3B minicomputer line, software products to connect its machines to those of International Business Machines Corp., a laser printer, the latest version of the Unix V operating system software and some local area network products. 
Several Data Systems executives have quit recently.John Walsh, a vice president in charge of the 3B minicomputer line, surprised colleagues in January when he left to join a small West Coast videoconferencing concern. 
Faced with the innovative competition and an overall flat market since 1984, Nelson, the biggest U.S. religious publisher, lost market share and now is trying to recover ground.Its "Precious Moments Bible," illustrated with a popular line of cherubic children's characters, has sold more than a million copies in about a year. 
RJR Nabisco Inc. said it expects to retain at least 95% ownership of its tobacco business if it decides to spin off the line in a master limited partnership. 
LTV has had $4.69 billion in losses over the past five years, mostly from its beleaguered steel unit, the nation's second largest.LTV plans to reorganize around its aerospace and defense unit, its only profitable line, which accounted for almost two-thirds of LTV's 1986 operating profit of $171.9 million. 
Not according to James Uffelman, a 43-year-old computer specialist with a theory about corporate succession.Mr. Uffelman established his theory while developing a line of birthday cards that list birth dates of famous people. 
Howell Book House Inc. of New York has been successfully publishing books about dogs for 26 years.Its mainstay is a line of 60 books, each devoted to a different breed. 
"With a broad line of products directed at kids, children and teen-agers, it will get us away from a lot of the volatility in this (toy) business."Worlds of Wonder's Teddy Ruxpin animated-bear line of toys was the industry's largest seller in 1985 and its Lazer Tag game was No. 1 last year, the executives said. 
Mr. Stein estimated that during the company's next fiscal year, its toy business will account for 75% to 80% of sales, school accessories 5% to 10% and consumer electronics 10% to 20%.Among the new products in the school-accessories segment is a line called Class Act. 
In a telegram to 5,500 banks that issue Visa cards, Charles T. Russell, Visa USA president, warned, "This move is an attempt by American Express to further its presence in the retail banking market by acquiring additional relationship(s) with your better customers."He suggested that bankers call James D. Robinson III, chairman of American Express, to "voice your displeasure over his decision to enter one of your most profitable lines of service." 
But the move may also reflect an effort to subcontract work to outside vendors as part of a broader strategy designed in part to trim costs.The No. 1 auto maker in recent months has been shedding some small operations and has joined in joint ventures to make and market such products as its heavy truck line. 
Gynex Inc. said two generic oral contraceptives developed by Gynex Laboratories Inc. are being recalled by the distributor, G.D. Searle & Co., a unit of Monsanto Co., St. Louis.Gynex Inc., which develops gynecologic and reproductive pharmaceutical products, said the recall is being conducted as a preventive measure because a limited number of packages of the Gynex line of contraceptives may be missing tablets or contain some that are out of sequence. 
Chrysler Corp. also is offering financing incentives and rebates that don't have an expiration date.A Ford analyst said another reason for offering the incentives on Taurus and Sable is to keep sales balanced across car lines. 
Bayly Corp. said it acquired a 55% stake in Chutes Corp., which designs and markets the "Code Bleu" line of denim sportswear. 
Bayly, which manufactures jeans and leisure wear, said it purchased the shares from two outside investors for an undisclosed cash payment at closing and an additional undisclosed sum to be paid over a three-year period.Bayly has had a licensing agreement with closely held, Seattle-based Chutes for the "Code Bleu" line since June 1984. 
The fibers segment, which earned $542 million last year, has been experiencing annual productivity gains of 7%.Response has been strong to a new line of stain-resistant carpet material and Kevlar, a steel-like fiber used in such items as clothing, bulletproof vests and helmets. 
International Business Machines Corp. and the personal computer industry are approaching an important crossroads.Next month, the computer giant is widely expected to unveil a new line of PCs that will diverge from the industry standard. 
The new products will present a painful choice for other computer makers, software companies and customers, who will have to decide whether to stick with the existing standard, which was itself developed by IBM, or to follow Big Blue into new territory.The new line will be IBM's shot at reasserting its leadership in the personal computer market. 
IBM is expected to unveil a much different line of PCs next month in a risky bid to reclaim market share. 
This year was to have been the watershed in that effort, in AMC's view.AMC dealers finally will get a wider line of cars to sell, and the company just began production of Chrysler's M-body cars on a contract basis at AMC's Kenosha, Wis., plant. 
Ross, which plans to close 25 of its 146 stores, said it expects to report a net loss of about $34 million for the fourth quarter and a net loss for fiscal 1987 of about $42 million.The losses result in large part from a fourth-quarter pre-tax charge of about $40 million to cover the store closings and the discontinuation of some poorly performing merchandise lines. 
One major hurdle remained, according to Mr. Bidwell, who spent 27 years at Ford and was Hertz Corp. president and chief operating officer before joining Chrysler in 1983.Chrysler and Renault couldn't agree on a value for the stake in AMC, particularly with AMC just about to start selling new lines of Renault cars. 
Sears became the top retailer by catering to young families with a phalanx of new suburban stores and sturdy, no-nonsense merchandise.The range of acceptable tastes in the late 1950s was so narrow, in fact, that Hart Schaffner & Marx prospered in men's tailored clothing despite offering only three styles of suits in its best lines. 
Coca-Cola has gone from a single product to what its maker now calls an "umbrella brand," with permutations that include Coca-Cola Classic and Diet Cherry Coke, each aimed at a different type of consumer.Hartmarx has expanded the three basic suit styles in its Hart Schaffner & Marx line to 15. 
"There's nothing (really good that's) American," says Alex Gonzalez, an assistant manager, after listing the virtues of an expensive German brand.Of the store's best American line, he says sadly, "The steel is good, but there's a problem with the handle. 
Two events, however, would help boost the struggling company.In 1970, AMC bought its Jeep line from Kaiser Industries -- a business that boomed. 
S&P said Chrysler was "receiving a business with questionable prospects."Analysts said the most valuable part of the acquisition is AMC's Jeep line, which served the Army during World War II and which the company acquired in 1970. 
Once the acquisition is completed, the real work would begin.While Chrysler would get at least two acknowledged jewels in the transaction -- the popular and profitable Jeep line of utility vehicles, and a new $675 million state-of-the-art assembly plant in Bramalea, Ontario -- it also would have to contend with some problems. 
Reebok said the acquisition would position it for further growth in the expanding athletic and casual-shoe market.In addition to its lines of athletic footwear -- from aerobic shoes to volleyball shoes -- Avia makes walking shoes, casual footwear and hiking boots. 
But plenty of L.A.'s budding restaurateurs are showing less restraint.Don Taco, home of the pastrami rice bowl, now features a full line of Chinese burritos, while one of the Don's principal rivals, the Oki Dog, offers the Oki Dog, a chili-doused and tortilla-wrapped frankfurter. 
"But smaller goods are strong."New York-based Penney said apparel and soft home furnishings were its fastest-growing lines last month and contributed to a 5.5% rise in February sales for stores open more than one year. 
The company, which had said it would install driver-side air bags on Oldsmobile Delta 88 models as optional equipment in the 1988-model year, said it would install the safety devices on additional models in future years.The No. 1 auto maker said an estimated 500,000 air bags will be installed during 1990 on selected car lines. 
Tonka said the proposed acquisition is part of its strategy to expand its base of toys that don't swing wildly with fads.Tonka said Ertl will double Tonka's revenue from its most stable toy line, Tonka trucks. 
Mr. Instone said the company has an order backlog valued at "about $16.6 million, up from $12.1 million at this time last year."Initial response has been strong for a new line of uninterruptible power supplies designed for sophisticated electronic equipment, he said. 
He added that customer reaction to the company's I.O.U. brand of sportswear, introduced in the fall of 1985 and promoted heavily last year, also was "excellent" in the second half.The line, aimed at young men and women, produces higher profit margins than other name-brand clothes, he said. 
The line, aimed at young men and women, produces higher profit margins than other name-brand clothes, he said.Mr. Sullivan also said the line illustrates a change over the past year in the company's merchandising strategy. 
The company, which boosted the number of stores to 388 from 334 in the fiscal year just ended, said it expects to open another 40 to 50 in the current year.By fall, it also hopes to expand its I.O.U. line to represent between 25% and 30% of the merchandise sold in the two divisions that carry it. 
The younger Mr. Noland, 43 years old, is currently a vice president and manager of merchandising for plumbing and heating products.Those lines last year accounted for 62% of the wholesale distributor's $426.5 million of sales. 
And it seems to be succeeding.In Miss Kamali's case, the disruption of her homework operation prompted her to suspend her wholesale operation and cancel her spring line of clothes. 
Mr. Wolfer said the company's 10 stores that sell children's clothing exclusively have remained profitable, but the 25 stores that sell both women's and children's clothing have "performed poorly."He added that the company has probably been attempting to offer too wide a choice of sizes and styles, and plans to eliminate petite and large sizes from its women's line. 
Terms weren't disclosed.The toy maker said that under the agreement, it gains the Australian and New Zealand marketing rights to several toy lines jointly developed by Tonka and Bandai and already sold in the U.S. 
Digital Equipment Corp. introduced three midrange computers in its VAX line, indicating that the company is moving to limit possible inroads by International Business Machines Corp. 
American Motors dropped plans to build a new line of Jeeps at its Kenosha, Wis., plant, citing an impasse with the UAW union. 
American Motors Corp., citing an impasse with the United Auto Workers union, said it decided against building a new line of Jeep vehicles at the company's Kenosha, Wis., plant and that the vehicles will be made at another site. 
Fruit of the Loom, which was Farley Apparel Inc. until being renamed last month, will offer today 27 million common shares at $9 apiece.The renamed offering doesn't include the Farley lines of Acme and Dingo boots.Originally part of the offering, the lines will remain part of Mr. Farley's huge privately held conglomerate. 
Originally part of the offering, the lines will remain part of Mr. Farley's huge privately held conglomerate.The boot lines contributed less than 5% of pretax profit of the Farley apparel operations. 
Digital Equipment unveiled three midrange computers in its VAX line, indicating the company is moving to limit possible inroads by IBM. 
He was known for a reserved personal style but for incisive strategic thinking.In his tenure, RJR divested non-consumer businesses like shipping and oil and increasingly branched out from tobacco into food and soft-drink lines. 
The United Auto Workers said it will resume bargaining with American Motors Corp. over contract concessions at the auto maker's Kenosha, Wis., plant.The talks broke off last Friday and AMC had said that, because of the impasse, it decided against building a new line of Jeep vehicles at the plant. 
Wang Laboratories Inc. introduced a replacement for its 2200 series of small business computers that will continue the 15-year-old line. 
The Wang CS computer will run the same software as the 70,000 Wang 2200 series computers already installed.Some Wang users had worried that the company might stop making the line as it concentrates on selling office automation products to large and medium-sized organizations. 
Under the agreement, LyphoMed said it will sell Novopharm's oral-pharmaceutical drugs in the U.S. and closely held Novopharm will sell LyphoMed's injectable-pharmaceutical drugs in Canada.LyphoMed said the agreement puts it into the hospital and retail oral-pharmaceutical market, and will strengthen its position in the Canadian hospital market through its line of injectable products. 
After more than a decade of dominating the market for the fastest and most powerful computers, Cray Research Inc. of Minneapolis now faces a new domestic challenger: ETA Systems Inc.In late December, ETA, 89% owned by Control Data Corp., shipped its first supercomputer, boasting that its new line would run faster than the fastest Cray computer. 
Todd said it appointed Brown Brothers Harriman & Co. to investigate alternatives, including the sale of assets, "a combination of Todd with another firm," and the renegotiation or refinancing of portions of the company's debt.The company also said the loss of the contract to build a new line of DDG-51 guided missile destroyers may have "a material adverse effect" on the company. 
Moog Inc. said it agreed in principle to sell its Carleton line of precision pneumatic components for $30 million to FR Group PLC of Britain. 
Mr. Gibbons couldn't be reached for comment.The new line is drawing less-than-radiant reviews in some quarters. 
Bargain hunters will face some dilemmas, however, and not all prices are falling.Some of the deepest cuts are for older IBM clones, but some of those machines won't be powerful enough to run the new industry-standard software being planned for IBM's new Personal Service/2 line. 
J. Kendrick Noble Jr., analyst with PaineWebber Inc., notes that map companies have become more aggressive in marketing their products as premiums since the mid-1970s, when oil companies, one of the industry's largest clients, stopped giving away road map atlases to attract customers.To enhance its quality image, Hammond also revamped its well-known trade line of world atlases, replacing the old cloth covered book with a leather bound, gilded, thumb-indexed edition. 
Quaker Oats Co., in a move to reduce its swollen debt load, agreed to sell several recently acquired food lines to Kraft Inc. for $235 million. 
Quaker Oats Co., in a move to reduce its swollen debt load, agreed to sell several recently acquired food lines to Kraft Inc. for $235 million.The businesses planned for sale, including such lines as Seven Seas salad dressings and Chiffon margarine, were all acquired last September when Quaker paid $805 million for Anderson, Clayton & Co., Houston. 
As previously reported, Quaker wants to sell everything it acquired in that transaction except the Gaines pet food unit.For Glenview, Ill.-based Kraft, the new lines will boost its market share on several supermarket shelves it already dominates. 
In 1986, Quaker earned $88.1 million, including $58 million from discontinued operations, on sales of $1.08 billion.The acquisition will allow Kraft to use its existing sales force and distributors for the new lines; it may also allow certain plant consolidations. 
Analysts estimate that the non-food businesses could fetch $200 million, thus further reducing Quaker's debt and positioning it to pursue its stated strategy of more acquisitions.Mr. Smithburg has said he is targeting grocery products with leading market share and toy lines that would fit into Quaker's Fisher-Price toy and children's furnishings unit. 
Moreover, as Apple moves its product line into the more expensive and sophisticated markets for engineering workstations, professional publishing systems and serious business management applications, the company's retail dealer network will have to find ways of selling computer systems that are better suited to those more sophisticated markets."What was the top of our line of business computers last week is now the bottom of our line," said John Sculley, Apple's chairman and chief executive officer. 
A week ago, Ross said it expected to report a net loss of about $42 million for the fiscal year ended Feb. 1.The expected loss results, in large part, from a fourth-period pre-tax charge of about $40 million to cover the closings of 25 stores and discontinuation of some poorly performing merchandise lines. 
She is a spokeswoman for Spring Air mattresses, has done ads for McDonald's, Buf-Puf and Nestle's, and just signed a contract with Licensing Corp. of America."Right now we're looking at a dress line," says Mr. Manzella, who claims that other offers have come in from Polaroid, Kodak, Saran Wrap, Chemical Bank and Hostess Twinkies. 
"We're expecting his addition to be very positive in devising new strategies."Founded in 1964, the company bought Matchbox wheeled toys, a 33-year-old line, in 1982. 
Universal Matchbox has a need for my talents perhaps more than Mattel does now."Mr. Forcelledo expects Mr. Kalinske's experience to move the company into more toys for girls, from its current focus on die-cast toys and boys' lines. 
If the world-market price falls below that level (it is now seven cents), quotas for imported sugar are reduced until domestic prices reach 18 cents a pound.This tactic means there is no line item in the budget labeled "Sugar Giveaway," but that the average family of four must spend an extra $100 a year in higher prices for such staples as sugar, peanut butter, ketchup, salad dressing and cereal. 
Prices range from $1,954 for a personal computer based on Intel's 80286 microprocessor to $8,653 for one based on the 386 chip.By announcing the line only two months after International Business Machines Corp. unveiled its own new family of personal computers, NCR is attempting to sway potential IBM corporate customers to buy NCR machines, three of which compete directly with the IBM computers. 
Moreover, the high-performance operating system, called OS/2, that can tap the full power of the new machines won't be available until at least 1988.Vernon Yates, a vice president of NCR and general manager of the personal computer division, acknowledged that the company is making the early announcement of the line in response to IBM's new machines. 
He said the company's weakened financial condition would make it impossible for the concern to bear certain start-up and other costs without help from the Navy.The contract is to build a new line of the Navy's DDG-51 class destroyer. 
NCR Corp., as expected, unveiled here a line of personal computers, including one based on Intel Corp.'s powerful 80386 microprocessor. 
And at American Can in the early 1980s, Mr. Tsai's enthusiasm for financial services found a receptive audience.In particular, William Woodside, then chairman of American Can, embraced Mr. Tsai's ideas for pushing into insurance, mutual funds and other financial areas, while shedding the company's traditional, slow-growth manufacturing lines. 
Greyhound Corp., looking skyward for business to replace the bus line it recently sold, agreed to acquire Carson Pirie Scott & Co.'s in-flight catering and airport-terminal concession operations for $326 million.Announcement of the proposed purchase of the Dobbs House airport restaurants and other food-service lines of Chicago-based Carson Pirie came as speculation increased that Minneapolis investor Irwin Jacobs was acquiring Greyhound shares. 
"We're going to sit and digest this one, and we'll look at it maybe a year from now," he said.The company also remains interested in acquisitions of consumer-product operations that would fit with its Purex and Dial lines -- "anything that's not perishable and can sit on a grocery shelf," he said. 
Quaker Oats agreed to sell several recently acquired food lines to Kraft for $235 million. 
Zayre Corp., whose earnings and stock value have been held down by its discount store operations, plans to sell a portion of its specialty stores to the public.Analysts said the move will raise cash for the Framingham, Mass.-based retailer and boost its stock value by highlighting the success of its off-price specialty retail lines. 
He usually does what he sets out to do," says Stephen Carnes, an analyst at Piper Jaffray & Hopwood Inc.On Wednesday, Beatrice filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for an initial public offering of its remaining non-food businesses and some of its smaller specialty-food lines. 
But he said he is "concerned" that the food businesses' earnings, which lag the industry's leading performers, could cool investor reaction to such a large offering.Beatrice's domestic lines, including Hunt's tomato products and Wesson cooking oils, had pre-tax profit of $448 million on sales of $4.82 billion in the fiscal year ended Feb. 28. 
An industry source close to Beatrice says several companies have expressed interest in the food businesses.That source said that such a sale, if it occurs, would follow the E-II offering and the likely disposition of the international food lines. 
A source close to Burlington said that half of Burlington's divisions have been breaking even or posting losses and would be ripe candidates for divestiture, while "the other half were cash cows."About 55% of Burlington's fiscal 1986 sales of $2.78 billion were in apparel fabrics, some lines of which have been hit hard by import competition. 
"Guys running plants shouldn't be handicapped against guys selling bonds," he said.In addition, Mr. Peltz said he and Mr. May have been doing more of the type of acquisition and corporate finance work that investment bankers do than the work of line industrial managers. 
Mr. Jacobs recently opened a restaurant overlooking a boat dealership he owns on the shores of Lake Minnetonka here.Tables at the snazzy New York-style deli and grill, called Sasha's, are carefully arranged: No matter which way customers turn, their gaze falls upon the dealership's line of sleek Wellcraft powerboats. 
But the once-ubiquitous preppy emblem is slowly reappearing in stores that shunned the sportswear brand after sales plummeted in 1984 and they got stuck with bloated inventories."A lot of exclusive department stores dropped most of the Izod line when it became overexposed and the quality slipped," says Marvin Lord, president of the youthwear division at Crystal Brands Inc., the marketer of Izod Lacoste apparel. 
Crystal Brands' recent consumer research found mostly favorable reaction to the alligator, but the company has decided not to plaster it on everything in sight.It's especially scarce in the women's line where fashionability is far more important than a logo. 
Instead of the traditional sewn-on patch, it is screen-printed and embroidered on some shirts.In the boys' line, a new sweater is emblazoned with a fancy crest showing the alligator on a shield with French and American flags. 
As reported, Mattel said sales from overseas operations, under Mr. Amerman's control, rose 47% in 1986.Mr. Kalinske had headed Mattel's domestic operations, which the company said suffered in 1986 because of lower demand for its Masters of the Universe line of toys. 
Digital Equipment Corp. and Cray Research Inc., two leading makers of computers for scientists and researchers, are developing methods of speeding communications between their computer lines. 
Indeed, while Cray's spokesman wouldn't say whether such discussions are under way, he noted that between 40% and 50% of Cray's supercomputers are connected with International Business Machines Corp. computers, "so it makes an awful lot of sense for us to do everything we can to improve the performance of that connection."Between 10% and 20% of Cray machines world-wide are linked with Digital's VAX line, Cray's spokesman estimated, with the rest receiving data from computers made by Minneapolis-based Control Data Corp. 
General Motors Corp., struggling with a lackluster car line and bloated costs, tapped a new president who has a proven record of cost cutting and decades of experience building automobiles. 
GM's new president is Robert C. Stempel, a 53-year-old with broad experience and a record of cost-cutting.Stempel's selection, ending a tense contest among top officers, comes as the auto maker struggles with a lackluster car line and bloated costs. 
General Motors Corp.'s Saturn Corp. subsidiary is expected tomorrow to announce details of a sales network composed of far fewer dealers than the auto maker's other car lines. 
General Motors Corp.'s Saturn Corp. subsidiary is expected tomorrow to announce details of a sales network composed of far fewer dealers than the auto maker's other car lines.A GM source said Saturn initially expects to appoint only about 100 dealers in major U.S. markets, compared with several thousand dealers at each of GM's five other car lines. 
In 1986, the maker of elastomer products and fiber materials earned $2.5 million, or 87 cents a share.The projected improvement reflects gains from an acquisition, reduced losses from unprofitable lines, and opening of a new elastomer plant. 
International Business Machines Corp., in another move to regain ground on competitors such as Digital Equipment Corp., unveiled four new models in its most powerful mid-range computer line and its first mainframe computer priced below $1 million. 
"What we've really done . . . is enhanced our mid-range," said Larry Ford, an IBM vice president.Mr. Ford said that since last October, "We've completely refreshed the entire mainframe line." 
Mr. Ford said that since last October, "We've completely refreshed the entire mainframe line."However, the machines aren't likely to significantly contribute to IBM's sales until the fourth quarter; the new mainframe, the 3090 model 120, won't be available until October, while the new machines in IBM's 4381 medium-sized line are scheduled to be shipped in the first quarter of 1988. 
The four new 4381 computers are priced between $225,000 and $890,000.The most potent of the four, the model 24, is at least six times more powerful than the entry level offering in the eight-model line. 
Under the plan, customers would get a current 4381 model and by the first quarter next year receive accessories that convert the machines into the more powerful models.IBM offered a similar incentive plan to boost current sales of an unavailable product earlier this year, when it unveiled two new models in its 3090, or Sierra mainframe line. 
Many of IBM's 4381 customers, mid-sized businesses or departments within large companies, have reached the limit of the memory capacity of the current models, but aren't ready to buy a mainframe yet, he added.The 4381 announcements also put to rest speculation that IBM would "quickly obsolete the 4381 line" with the 9370 mid-size line that was unveiled last October, said David Andrews, a consultant with ADM Inc. of Cheshire, Conn. 
The new mainframe "brings the 3090 down one more level," said IBM's Mr. Ford.IBM also announced new software packages, including the first software permitting the development of applications that will run across the so-called System/370 line of computers.The System/370 line consists of the 9370 and 4381 mid-range computers and the 3090 mainframes. 
Yesterday's hardware and software introductions are the most recent step in a flurry of moves IBM has made since October to fend off stiff competition from companies such as Digital Equipment, a major threat in the mid-range market, and Amdahl Corp., which makes machines that run software made for IBM's mainframes.In addition to unveiling the 9370 line, IBM has enhanced its lackluster workstation, the RT personal computer, and cut prices on its mainframe offerings while introducing new ones.The company also introduced a new line of personal computers last month, in a bid to protect its position in that market. 
"No matter how you look at it, Chrysler's getting a lot of value for what it is paying," said Scott Merlis, an analyst with Morgan Stanley & Co. "Chrysler brings a lot of value to AMC, AMC brings a lot of value to Chrysler."Specifically, Chrysler is expected to benefit greatly from AMC's popular Jeep line -- its only consistently profitable product -- and AMC's state-of-the-art assembly facility in Bramlea, Ontario. 
Beatrice Cos. said it filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for an initial public offering for its remaining non-food businesses and some of its smaller specialty-food lines. 
E-II's businesses will include Stiffel Lamps, Samsonite luggage and the Culligan water softener business.Its food lines will include Martha White baking mixes, Lowrey's meat snacks and a private-label pizza business. 
Beatrice's food core includes Swift meats, Hunt's tomato products and Wesson cooking oil.The E-II offering continues Beatrice's strategy of shedding its non-food lines. 
Alfin Inc., which has come under government attack for anti-aging claims about its wrinkle creams, said it will report "significant losses, particularly in the current fiscal quarter."The cosmetics maker added that it retained Bear, Stearns & Co. to study "financial alternatives," including the sale of the skin-care line. 
Allis-Chalmers Corp. said it received a $150 million proposal for certain of its businesses from Chicago-based CA Ltd.The mining and minerals processing equipment concern said CA has offered to buy Allis-Chalmers's solids process equipment business -- which also includes its energy and mineral systems line -- the Stephens-Adamson business, industrial pump business and power generation systems business. 
Beatrice Cos. plans an initial public offering for its remaining non-food businesses and some of its smaller specialty-food lines. 
Vast stretches of previously uninhabited wilderness in such states as Mato Grosso, and even Amazon, have been transformed into some of the most productive farms in the world.And the industrial giants of Sao Paulo today successfully compete on an international level and occasionally pioneer advanced equipment, such as Embraer's successful airline-manufacturing line. 
Companies that sell cars in the U.S. are required by federal law to phase in passive-restraint systems such as automatic seat belts or airbags.Ford didn't specify which car lines might get the safety equipment, which protects passengers against injury in head-on collisions, but said they would be added to cars with driver-side air bags. 
Driver-side air bags currently are available on four-door Ford Tempo and Mercury Topaz models, as well as on some European imported cars.Robert H. Munson, Ford director of automotive safety, said the passenger air bags will be offered on "certain car lines, assuming the engineering and testing now under way demonstrate that a safe, reliable and effective system is practical and that an adequate supply of such systems is then available." 
Donald D. Kingsborough, chairman and chief executive officer, said the drop in fourth-quarter earnings resulted from heavy investments in new products intended to diversify operations.The company soon will begin shipping a line of school accessories, including an answering machine for use in school lockers -- a device that is triggered to record messages by a whistle-like activator. 
The computer system, which isn't expected to be available until the fourth quarter this year, will have a base price of $27,495.System 1300, as the new product is called, fills a gap in the company's line of multiuser computer systems for business. 
Graphic Packaging Corp., Paoli, Pa., began trading under the symbol GPAK.The company manufactures a diverse line of flexible packaging products for various industries. 
Year-ago net included a $4.2 million charge in connection with the closing of a baby-food plant in Oakland, Calif.The company said sales improved as a result of the widespread acceptance of a new line of baby foods introduced in October. 
He noted that it offers SmithKline an opportunity to increase its share of the injectable antibiotics market and to increase Tagamet's use among hospital patients.Ronald Nordmann of PaineWebber Inc. said the arrangement will allow SmithKline to boost sales of some of its antibiotics that aren't selling well by "tying them into a program that promotes a specific (product) line." 
Meanwhile, Staples' competitors aren't standing still.Discount warehouse chains like Price Co. and Costco Wholesale Corp., which sell a variety of products and reportedly receive almost 10% of their revenues from sales of office products, plan to expand office-supplies line. 
The price of the contract wasn't disclosed, but Galoob said it made an advance payment and also will pay royalties.Galoob said it will market a line of action figures, playsets, electronic hand-held games and toy weapons based on the new program, which will begin Oct. 3. 
Fortune Friday reported a first-quarter net loss of $1.5 million, compared with a $345,000 profit a year earlier, on a 32% drop in revenue to $7.3 million.SCI, an electronics manufacturer, has said the acquisition of Fortune's microcomputer business will strengthen its own lines of microcomputer products. 
"I'm surprised that would happen.I thought the main line (business) was pretty solid," said Bert Metter, who, until late April, was chairman and chief executive officer of Thompson's J. Walter Thompson USA unit. 
"If I come into (a television station) in Los Angeles with a great show, they say, 'Thank you very much, goodbye,'" says Andrew Heyward, a former Hanna Barbera writer and story editor who is now president and majority shareholder of Dic Enterprises."But if we go in and say, 'Hey, we've got a hot toy line coming out from Mattel, and normally they spend $7 million in your market on spot advertising,' that's a different story." 
Year-earlier net included a gain of about $8.6 million from sale of a division.Burlington also noted gains in some industrial and home-furnishing lines. 
SELLING SCENTS gets tougher, prompting a fragrance-industry shakeup.Disappointing profits put many fragrance lines on the block, including some owned by drug companies. 
The buyers: cosmetics and fragrance companies.Revlon Group Inc. purchases the Diane Von Furstenberg fragrances from Beecham Group PLC, while Sanofi Inc. buys distribution rights to the Nina Ricci line from American Cyanamid Co. 
Boys and dating came in sixth.LEGGY LOOKS: Thigh-high skirts sell well in designer and junior lines. 
A sale of the seven consumer brands would take away valuable Robins assets.Robins's consumer products unit, which comprises the seven brands and a line of pet-care products, had operating profit of $52.7 million on sales of $267 million in 1986. 
The latest announcement includes some plants that just last month were temporarily shut down and then restarted.The car lines affected by the new action include the Pontiac 6000 and the Buick Century. 
Benihana National Corp. said it has retained Kidder, Peabody & Co. to advise the company on a sale, joint venture or licensing arrangement of its frozen food division.The restaurant and frozen food concern said a sale or other disposition of its two frozen food lines would permit it to direct financial resources to the development of its restaurant business. 
Low ingredient costs, heavy promotion of new products and aggressive marketing of established lines such as cereals and frozen food helped profits. 
IBM and Apple are making big cuts in the number of dealers who will be permitted to carry their new products, but are trying to tie up more of the remaining dealers' shelf space and more of their salesmens' "mind space" -- as one dealer puts it.As a result, dealers will generally become more specialized, dropping some manufacturers' products so they can concentrate on a few main lines and possibly focusing on fewer types of customers. 
Those drawbacks likely mean that as many as a third of IBM's current dealers will either decide not to carry the new products or won't qualify.But dealers say they like IBM's moves to use the new computer line to lock in big-business customers, and those dealers who remain will have pledged allegiance to Big Blue. 
Computer Factory has cut about a third of the vendors it used to carry.The ComputerLand Corp. store in St. Cloud, Minn., chose not to renew its sales agreement with Apple and may drop some printer lines so it can concentrate on IBM's new printer line; Mr. DeBoer of ComputerLand predicts its IBM sales will increase 15%. 
"It was already happening, but it was happening slowly."He says that not only will dealers focus on fewer lines of equipment, but that dealers will focus more on market niches -- concentrating on businesses of a certain size or on specific industries, such as banking or insurance. 
The non-food businesses had sales of $1.2 billion in the year ended Feb. 28, 1987, representing about 13% of Beatrice's total.Mr. Kelly plans to assume control of the non-food company, the sources said, gradually shedding some lines and perhaps adding others in building an independent Chicago-based conglomerate. 
Upriver, men demonstrate the business end of a blowgun.Here, at the Ngiu Kee department store, cosmetologists demonstrate the new Bio line of natural-ingredient makeup put out by Kenebo, the Japanese cosmetics firm. 
Mr. White pointed out that in fiscal 1985, sales of computer terminals accounted for 96% of Wyse's business.After acquiring Amdek Corp., a distributor of electronic products, in January 1986, and after introducing its own line of personal computers, the sales mix shifted considerably. 
ICI Americas Inc. announced a $50 million expansion of its polyester-film plant in Hopewell, Va.The expansion involves a new thick-film line that is slated to begin production in 1989 and increase plant capacity 20%. 
The Japanese, launching their long-awaited effort to crack the U.S. supercomputer market, introduced a three-machine line and vowed to compete head-on with U.S. rivals. 
Energy Conversion Devices Inc. said its optical memory-storage technology is being used by International Business Machines Corp. in a new line of personal computers. 
The consumer products and financial services businesses had lower operating earnings, Greyhound said, though transportation manufacturing earnings rose 7%.The company said its line of household laundry products hadn't returned to the profit levels that prevailed before new-product spending by competitors was increased in mid 1986. 
GM has designed the program to bring customers into Chevrolet showrooms, as buyers must sit inside a vehicle with a paper "key" from the Procter & Gamble products to see if they've won.Also included in this joint promotion is a new line of Chevrolet pickup trucks. 
GM's other divisions cut financing rates for 36-month and 48-month loan contracts.In addition, rebates for Buick and Oldsmobile models now are based on specific car lines rather than on the type and number of options ordered with the car. 
Soon, GM will know whether it has been playing leapfrog -- or just a desperate game of follow-the-leader.Six years and some $5 billion later, the No. 1 auto maker is preparing to introduce what could be its most important car line ever, now code-named "GM-10." 
And Taurus and Sable have driven triumphantly into the mid-size market.At the same time, GM's line of older, rear-wheel-drive mid-size cars, such as the current Regal and Pontiac Grand Prix, is scheduled for retirement. 
GM also is counting on GM-10 to help reduce its use of high-cost, in-house parts suppliers.For William J. Clark, that meant telling former colleagues at a Warren, Mich., plant that they couldn't supply GM-10 with a steering-system part as they have done with other GM lines. 
Separately, Ford said its Australian unit and Nissan's Australian unit are discussing the possibility of jointly selling certain models in Australia.The discussions are a response to the Australian government's plan to limit the number of car lines produced in that country. 
In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Minnetonka shares jumped $3 to close at $29.375.The lines planned for sale are Softsoap liquid soap, Village Bath soaps and shampoos and Sesame Street bubble bath and shampoo.Jerome Jenko, Minnetonka's vice president and general counsel, estimated total sales for the three lines at more than $50 million last year. 
Jerome Jenko, Minnetonka's vice president and general counsel, estimated total sales for the three lines at more than $50 million last year.Mr. Jenko said the planned sale is part of a strategy to focus on the company's higher-margin lines, which include Obsession perfume and cologne and other Calvin Klein fragrances.Also, Minnetonka said it signed an agreement in principle to market Calvin Klein Industries Inc.'s lines of women's small leather accessories world-wide under the Calvin Klein trademark. 
"Restaurants even did better on tomato soup than homemade or store-bought, which caused a lot of consternation around here," says Anthony Adams, Campbell's director of marketing research.So does Campbell regret naming a new line of soups Home Cookin'? 
REEBOK INTERNATIONAL LTD. Chairman Paul Fireman predicted the Canton, Mass., concern would become the leading maker of basketball shoes by year's end.Reebok's meteoric rise was based on its aerobic-shoe line; it added basketball sneakers last year. 
In a speech in New York, Compaq President Rod Canion said "Compaq intends to continue . . . providing industry standard" personal computers.Earlier this month IBM introduced a new line of personal computers that deviate in certain ways from the standard it set with its IBM PC in 1981 -- the standard on which Compaq based the $1.8 billion in computers it has sold since its start-up in 1983. 
Michael S. Swavely, Compaq's vice president, marketing, said Compaq would have "at least one major new product announcement this year," fitting the strategy outlined in Mr. Canion's speech.But Mr. Swavely wouldn't rule out the possibility of Compaq producing a computer compatible with the new IBM line.He said it was "conceivable" that Compaq might eventually produce two lines of computers based on the different standards. 
Wilson has long had a reputation for innovation, new products and smart marketing.Even through the difficult times since it was spun off by LTV Corp. in 1981, the company maintained a research program that helped develop its deli line and new technology for tenderizing fresh pork for its Tendercuts brand. 
In the over-the-counter market, Sun Microsystems rose 1 3/4 to 34 1/8, Microsoft gained 7 1/4 to 106 1/4, Lotus Development advanced 2 1/2 to 31 and Apollo Computer added 2 to 20 1/8.Apple Computer, which plans to create an independent software company to develop and publish software for two of its computer lines, moved up 2 to 77 in OTC trading as volume topped 1.4 million shares. 
The need for regulatory approval and complex computer systems keeps many small insurers out of the variable-life market.BRIEFS: Eldergames, a new line of games designed for patients suffering memory loss, includes Eldertrivia and Memory Jogger flashcards. . . . 
Prab Robots Inc. said Westinghouse Electric Corp.'s Unimation Inc. unit agreed in principle to license Prab to make, sell and service Unimation's line of hydraulic Unimate industrial robots in North and South America. 
When the novel came on the market in late 1985, at least five houses wanted it.Gerald Howard, who runs Penguin's Contemporary American Fiction line, says he took care of the competition by "reading it very quickly and going nuts for it." 
Mr. Howard reports that Alliance Entertainment has paid a $10,000 option toward a $200,000 purchase if it likes the script treatment.The CAF line is the eight-year-old reprint house for such sturdy modern masters as Donald Barthelme, William Kennedy and Laurie Colwin. 
In the economics of modern mass-market paperback publishing, a serious literary novel that sells steadily but modestly is nearly impossible to keep in print.Nowadays, it is an outfit like CAF, as well as Random House's Vintage line and a clutch of small presses, that offer the possibility of a long life for much serious fiction. 
As with IBM, other computer concerns reported sharply stronger March sales.The surge was partly attributed to customers who had been holding back to evaluate new models and enhancements in IBM's Sierra mainframe line. 
American Telephone & Telegraph Co. cut prices 5% to 38% on its slow-selling personal computers, reflecting increasing price competition in the wake of the new PC family unveiled earlier this month by International Business Machines Corp.The biggest cuts were made in the AT&T PC 6300 Plus line; the price of an entry model with a single floppy disk drive fell 38% to $1,590, and the price of the top-of-the-line model with a "hard" disk storing the equivalent of 20,000 pages of data was cut 29% to $3,065. 
"I want to be in a situation where I can see some positive results very quickly."At Digital, the 51-year-old Mr. Kramer is best known as the product manager who built the company's line of PDP scientific computers into a $300 million business by 1978. 
Mr. Rattigan, 49 years old, was widely viewed as the architect of a severe cost-cutting campaign that was largely responsible for the return to profitability.While sales gains have trailed the increase in profit, the company has been betting that its expanded line of Amiga personal computers will spur revenue growth. 
It was the first vaccine produced by gene-splicing to gain FDA marketing clearance.Biocine was formed to develop and put on the market a line of genetically engineered vaccines against a variety of infectious diseases including AIDS, oral, genital herpes, malaria and several strains of hepatitis. 
The slower sales growth for personal computers also triggered a shakeout among personal-computer dealers that thinned their ranks by more than a third.And, as if that weren't enough, last year personal-computer prices were driven down by the many clones of IBM's standard-setting PC line of computers. 
Revenue fell 1.1% to $315.2 million from $318.8 million because of "the rapid deterioration in sales of our older" computer products, said Edson D. deCastro, president.Revenue from the MV line of super-minicomputers grew, he said, and many customers are inquiring about computers, although they haven't yet placed orders. 
Mr. Henson said "our better-than-expected earnings can be attributed to a surge in orders late in the quarter," and cost controls.In February, he warned analysts to expect flat results because customers were holding off purchases while waiting for a new line of machines to become available. 
Stratus makes "fault tolerant" computers that can handle a constant stream of tasks without breaking down.It said that products in a new line of computers it introduced Feb. 2 accounted for 75% of its first-quarter revenue. 
Computer sales account for roughly 25% of the company's sales, according to analysts.Unit sales for the company's line of computers compatible with International Business Machines Corp.'s PC increased 62% in the quarter.Some analysts had suggested that computer sales might be upset by the introduction of a new line of personal computers from IBM, expected throughout the quarter. 
Her responsibilities included ordering supplies, typing sales reports, coordinating travel arrangements and making morning coffee.She also represented a small peripheral line she'd learned about while cleaning out the office files. 
Since no one else was interested in handling the project, the district manager let her take it on in addition to her other responsibilities.When she succeeded with that line, she took on several other small products. 
Merlin II, the larger of the new Merlin systems, can accommodate as many as 32 lines and 72 phones.The new Merlin, which essentially replaces the existing Merlin line, has more features such as tracking length and duration of calls by phone, than the Spirit system, AT&T said.Smaller models of both lines will be available by May, with larger models available in the third quarter. 
Digital Equipment Corp. pulled the plug on its slow-selling Rainbow line of personal computers. 
He added that "this year we're going to make sure the revenue (growth) is real, and then let the expenses follow."In particular, Xerox is benefiting from an aggressive, two-year program of cost-cutting in its office-equipment lines. 
The rebound is most evident in Xerox's first-quarter earnings from continuing operations, which rose 32% to $135 million, or $1.25 a share, compared with $102 million, or 93 cents a share, a year ago.Pre-tax profit from Xerox's photocopier and computer-systems lines was double that of the year-earlier period. 
Thomas Industries Inc. said it has signed an agreement with Schreder Lighting of Brussels, Belgium, to make and market Schreder's line of tunnel lighting products in the U.S. and Canada, except Quebec. 
Thomas, which makes a broad range of lighting products, said its Emco Lighting division in Milan, Ill., will make and market the Schreder products.Schreder makes tunnel lighting from 18 factories world-wide and also makes a broad line of outdoor lighting products. 
In the year-earlier quarter, the oil and gas concern had net income of $22.1 million, or 45 cents a share, on sales of $718.9 million.Kerr-McGee said all its lines were profitable in the 1987 quarter except for its contract drilling and uranium operations, which incurred "small losses." 
The executives said inventories were reduced 34% during the quarter to $59 million from $79 million, and that short-term bank debt was reduced 57% to $58 million from $91 million.In explaining the lower profit margins, they cited a higher concentration of seasonal outdoor product sales, which carry lower margins than the remainder of Coleco's line, and sales of Cabbage Patch Kids dolls at lower margins, partly because of special first-quarter sales incentives. 
First-quarter operating profit, before special gains, reached a record $65 million, up 68% from $38.8 million a year earlier.Transamerica attributed the improvement to significantly higher earnings across a broad line of its businesses. 
Until recently, Rorer was a lackluster company whose leading over-the-counter brand, Maalox antacid, was losing market share.But under its new chairman and chief executive officer, Robert E. Cawthorn, the company has been pushing to become a top drug maker by narrowing its focus and searching for a major acquisition with strong cash flow and a compatible line of prescription-drug products. 
Ronald M. Nordmann, a drug analyst at PaineWebber, said Robins would constitute "a very good catch" for Rorer, provided the Dalkon Shield liability could be capped at a "reasonable" level.By acquiring Robins, Rorer could build its prescription- and over-the-counter drug lines, he said. 
Philip Morris said the market share of its U.S. tobacco unit increased compared with a year ago, although cigarette unit volume fell for both the industry and Philip Morris U.S.A.The company said lower retail prices boosted sales for General Foods' Maxwell House coffee line, while strong gains also were achieved for Louis Rich turkey products. 
The maker of air-conditioning and heating equipment expects earnings for the second quarter -- historically, its best period of the year -- to exceed year-earlier net income of $5.3 million, or 61 cents a share, James T. Dresher, vice chairman, said.Some of the gains will come from sales of a new line of rooftop air conditioners suited for fast-food restaurants and strip shopping centers, Mr. Dresher said in an interview. 
As reported, Avon has agreed in principle to acquire Giorgio Inc., a Beverly Hills, Calif.-based fragrance maker, for $185 million, and there are plans for other acquisitions soon, he said.Specifically, Mr. Waldron expressed a strong interest in the Elizabeth Arden line that the Indianapolis pharmaceutical concern Eli Lilly & Co. has said it is selling. 
Apple Computer's profit rose an unexpected 6.5% in its latest quarter, surprising even the company.Sales surged 41%, led by continued strength in the Macintosh computer line. 
"The obvious surprise is how well our sales are doing," said Robert Saltmarsh, Apple's treasurer, who added that their sales growth "is really broadly based."Apple has enjoyed continued strong sales of its Macintosh line of personal computers to the important business market. 
In addition, Mr. Saltmarsh said, the company's 10-year-old Apple II product line, which caters to home and educational markets, continues to sell well.Shipments of the newest machine in the line, the Apple II-gs introduced last fall, have picked up. 
The machines "are crucial for Prime.They had a need to expand their line," said Richard Mikita, an analyst with market researcher International Data Corp., Framingham, Mass. 
Separately, Wang introduced several new products that allow pictures and images to be stored on optical disks and then shown on special computer screens.The systems work with Wang's current line of computers, and Wang officials predicted they may sell as much as $100 million of the systems in fiscal 1988. 
Computer Associates has grown rapidly by focusing on a part of the software market called systems utilities, which help data processing centers manage their operations more efficiently.It has made a series of acquisitions to broaden its line of business software, including the purchase of Software International Corp. and Integrated Software Systems Corp. last December. 
The big pieces left are financial services, auto parts, defense and aerospace, industrial and forest products, communications, and hotels.Mr. Kelly envisions a manufacturing acquisition that would, for example, add to the auto-parts line. 
Basics are no secret to merchandisers.For many years major retailers identified basic items in all staple lines and made certain they were "always available." 
For years, Rorer Group Inc. was regarded as a dull laggard of the drug industry.It had a tiny research budget and a weak prescription-drug line. 
Despite such ambitious moves, Mr. Cawthorn acknowledges that a lot more will be needed to catapult Rorer into a leadership position.Ideally, he says he would like to buy a company with "strong cash flow" and a compatible line of prescription-drug products. 
Tandy Corp.'s computer sales weren't hurt in its third quarter ended March 31 by the expectation that International Business Machines Corp. would announce a new line of personal computers, Tandy's chairman, John Roach, said. 
Overall computer sales in the consumer electronics concern's fiscal third quarter rose 16%, he said.Both percentage figures include Tandy's line of computers that aren't IBM-compatible, as well as those that are. 
The increase was primarily fueled by IBM's large mainframe computers, analysts said.Sales sputtered earlier in the quarter, largely because customers were scrutinizing IBM's January introduction of two new models and price cuts in its so-called Sierra mainframe line. "(We) began to gain momentum and had an excellent March," an IBM spokesman said. 
"That's when they'll be hitting on all eight cylinders," Montgomery's Mr. Jones said.In July, the company is expected to start delivering its new midrange computers; IBM's sales of its new personal computer line, unveiled earlier this month, also will be well under way and the company's expenses should be lower. 
"Profit margins are still under pressure and prices are still under pressure in the computer industry and aren't likely to let up."IBM's profit margins declined almost three percentage points in the quarter, reflecting price cutting in the personal computer line "and some other products," the IBM spokesman said. 
At $165 an ounce, "clearly (Giorgio) reaches a very carriage trade business."He said Avon will keep Giorgio and its traditional business separate and that Avon representatives won't sell the Giorgio line. 
A spokesman said the planned transaction doesn't forestall other acquisitions by Avon for its beauty or health care operations.For one thing, he said, the company continues to be "very interested" in the Elizabeth Arden line that Eli Lilly & Co., Indianapolis, has said it wants to sell. 
"Still, with the introduction of the new IBM machines it's an important time for Compaq and it would be better to have him than not," Mr. Galvin added.International Business Machines Corp. last week introduced a new line of personal computers that will compete with Compaq's line, which has grown from the original portable to include a number of desktop models. 
In its complaint filed in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York, American Natural Beverage Corp., maker of Soho Natural Soda, claims Anheuser-Busch's packaging for Zeltzer Seltzer is "confusingly similar" to that for Soho Natural.Closely held American Natural said it has used its current packaging design for Soho Natural since 1982 and sells the fruit-flavored line of sodas in 33 states. 
Robert H. Smith, National-Oilwell chairman, said, "By combining the strengths of two of the leading companies in the field, we are forming an entity which can survive under current depressed industry conditions."The company makes and sells a complete line of drilling and production equipment. 
Mr. Frain, a marketing specialist, was chosen in late January to be the first president and chief executive officer of Alfred Dunhill of London Inc., the U.S. arm of Dunhill Holdings.He says the company plans to expand beyond its traditional line of very expensive smokers' products, into very expensive "serious menswear." 
We mix tobacco for individual customers."And so the line of suits Dunhill plans to launch will have a "bottom price point" of $750.Most of the line, which will emphasize custom fit and hand tailoring, will hover around the $2,000 mark, according to Mr. Frain. 
Menswear, which in the U.S. now includes fine tailored products, makes up 30% of sales.Mr. Frain says he will focus in the U.S. on retail and on more complete menswear lines. 
"The average person isn't interested."Nor does Mr. Farley want viewers to remember him displaying the company's latest line of underwear. 
The company said its purchase of 4.2 million of its shares during 1986 fueled a 15% rise in earnings per share.Despite sales increases in electronics, major appliances and other lines, Raytheon reported lower sales in energy services and aircraft products. 
Once sleepy Glenmore is taking lots of gambles these days.The "Light of Day" project was merely the start of a major repositioning campaign to liven up its old-fashioned Mr. Boston line of liqueurs and other distilled spirits. 
Sales for the quarter exceeded $200 million, he said.The earnings and sales figures, both better than analysts expected, indicate that Compaq's sales during the quarter weren't hurt significantly by the prospect of a new line of computers that International Business Machines Corp. was expected to introduce at the end of the period. 
She added 1980s sunglasses, patches and labeling, and had the company sponsor a women's surfing cup.Mrs. Gibson also helped originate Limited's pseudo-Italian Forenza line and has introduced new labels like Outback Red, an Australian safari look, and Axcess accessories. 
But as Mrs. Gibson experiments with more upscale and expensive merchandise, and as the stores' target population ages, analysts say she will have to keep a careful eye on the identity of both stores and merchandise.Certainly not all of her moves score; according to one analyst, the Album by Kenzo -- a line of recent years -- has been vastly scaled back because it "didn't fit." 
When she surfaces, she is friendly but blunt."You know I always tell the truth," she warned one designer who asked what she thought of the line of blue jeans and sweatshirts he'd just lovingly presented. 
Varian Associates Inc. said it received a three-year contract for more than $30 million from Toshiba Corp.Varian will supply X-ray tubes for the Tokyo company's line of computerized tomography scanners. 
The maker of disk drive controllers wouldn't elaborate on the size of the expected loss, but a spokesman said the company doesn't expect to have any future business with IBM.The parts the company used to supply to IBM are for machines that are being phased out in connection with the big computer maker's recently introduced line of personal computers. 
Carlo De Benedetti, chairman of ING. C. OLIVETTI & CO., announced plans to launch a new line of Olivetti personal computers and minicomputers in June and to set up an industrial holding company in Spain. 
In over-the-counter trading, shares of clone-maker Wyse Technology Inc. also rose, and Apple Computer Inc. stock was up sharply."After all the dust settles from the big announcement, the long wait begins," said Apple Chairman John Sculley, contending that Apple is way ahead of IBM. Similarly, Compaq President Rod Canion said he doesn't see any need for price cuts or product changes and that IBM's new line "doesn't offer any major new advantages and isn't very aggressive from a pricing standpoint." 
But in moving against such clones as Epson, IBM may be applying more immediate pressure through its new, tighter approach to PC dealers.Big Blue is restricting the number of dealers -- now totaling 2,300 for the old line -- that will be authorized to sell the newest and highest-priced products by creating a special class of retailer. 
Moreover, the dealers must meet certain sales quotas, carry other designated IBM products, report sales to IBM monthly and bolster customer support.Such requirements may force some dealers to drop other brands to spend more time and resources on the IBM line. 
"Anyone who carries four or five (brands) will have to reevaluate it," said Bert Helfinstein, chairman of Entre Computer Centers Inc. Added Jim Levinson, who owns three ComputerLand stores in Cincinnati: "The kinds of things (IBM) is asking for are very money-intensive . . . it's going to make us rethink our business totally."The low end of the IBM line consists of two models that IBM said are as much as 2 1/2 times faster than the existing PC XT, have more memory and have better graphics, and are lower priced. 
IBM also announced dozens of other hardware and software products including five printers, computer-networking programs, and a desktop-publishing system priced at $8,553, which some analysts saw as aggressively priced.To clear store shelves for the new products, IBM made these price reductions: a 35% cut to $1,395 for a model of the PC XT and a 32% cut to $1,545 for another; a 15% cut to $1,695 for the PC Convertible "laptop"; a 17% cut to $2,810 for another XT model; a 13% cut to $4,595 for two PC AT versions; 9.3% cuts to $6,810 for two other ATs, and cuts of 4% to 10% for four models of IBM's slow-selling 3270 PC line. 
"Sun workstations typically are sold in a configuration of five or eight workstations, while a Macintosh II will be more of a stand-alone workstation," he said.A spokesman for Apollo Computer said that the company doesn't have any workstations directly competing with the low end of Sun's line, and that its units remain priced competitively against Sun's more powerful models. 
At Dec. 31 Fortune's cash assets totaled $20.5 million and its shareholders equity was $51 million.SCI, an electronics manufacturer, said the acquisition of Fortune's microcomputer business would strengthen its own lines of microcomputer products. 
Its next new, high-volume car, the mid-sized GM10 model, won't debut until this fall, and then only initially in one version at one division.Until then, the company has to rely on its existing lines, which haven't been selling well, despite cash rebates, option package rebates and low-interest finance rates that currently cover more than half its cars. 
IBM UNVEILED its new line of personal computers, marking a new era of competition in the market. 
And while Mr. Herbert says he expects the company to grow internally, he says he also expects it to "be aggressively looking for acquisitions that will dramatically expand the business."While the unit has always looked for acquistions, he says, now it likely will be looking more broadly than just at lines that supplement Minute Maid's chilled or frozen business. 
Decisions percolated to the top for even minor entertainment expenses.Until recently, Vice Chairman J. Phillip Samper, who heads photographic and information products, could be called upon to make a decision on any one of 50,000 products. (Now business-unit managers are responsible for their own lines.) 
In recent quarters Federal has focused on new chicken products that are geared to current consumer trends and also command higher prices.Items like its Time Trimmer line of filleted, quick-to-prepare chicken parts have been paying off. 
Lately, consultants have had a field day ridiculing unwieldy new corporate names like Allegis and Trinova.But the most criticized name seems to be Honda Motor Co.'s Acura car line. 
Geo.A. Hormel & Co. tests Top Shelf, a line of entrees such as boneless beef ribs that can be heated in two minutes. 
Carson Pirie Scott & Co. in Chicago spins off three concepts: Corporate Level for executives, Arcadia for gifts and cards, and Inpulse for knitwear.To control selection and display, Liz Claiborne Inc. plans its own stores with a new line of clothes in late 1987 or early 1988. 
MONARCH AVALON INC. said earnings for the year ending April 30 won't be aided by a new line of toys because it won't begin selling the toys until May.In an earlier edition, A. Eric Dott, president, said the company would begin selling the line in April. 
Why create something new?"While Moline, Ill.-based Deere will still be able to market its smaller line of diesel engines through Detroit Diesel's expansive distribution network, it must now look for a way to develop a new engine for the 1990s, analysts said. 
After months of angst in the computer industry and seemingly endless rumors, International Business Machines Corp. finally will introduce its new line of personal computers on Thursday. 
Yet some students of history may recall that Apple ran a smug ad in 1981 welcoming IBM to the PC market -- then watched as IBM's market share quickly dwarfed Apple's.In any case, competitors seem ready to finally face reality and either take their lumps or perhaps profit from any weaknesses in the IBM line. 
SciMed also said that it and certain of its stockholders have granted Bristol-Myers options to buy more than 50% of all authorized shares at $29.25 a share.SciMed, which designs, makes and markets disposable medical products used to treat cardiovascular disease, recently introduced a line of coronary balloon angioplasty catheters to widen obstructed coronary arteries, facilitating blood flow. 
For marketers of new products, this lack of gusto means trouble.But Langer suggests that habit shoppers may be more willing to try new products if they are line extensions with familiar brand names. 
New businesses that officials expect to contribute to future sales and profit include waste-to-energy systems, hazardous- and toxic-waste cleanups, business communications, space commercialization and electronic security systems for nuclear plants.These lines currently have sales of about $50 million and are expected to contribute $300 million to $500 million in sales by 1989. 
Xerox Corp., too, has been using product semantics increasingly in its design strategy, a move it claims has resulted in less training for users and fewer service calls to remedy simple problems.Recently, the company introduced a line of copiers that call to mind typical office desks, with flat surfaces for paperwork on top and storage space and access doors below. 
IBM will unveil its new line of personal computers Thursday, ending months of speculation. 
A 60-day to 65-day supply is considered normal.The company has also suffered declining sales and high inventories in some of its truck lines, meaning the strike shouldn't have a significant financial effect unless it lasts a long time, analysts said. 
"A strike would probably help," said Philip K. Fricke of Goldman, Sachs & Co.In addition, most of the truck lines produced in Pontiac are also made at other plants. 
Other analysts believe that Bull sees the partnership as a way to broaden its international market, while NEC views it as a way to expand technology exports.NEC produces many parts in Honeywell's current computer line. 
Mr. Fireman said that he will focus his own efforts on strategic planning, acquisitions and overseeing operations.Canton, Mass.-based Reebok has grown rapidly, with sales tripling last year to $919.4 million, on the strength of its stylish aerobic shoes followed by other athletic shoe lines. 
Monarch Avalon Inc. expects fiscal 1987 earnings to match last year's $154,000, or eight cents a share, A. Eric Dott, president, said.Mr. Dott cited strong fourth-quarter sales from several new board games and a new line of toys. 
For the first nine months, Mattel's net income fell 75% to $18.6 million, or 31 cents a share, from $73.4 million, or $1.37 a share, a year earlier.Harold Vogel, a Merrill Lynch & Co. analyst, said Mattel's major problem is that unsold retail inventories of its "Masters of the Universe" line of toys are still very large. 
Several new toys that were considered possible hits for this year have failed to live up to expectations.Coleco's Rambo, Pawtucket, R.I.-based Hasbro Inc.'s Inhumanoids, and Beverly, Mass.-based Kenner Parker Toys Inc.'s Centurions, all action-figure lines for boys, haven't sold well. 
Hasbro's Transformers action figures, which had sales of $335 million last year, will decline to about $195 million in 1986, the company said.And Hawthorne, Calif.-based Mattel Inc. said that sales of its Masters of the Universe characters will decline "significantly" from 1985 sales of about $400 million for the line. 
But 1987 looks brighter for the industry.Analysts and toy buyers said the major companies will have better lines of action figures and dolls than they did this year. 
Coleco will introduce miniature dolls with magnets on their feet, which are part of a U.S. space force and use equipment with little motors to lift cargo and other items.Toy buyers and analysts said extensions of several lines, such as Hasbro's rock star Jem, also may be winners. 
His fashion company, Fiorucci S.p.A., of which he is one-third owner, expects pre-tax profit this year of $3 million on sales of $80 million, up from profit of about $800,000 on sales of $60 million last year.Mr. Fiorucci's reworked fashions -- the current men's line, Classic Nouveau, invokes the 1940s -- and mass items like blue jeans are a big hit in France, West Germany and South America. 
Though Fiorucci makes mainly clothes, it has designed such things as wall clocks and tableware.At the company's Milan headquarters, the team of 16 designers is working on a line that includes durable and expensive-looking leather jackets as well as chunky sweaters and more blue jeans. 
Terms of the transaction with Henkel, which is expected to close early next year, weren't disclosed.The Nopco line has annual sales of about $160 million. 
The new division will be called the Business Products & Systems Group.Earnings from Xerox's troubled office-equipment lines, which also include printers and computers, have declined in each of the first three quarters this year. 
The Reliance acquisition brought Exxon a number of problems related to Reliance's Federal Pacific Electric Co. unit.Problems with the design of a line of Federal Pacific circuit breakers led to a costly recall. 
Ply-Gem Industries Inc. said it agreed to acquire closely held Great Lakes Window Corp., Toledo, Ohio, for $18 million.The purchase, which will add to Ply-Gem's line of specialty home-improvement products, is expected to close before year's end. 
Mr. Hassenfeld said the company's Transformers action toys group would be the largest category contributing to 1986 results.Hasbro reiterated that it expects sales of the line to fall; Mr. Hassenfeld estimated the sales would fall to $195 million this year from $335 million last year. 
Mr. Scharffenberger says Mr. Meenaghan "has a good, thorough insurance background."Mr. Meenaghan says Home will "pursue growth aggressively" in some specialized lines, but the growth will be orderly. 
In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, First Interstate closed at $54.25 a share, down 25 cents; BankAmerica closed at $14.625 a share, unchanged.Separately, BankAmerica agreed as part of a restructuring to sell Bank of America's consumer trust line to the Wells Fargo Bank unit of Wells Fargo & Co., another San Francisco banking concern, for $100 million. 
After some debate, Ansell decides to relaunch LifeStyles instead of introducing a new brand.But it still plans to add new products to the line, and it is still considering changing the name to Partners. 
Through QO Chemicals, Pentech produces certain specialty chemicals that are used to make furfuryl alcohol and other products used in foundry resins, plastics, flame retardant building materials, oil refining and urethane systems.Great Lakes said QO's specialty chemical line fits well into several markets it already serves and enhances its international presence. 
Hasbro Inc. says Tonka Corp. ran off with its new toy.Hasbro accuses Tonka of misappropriating information about a "secret" concept for a toy line -- industry rumors are that it involves a holographic technique -- that Hasbro plans to introduce in February at the big annual Toy Fair in New York. 
"Their claims are totally without merit," says Stephen G. Shank, Tonka chief executive officer and president."It appears that Hasbro is just concerned that we have a line into the market before them." 
But Tonka executives recently told industry analysts that it plans to introduce a toy next year that will feature holographic technology, which uses laser light to produce three-dimensional images.Among Hasbro's current top sellers are its G.I. Joe and Transformers lines; Tonka has scored big sales recently with its Pound Puppies line. 
The Toy Fair is considered a crucial launching pad for new toys and games for the $12 billion industry.The suit asserts that "exclusivity for a concept at the Toy Fair can mean the difference between success and failure of an entire toy line." 
That market is in disorder as the computer industry undergoes a long-predicted consolidation.This year several big companies gave up on being independent suppliers of a broad line of computer systems: Control Data Corp. is now concentrating on certain niches; Sperry Corp. joined with Burroughs Corp. to form Unisys Corp., and Honeywell Inc. has decided to merge its computer operations with those of two big overseas computer makers. 
This year several big companies gave up on being independent suppliers of a broad line of computer systems: Control Data Corp. is now concentrating on certain niches; Sperry Corp. joined with Burroughs Corp. to form Unisys Corp., and Honeywell Inc. has decided to merge its computer operations with those of two big overseas computer makers.Today, Data General executives say, their company is in a select group that includes IBM, Digital and Hewlett-Packard Inc. as makers of a broad line of computer products for offices and factories. 
For example, General Electric Co. recently agreed to jointly sell a factory-automation system GE developed at its Schenectady, N.Y., turbine facility.While Data General continues to make a broad line of computers and software, it is focusing on fewer markets. 
GE is the 10th largest U.S. industrial company, and its $39.5 billion stock market value trails only International Business Machines and Exxon.Also, in an era that values stand-alone businesses and discounts conglomerates, GE has 14 major lines. 
Under the agreement, Apple can't challenge Franklin in court again until late next year.Currently, Franklin sells a line of Apple IIe- and IIc-compatible machines that it says don't violate Apple's patents. 
The company said it acquired 15 products with annual sales totaling less than $10 million and will market them in West Germany.Among them are a line of topical antirheumatics, which are products to ease arthritis-like pain, and a line of topical and oral acne treatments. 
The company said profit growth stemmed partly from a steady flow of products.In particular, it cited the strong performance of its Fibre Trim diet line. 
Such factors have led a number of Japanese concerns to seek U.S. production capabilities, most recently in semiconductors.The agreement should buttress Xerox's line of electronic typewriters. 
Xerox, which has never done high-volume manufacturing for another company, also should benefit because it will be able to use more of the capacity at its highly automated factory in Fremont, Calif.Brother, based in Nagoya, Japan, said the Xerox daisy-wheel printer will give it a faster, more powerful product than it now has in that line. 
In each year since 1961, he has turned out drawings for about 600 women's outfits, displayed in four separate collections.Unlike most high-fashion houses here, Yves Saint Laurent S.A. makes money on selling the fancy, expensive clothes Mr. Saint Laurent designs, as well as the more-accessible ready-to-wear lines. 
In the 1970s, Toshiba focused on integrated circuits for consumer goods, neglecting the industrial chips used in computers.By the time the company began making those chips, NEC and Hitachi Ltd. were so far ahead in memory chips that Toshiba considered dropping the line. 
He didn't set a timetable for the reduction.Asked at the meeting whether the company's increased leverage meant that Coca-Cola was "loading for bear," -- preparing for an acquisition -- Mr. Goizueta reiterated that any fresh acquisitions would be within the company's existing lines. 
American Cyanamid Co. said it is putting up for sale its fragrance and skin-care business, Jacqueline Cochran Inc.Cyanamid said the business, which includes the La Prairie skin-care line, is "a small part" of the Shulton consumer products segment it acquired in 1971. 
Eli Lilly & Co.'s Hybritech Inc. unit filed a patent infringement suit against Abbott Laboratories in a federal court in Los Angeles.Eli Lilly's unit claims in the suit that North Chicago, Ill.-based Abbott sells diagnostic kits that infringe on Hybritech's Tandem brand name line of testing products.Eli Lilly said the Hybritech line is based on a patented method of using monoclonal antibodies to detect pregnancy, cancer and infectious disease. 
Conoco is a unit of Wilmington, Del.-based Du Pont Co.BASF, a unit of BASF AG of West Germany, is a major supplier of private-brand antifreeze/coolant with annual sales of about $90 million to $100 million for that line. 
Bull makes and markets some Honeywell-model midsize computers outside the U.S.And Honeywell markets NEC's supercomputer line and Bull's networking know-how in the U.S. 
In 1985, Prince represented about 2% of Chesebrough's $2.7 billion in sales, and Bass accounted for about 6%.Unilever has said that its main interest in Chesebrough is the company's personal-care products, such as Vaseline and Q-Tips, and its food products, including the Ragu line. 
Details of the agreement weren't disclosed.A spokeswoman for the pharmaceutical concern said Syntex, which markets a full line of oral contraceptives in this country under its own name, entered the agreement with Rugby Laboratories Inc. in order to make use of excess manufacturing capacity. 
A spokeswoman for the pharmaceutical concern said Syntex, which markets a full line of oral contraceptives in this country under its own name, entered the agreement with Rugby Laboratories Inc. in order to make use of excess manufacturing capacity.The oral contraceptives Syntex will manufacture and sell to Rugby are identical to a line Syntex produces on which patent protection has expired, she added. 
Oak said the group it is acquiring from New York-based Electronic Technologies had revenue of $18.7 million in the fiscal year ended Sept. 30.Oak, which produces cable television equipment, previously said it was planning an acquisition program involving smaller additions to its current lines, and possibly larger purchases outside its current business. 
Unilever had already carefully studied Chesebrough as one of several possible acquisition targets in the U.S., Mr. Angus said.The company wanted Richardson-Vicks partly for its Oil of Olay line of skin products. 
Canada Dry reported a $2.3 million loss in 1986.The acquisition complements the international strengths of its Schweppes line of mixers, Cadbury said. 
Times Mirror -- which publishes the Los Angeles Times and other newspapers -- owns only one trade publication, a St. Louis-based magazine called Sporting Goods Dealer.But the company noted that it also owns several specialized publications and has been trying to expand that line. 
Many retailers reported tight inventories and few plans for big promotional sales in the weeks ahead.Higher-priced goods were the best sellers in lines ranging from toys to apparel, partly because, some retailers thought, of the new tax law, which will eliminate deductions for sales taxes beginning next year. 
She is one of several characters that together brought in $17.6 million in licensing fees to American Greetings in its fiscal 1986, ended last Feb. 28.The summary-trial jury decided for American Greetings in finding that there had been no intention for Mrs. Sargent to have commercial rights to the work she did for the company and that her 1977 work on so-called leader cards, which were part of the process of developing the Strawberry Shortcake line of greeting cards, wasn't original. 
Analysts said that some of its recently introduced toys give it a good chance of returning to profitability in 1987.In particular, Coleco's new StarCom toys -- male action figures that move via magnets and springs -- give "every indication of being one of the best new action lines this year," said David Liebowitz, an analyst with American Securities Corp. Other promising new products include a new line of talking Cabbage Patch Kids, a new board game named UBI and talking toys named Story-Telling Alf and Wisecracking Alf, Mr. Liebowitz added. 
It uses electrical pulses applied through electrode pads applied to a patient's back and chest, ZMI added.ZMI said the decision will result in Cardiac's being enjoined from making and selling its line of Pace Aid pacemakers. 
But other sources said the purchase may be completed by the end of the week.Revlon is also negotiating to license the Claude Montana fragrance line from Monteil, the sources said. 
You wouldn't write home about their profits."Ms. Hall also said that Revlon may be looking at other cosmetic lines that are currently up for sale.Some Wall Street sources are speculating that among those lines are pieces of Charles of the Ritz Group Ltd., recently purchased by Yves Saint Laurent International S.A. 
Some Wall Street sources are speculating that among those lines are pieces of Charles of the Ritz Group Ltd., recently purchased by Yves Saint Laurent International S.A.As previously reported, Paris-based Saint Laurent is selling the upscale Charles of the Ritz and Alexandra de Markoff brands, as well as less prestigious lines such as Jean Nate and Bain de Soleil. 
Mr. Richman doesn't expect big problems, and he promises improved profits over the next three to five years through steady, prudent growth.The company has a strong base: 15 of its domestic lines are No. 1 brands in their product categories. 
While trying to revive its consumer products business, it missed out on the frozen entree boom; frozen food is the fastest-growing packaged food area right now.The company tried a line of frozen cheese dinners that it quietly folded last year. 
But Kraft is trying again.It currently is testing a line of frozen entrees that include lasagna and several meat dishes. 
Some in the industry doubt whether Mr. Richman is up to the job.An attorney who joined Kraft's law department in 1954 after graduating from Harvard Law School, his background isn't in marketing, which is what's needed to pump new life into tired lines. 
An attorney who joined Kraft's law department in 1954 after graduating from Harvard Law School, his background isn't in marketing, which is what's needed to pump new life into tired lines.When he spoke to analysts last week in Florida, Mr. Richman was enthusiastic about line extensions, which are new versions of existing brands. 
But some analysts scoffed that he seemed to have just discovered a strategy that other food giants have used for years.A Kraft spokesman said, however, that no matter what other companies have done, Kraft still has room for line extensions because it hasn't used that strategy much. 
Coleco said Cabbage Patch Kids sales underwent a 62% decline in 1986 to about $230 million from $600 million a year earlier.Moreover, toys introduced by Coleco in 1986 -- including its Rambo, Furskins and Wrinkles lines of toys -- didn't do much to offset Coleco's declining sales. 
But Saint Laurent also is selling the Charles of the Ritz and Alexandra de Markoff brands, which are more prestigious.Aside from Saint Laurent products, the only significant line it is retaining is one called Gianni Versace. 
For fiscal 1986, Litton had net income of $71.1 million, or $2.52 a share, on sales of $4.52 billion.Litton didn't break out pre-tax profit by segment, although its Industrial Systems and Services line, of which the Resources group is part, had a loss of $30.5 million. 
More than half the Industrial Systems and Services revenue came from the oil-service business.Litton said it hasn't any plans to shed the petroleum services lines, and added that the venture with Dresser "represents an expansion of the business."Litton said the Atlas division of Dallas-based Dresser is involved with oil well logging (measuring) services that would complement Litton's current seismic exploration, reservoir description, core analysis and data interpretation lines. 
Hyundai Motor America said it raised the base price on its Excel subcompact car line an average of 2.1%. 
He said that for every quarter in which the FCC fails to make a decision, the company's earnings will be reduced.However, he said that even if the FCC didn't certify the readers, and the company was forced to eliminate the line, Checkpoint still wouldn't sustain a loss. 
Friday's close of $6.375, down 12.5 cents, indicates the market currently values the company at about $164 million, representing a loss in market value of $254 million since June.The company's losses are mainly the result of the costs of expansion, some poor performing merchandise lines and its entry in the Southwest market, where retailers are suffering from the ripple effects of the energy slump. 
Ross Stores said it will close 25 underperforming stores, mostly located in the depressed energy states, and open 10 new stores in other existing markets.Charges related to the closures and to discontinued merchandise lines will result in a pre-tax fourth period charge of $40 million, the company said. 
Bally's drive into the hotel-casino industry has made health clubs an increasingly awkward fit, analysts said, and thus the most likely candidate for divestiture.By shedding the health-club line, Bally could focus on its remaining operations -- gambling machines, state lotteries and amusement centers. 
The charge produced a big loss in 1984.And some investors, nervous that health clubs also are a fad business, question whether Bally isn't building up a line that could collapse just as quickly. 
BRIEFS: University of Louisville President Donald Swain becomes the first university president to head a local chamber of commerce. . . .White chocolate is one of three flavors offered in Neiman-Marcus's chocolate-flavored toothpaste line. 
For a short time, they will donate a few cents from each sale to a charity.But Scott Paper Co. has carried the idea further by creating a line of seven products, a portion of whose sales always go to charity. 
After six months in tests in the Western U.S., Scott says Helping Hand is on target, having contributed $600,000 of its first-year goal of $1 million."We're able to afford the donations because of the marketing efficiencies of advertising the entire line as one brand," says Don Dietrich, a Scott executive. 
It cited Tyco's Double Dough Doer and Flower Makin' Basket extrusion toys.Also named in the suit was Glad Inc., a closely held New York company that Kenner Parker said helped design Tyco's line. 
Mr. Young, Hewlett-Packard's chief executive, said, "Our goal is to manage expenses so that they grow at a slower rate than revenue, while maintaining our commitment to new-product development and support."Hewlett-Packard has said it will ship a newly designed line of business minicomputers, its models 930 and 950, during the second half of calendar 1987, a deadline being closely watched by investors and customers alike. 
Net income in the year-earlier period included a tax credit of $20.6 million.Mattel has said that lower domestic demand for its Masters of the Universe line of toys was one factor troubling the company in 1986. 
Kodak even launched its own blimp in Japan to counter Fuji's green blimp that flies at special events in the U.S.Fuji has upstaged Kodak in the past, most notably in 1983 when it introduced a new line of films shortly before Kodak unveiled its new film. 
The unit had 1986 sales of about $362 million.The third main line of the wholesale distribution group, Amfac Health Care, which distributes pharmaceuticals, "has turned the corner toward profitability," the company said. 
Terms of the sale by the Baker Oil Tools Inc. unit to Trico, a maker of petroleum industry equipment, weren't disclosed.Baker International has said, however, that it expects proceeds from sale of the pump business and of Baker's tricone rock bit line to total as much as $75 million.A Baker spokesman said that the drilling bit line is "substantially larger" than the pump business, and that discussions with "several interested parties" about the drilling bit operation are continuing. 
A Baker spokesman said that the drilling bit line is "substantially larger" than the pump business, and that discussions with "several interested parties" about the drilling bit operation are continuing.As previously reported, the Justice Department had warned that it would sue to block the proposed merger unless the two Baker lines were sold. 
Moreover, the new AT&T machines come as many manufacturers -- led by Compaq -- are moving to a new generation of machines based on the far more powerful Intel 80386 microchip.AT&T's new machines, priced from $3,045 to $5,795 depending on features, aren't much cheaper than the IBM line and don't use AT&T's Unix operating system, which it has been pushing as a new industry standard. 
A Polaroid spokesman said the Cambridge, Mass.-based company sold 4.3 million instant cameras last year, an 800,000 increase from 1985, and that sales of the company's new Spectra camera, introduced in April, accounted for the bulk of the increase."Spectra was the big gun in terms of (the increase in camera) units sold, and Spectra sold for more money than our other camera lines," he said. 
Fixed-income funds should attract the lion's share of sales but some say by a lower margin than past years because of low rates.NEW TOYS ABOUND, many of them high tech, as fantasy lines decline. 
"This year is likely to see a record number of new products from the major companies," says analyst David Liebowitz of American Securities Corp.One reason: the peaking of several important toy lines, including Cabbage Patch dolls, Transformers and Masters of the Universe. 
Results also were depressed somewhat by the timing of the completion last November of VF's acquisition of Blue Bell Holding Co., which had the effect of incorporating seasonally depressed December sales of some Blue Bell units.VF's own jeans line, the Lee brand, also experienced some sluggishness. 
SYSTEM SOFTWARE ASSOCIATES INC. said it completed its initial offering of 1,357,100 common shares at $13 each.The Chicago-based company develops, markets and supports an integrated line of business application software for certain International Business Machines Corp. computers. 
These divisions include Bassett Walker, a maker of sweat suits and related apparel; Vanity Fair, a lingerie maker; and Modern Globe, an underwear maker.Mr. Pugh said VF has completed its integration of Blue Bell's apparel operations and now is working on "reestablishing the identity" of the Wrangler jeans brand while continuing to expand market share for Rustler, Blue Bell's other jeans line. 
Reebok's chief financial officer attributed the activity to positive reaction to the company's products at a sporting goods trade show over the weekend."Some skepticism that might have existed about the company's ability to keep (growth) going was removed by the positive response to our footwear and our apparel line," he said. 
The group makes hydraulic devices, largely for use in road equipment, and material-handling machinery used in airports.Whittaker is involved in a restructuring program designed to help the company focus on its technology and chemicals lines. 
Saturn has its own engineering, design and marketing staffs.Similarly, 3M Co. allows its employees to spend as much as 15% of their time on independent development projects, one of which became the phenomenally successful line of "Post-it" products. 
Now, in what Mrs. Medrich calls "that wonderful American phenomenon where a small idea gets institutionalized by the establishment," traditional chocolate purveyors are rushing to get on the bandwagon.See's Candy Shops, a San Francisco-based chain whose logo is a grandmotherly white-haired woman added a truffle line last year and plans to expand it. 
But a counter trend may be setting in.Campbell's Godiva unit, the brand that started it all, has introduced a more American line. 
AT&T expects that its cost-cutting program won't begin producing results until at least next year.Chairman James Olson said that vital to the firm's growth are long-distance service and its computer line. 
The broad claims made by the patent holders in the two current disputes have stirred criticism."You just don't patent a whole product," says Alan Shugart, chairman of Seagate Technology, which has just unveiled a line of 3 1/2-inch drives and which freely trades its patents on specific parts of older 5 1/4-inch drives. 
It declined to elaborate.The maker of medical diagnostic tests and instruments said the restructuring is designed to enhance its position in the immunodiagnostics markets, and to reduce its emphasis on some clinical chemistry products by discontinuing certain lines. 
Digital Equipment Corp., as expected, introduced two low-priced computers in its VAX line. 
But longer term, the stripped-down model should "generate more business for big machines."The model 14se is a single-processor version of the Cray X-MP line and comes with four million words of memory, equivalent to about 34,000 kilobytes. 
Some analysts suggest that Puma might have been putting too much emphasis on Mr. Becker; his court performances were showing signs of being the prime mover in Puma stock trading last year.Still, Puma is gearing up its Becker campaign this year by installing "Boris Becker Shops" in 1,000 U.S. retail sports stores, featuring the complete line of Puma's tennis and casual wear. 
Sales for U.S. Sears stores open more than one year grew only 2.7%.New York-based J.C. Penney Co.'s comparable-store sales dropped 2.4%, in part because of its strategy of phasing out less profitable lines, such as sportings goods, said Jeffrey Edelman, an analyst for Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. 
Digital Equipment is expected to unveil next week low-cost computers and workstations in its popular VAX line. 
That's right, Israeli.This spring, Americans will get their first taste of a line of 25 gourmet food and beverage products made by several different companies in Israel but all marketed under the newly created brand name Betavon. 
While competitors are impressed with the stylish new Chevrolet Corsica and Beretta compacts, GM officials concede that half their sales could come at the expense of other GM compacts.Meanwhile, GM won't launch its line of aerodynamic midsized cars until the fall. 
Digital Equipment Corp. is expected next week to unveil low-priced computers and workstations in its popular VAX line that will make the company much more competitive with other makers of engineering computers. 
She said many customers who use larger Digital systems also will buy the low-priced VAX computers because they can run the same software the larger systems do.Digital said it has scheduled a news conference in Boston for next Tuesday to announce "two new major additions to" its VAX line. 
-- The Proton Saga.This Malaysian-built compact is to be the second car line imported by Global Motors. 
Most people would stay away from it."Mr. Nordmann also suggested that American Home probably would be better off buying a company with a stronger prescription-drug line and more patents. 
TRW also said it received a record volume of contract awards last year.In late 1985, TRW began a restructuring that involved selling businesses -- mainly aircraft parts and industrial products -- with annual sales of about $800 million, pruning back remaining lines to their most profitable products and a general cost-reduction effort. 
Net for the year rose 57% to $202.5 million, or $4.36 a share.That compares with the prior year's $129.1 million, or $2.68 a share, which included $5.9 million of profit from discontinued lines and a $3 million gain from the sale of much of the Formica brand products group's business. 
An Oscar Mayer spokesman said the status of the employees hasn't been determined.Cargill's accord follows an industry trend in which the big packers are expanding into the meat lines that are being abandoned by less efficient operators. 
Ball also said the venture should have a "positive impact" on future earnings.The venture will manufacture Ball's consumer glass products, including its home canning line, but only Ball will sell them. 
In composite American Stock Exchange trading, Atari shares closed at $20.125, up 12.5 cents.Industry analysts say the company's strong performance indicates its ST line of computers is establishing itself in the crowded PC marketplace.Introduced in 1985, the ST machines, which aren't compatible with any other line of PCs, are garnering a large enough user base, analysts said, to induce software writers to create programs for the computers. 
Mattel says it has the exclusive right to call its toys "slime," and is seeking to enjoin Hasbro from using the name and an unspecified amount in punitive damages.Mattel introduced its self-described "glop" in 1976, then repacked the unctuous matter a few years ago as "Slime Pit," which it sold as an accessory to its Masters of the Universe line of toys. 
In addition, DeBartolo has a seven-year option giving it rights of first refusal on the sale of Jordan Marsh-New England, The Bon, and Jordan Marsh-Florida.These lines, and the Stern's department store chain, would be the only remaining assets of Allied, if Ann Taylor and Brooks Brothers were sold. 
In contrast, domestic manufacturers have offered a wide variety of dealer and consumer incentives over the last several years to spur sales overall as well as on specific slow-selling models.General Motors Corp., Ford Motor Co. and Chrysler Corp. are currently offering customer rebates or low-interest financing on many car lines. 
Stratus Computer Inc. introduced a more powerful line of fault-tolerant computers designed to rapidly handle many transactions from distant terminals. 
Stratus computers are used by many brokerage firms and stock exchanges to handle securities quotes and customer accounts data.Stratus said the new XA2000 line includes five systems with prices from $261,000 to $1.1 million. 
Kimberly-Clark attributed most of the increase to lower research, advertising, promotion and selling expenses.The company said the 1985 fourth-quarter research expenses were "abnormally high" because of work on a new line of thin, superabsorbent Huggies-brand diapers, launched in 1986, and other feminine and personal care products. 
The new computer is part of Hewlett-Packard's attempts to refit the internal architecture of its new computers to make them much more powerful.The Spectrum line has been under development for five years at a cost of more than $250 million, in what the company calls the largest project it has ever undertaken. 
The Toledo plant is one of the older operating auto plants in the country, with some of the buildings dating back to the turn of the century.As is the case in Wisconsin, AMC is seeking some help from state government in financing the Toledo project in part because it has been incurring high costs to start up production of a new line of mid-sized cars at a new plant in Bramalea, Ontario. 
However, continuing strength of the VHS video format and the introduction of VHS-C, a popular compact system backed by such major companies as General Electric Co.'s RCA Corp. unit and Zenith Electronics Corp., have slowed the momentum of 8-mm.Kodak denied that it planned to discontinue the line, but some industry analysts indicated the move was likely. 
Mr. Buckner said ETA could produce perhaps $60 million in revenue this year, but probably no profit before 1989.Despite intense competitive pressures on the company's mainframe and data-storage products businesses, Mr. Price said Control Data intends to retain both lines. 
Computer Memories officials couldn't be reached for comment.In July, the company said it had stopped production and had hired investment bankers to either sell the company or acquire other lines. 
The Boeing Commercial spokesman said that the company now is concentrating on a two-aisle, 150-seat configuration for the 7J-7.The proposed 100-seat 737 model, being a derivative of the current line of aircraft, could be ready to fly years earlier. 
Buick, Oldsmobile, and Pontiac announced discounts of up to $1,200 on options.Those programs last through April 30, and cover about 73% of Buick's line, 84% of Oldsmobile's, and 92% of Pontiac's. 
GM, on the other hand, had too much capacity, which became a drag on earnings last year.Ford's performance also was fueled by the success of its new Taurus and Sable line of midsized cars. 
It expanded in the U.S. last year by buying Canada Dry and Sunkist drinks from RJR Nabisco Inc. and acquiring a 30% stake in closely held Dr Pepper Co. Ironically, General Cinema once owned Sunkist but sold it in 1984 to R.J. Reynolds, since renamed RJR Nabisco.General Cinema is primarily a Pepsi-Cola bottler in the U.S. but it also handles Dr Pepper and Sunkist lines. 
Jack Nicklaus's problems reflect the hazards many athletes face as they try to turn their sports careers into financial security.The entrance to Golden Bear's headquarters in North Palm Beach is distinctive, adorned with golf clubs and bags, photos of Mr. Nicklaus in action, his signature clothing lines and the golfer's books (in English, French and Japanese). 
International Business Machines Corp. unveiled two models in its Sierra mainframe line and increased the power of its existing mainframes, while cutting prices on some of those units. 
Reebok has stayed hot by continually expanding its product line.Although the company initially depended solely on soft-leather aerobic shoes in flashy, pastel colors, it introduced men's basketball shoes in early 1986, a line of men's and women's sportswear in the spring and a new line of children's nonathletic shoes called Weeboks last fall. 
That gave Reebok about 15% (unit volume) of the U.S. basketball shoe market in 1986, making it third after Nike Inc. and Converse Inc., according to Smart Inc., a market research firm.Reebok said, however, that the woman's basketball shoe it introduced in March wasn't as successful as the men's line. 
Sales of the company's children's athletic shoes also rose sharply, as did running-shoe sales, despite sluggishness in that industry.Sales of Reebok's apparel line -- including tennis wear, aerobic and fitness clothing introduced in March -- added slightly more than $40 million to 1986 sales. 
The Diamond Star assembly plant in Normal, Ill., is scheduled for completion in the spring of 1988.The company said it will introduce a new line of passenger cars in the 1989 model year. 
Hewlett-Packard Co., in a bid to boost market share for its redesigned line of minicomputers, said it lopped 28% off the price of its recently introduced HP 9000 Model 840 technical workstations. 
Hewlett-Packard said it cut 28% off the price of its recently introduced Model 840 technical workstation, an auspicious move for its redesigned line of minicomputers. 
But IBM also had some problems that it could have addressed.IBM said sales were disappointing for its midrange computer lines, which have been criticized for being incompatible, and it said sales were flat in personal computers, where imitators have managed to undercut IBM's prices. 
Just yesterday, Maynard, Mass.-based Digital Equipment Corp. announced that it entered the mainframe market with products clearly aimed at IBM.Analysts also say that IBM products to address its problems with its midrange and personal computer lines won't help until at least the second half, and possibly not until next year. 
Intermedics' fourth-quarter loss from continuing operations was $22.1 million, compared with a year-ago loss from continuing operations of $13.3 million.For the year, Intermedics posted a loss from continuing operations of $17.7 million, compared with a loss from continuing lines of $19.6 million a year earlier. 
It hasn't been very successful so far in getting orders for its telecommunications equipment, and last year it lost an important order for telephone switches in Japan to Northern Telecom Ltd., the Canadian telecommunications equipment company.Separately, AT&T said it is cutting prices between 12% and 17% on its PC 6300 personal computers, the second time it has cut prices on machines in that line in the last six months. 
The company isn't expected to contract for production of any more Unix PCs this year because the machine hasn't sold well.Sales of the 6300 line also have been below expectations recently. 
Johnson, meantime, hasn't been sitting by idly.It recently developed two line extensions -- a baby conditioner and conditioning formula shampoo -- to appeal to older children. 
Minnetonka Inc. said it and its West German partner agreed to sell the unprofitable Check-Up toothpaste line. 
Minnetonka has operated the Check-Up business in a joint venture with Henkel Corp., the U.S. subsidiary of Henkel KGaA, Dusseldorf, West Germany.Minnetonka introduced the Check-Up line with much fanfare in 1984; it was the first toothpaste introduced in the U.S. with a pump. 
Amdahl, a mainframe maker, yesterday reported that fourth-quarter net income doubled on a 31% revenue rise.Amdahl expects its 1987 revenue to grow more than 15% -- compared with little or no growth for the overall mainframe market -- because of a new line of computers. 
Computer Associates has grown rapidly by focusing on a part of the software market called systems utilities, which let data processing centers manage their operations more efficiently.It has also made a series of acquisitions to broaden its line of business software, adding such products as a spreadsheet and a word processor. 
Anyway, "the standard now exists independently of IBM," suggests Rod Canion, Compaq president.As these companies see it, the IBM PC line of computers is by now so entrenched and so much software has been written for it, that even if IBM were to stop making computers tomorrow others would pick up the IBM standard. 
Kirk Roden, sales manager at the MicroAge store in Berkeley, Calif., says industry rumors have IBM altering the keyboard, the graphics and perhaps the basic operations of the 386 chip, which might require a different operating system.IBM might make these proprietary features hard to duplicate, if only because it has taken a beating from low-priced clones that copied its PC line. 
The company's new lines of high-fiber, low-cholesterol muffins, which were introduced last summer, "look good," said Mr. Bryan.The muffins are among several lines of new products the company is testing that fit its expansion into products that are "convenient and perceived as being good for you," Mr. Bryan said.For example, Sara Lee plans to offer a new line of French bread this spring or summer, he said. 
But the new lines of health-conscious products don't mean that Sara Lee will abandon its sugary cakes and rolls; the sweeter products are selling well too, he added.Unit volume of Sara Lee's meat lines, including its Jimmy Dean sausage and biscuit products, rose 6% in the quarter, "on the low side of the increases we've been running," said Mr. Bryan. 
Wang Laboratories Inc. introduced three minicomputers to fill a gap in the middle of its computer line. 
Drew Peck, analyst for Gartner Securities, predicts Intel will earn $58 million, or 50 cents a share, for the year, on revenue of $1.5 billion.Mr. Peck said Intel should begin seeing benefits from cost cuts made last year, and he expects a strong showing from the microprocessor lines. 
All American's Budget Gourmet brand has within three years captured 13.5% of the $3 billion frozen single-dish market.And it has grabbed 6.6% of the $1 billion frozen dinner market with a line launched only last January. 
The result, he says: "Fairly easy pickings."Budget Gourmet has found a niche between Campbell's expensive Le Menu line and its cheaper but lower-quality Swanson TV dinners.New production facilities help keep costs down, and All American goes another step by skipping Le Menu's plastic plates or the boil-in bags used by Nestle's Stouffer's line. 
Terms weren't disclosed.Maytag, which makes kitchen appliances and laundry products, said it sold Toastmaster, which makes small appliances, to focus on its core lines. 
In Troy, Mich., a K mart Corp. spokesman said Toys "R" Us's cuts may affect the No. 2 retailer."You're certainly not going to sit there with higher-priced items," he said of K mart, a major competitor of Toys "R" Us in toy lines. 
Yet rivals Amdahl and National Semiconductor are expected to boost shipments of IBM-compatible mainframes to a combined 500 machines from only 100 last year, cutting into IBM's sales of the multimillion-dollar systems.And IBM's new and much-ballyhooed line of midrange systems, where it has been hurting most, won't be shipped in big quantities until the second half. 
Tommy Thompson, Wisconsin's newly elected Republican governor, said yesterday that Chrysler also would invest an amount that he didn't disclose, if AMC begins its renovation plan.An AMC spokesman said that the auto maker needs help from Wisconsin to finance the venture in large part because it has been bearing significant costs to get under way production this year of a new line of Renault-designed, midsized cars at a new plant in Bramalea, Ontario. 
He said he's "cautiously optimistic" about getting legislative approval for the financing.He said Jan. 25 is the deadline for such approval and for AMC to convince state officials that the company can develop the new Jeep line. 
Cooper, a maker of tools and compression and drilling equipment, declined to disclose the value of the transaction.Cooper said the purchase of Sutorbilt Corp. and DuroFlow Corp. will complement its line of blowers, air compressors and pumps. 
What those fans have been watching is the latest video made by a professional sports team: the Browns' "Masters of the Gridiron."Although the team's loss to the Denver Broncos Sunday has already hurt sales of the 17-minute film, the video has earned a reputation as the strangest production in a line of videos that began last year with the Chicago Bears' "Super Bowl Shuffle." 
New York Telephone and its ad agency, Young & Rubicam Inc., have gone the furthest in pitching "brands" of calls.The phone company says that the ads' creators even borrowed ideas from greeting cards to compile its extensive brand line. 
Bayly Corp. said it signed a licensing agreement to make and market Cherokee Group's line of men's and boys' apparel. 
Bayly Corp. said it signed a licensing agreement to make and market Cherokee Group's line of men's and boys' apparel.James Argyropoulos, chairman and chief executive officer of North Hollywood, Calif.-based Cherokee, said Bayly will pay his company a 5% royalty on net sales of the line. 
More recently, several other leading tire producers also have narrowed their activities.As a result of a takeover effort by Sir James Goldsmith, the Anglo-French financier, industry leader Goodyear Tire & Rubber Co. is selling aerospace, wheel manufacturing, real estate and energy lines. 
Among its firsts: low-fat milk, introduced in Britain in 1981.Sainsbury isn't alone; retailer Marks & Spencer PLC's St. Michael brand may be Britain's most popular label, adorning food, clothing, bedding and a new line of classical recordings. 
Whittaker Corp. said it completed the sale of its health maintenance organization line to Travelers Corp. for a total of $48 million. 
West Point-Pepperell said Cluett, Peabody & Co., an apparel concern acquired in January 1986, contributed $193 million to sales and $2.9 million to net income.Cluett's contribution came primarily from its shirt and hosiery group, while performance in other lines -- including tailored clothing and childrens wear -- was less robust reflecting softer retail demand. 
As with other types of liability insurance, an extended price war among writers of coverage for directors and officers helped to make the business unprofitable over the past few years.And even more than in other lines, claims ballooned far beyond expectations. 
Also, the company will launch a number of major new products or push existing products into new markets, he said.The Stouffer Foods unit recently introduced a line of frozen complete dinners under the name Dinner Supreme.Previously, Stouffer Foods offered many entrees, including the Lean Cuisine low-calorie line, but didn't have complete dinners. 
The division is planning to add fender extensions and make other styling changes on the 1988 model of the Eldorado; the changes are intended to make the car look less like related Buick and Oldsmobile models.Yesterday's action will give GM "more distinction between car lines," Mr. Hoglund said. 
A closer look at Lukens illustrates differences as well as similarities with big steel.A medium-sized specialty steelmaker, Lukens has carved out a modestly profitable niche churning out an expansive line of a single product-steel plates -- in addition to some products for the electrical equipment and construction markets. 
Mr. Smith said that "delivering high quality products" eventually would prove to Wall Street and the public that "what we did was right."At his news conference, Mr. Smith also was peppered with questions from local reporters about whether the Wisconsin Investment Board's stance regarding the Perot affair would affect whether GM commits to producing a new line of pickup trucks at the company's Janesville, Wis., facility. 
Those stakes, IBM said yesterday, have been sold back to the companies' shareholders; IBM wouldn't elaborate.IBM said it formed the instruments unit in 1980 as a way to sell computers to analytical laboratories, but later found computer sales fared well without having to sell the instruments line. 
These smaller retailers are adept at exploiting the new consumer niches because they offer depth in a narrow range of products, such as toys or appliances.Many general merchandisers -- Mobil Corp.'s Montgomery Ward & Co. and J.C. Penney Co., for example -- have responded by dropping some products to concentrate on fewer lines. 
The amount wasn't disclosed.Augat disclosed it recently purchased the complete modular connector line of Compagnie Teletechnique Moderne S.A. of Paris. 
In the first nine months of 1986, the division had operating profit of $43.3 million on sales of $522 million.Much of that improved profit picture was because of the company's success with its DeKuyper schnapps line. 
NCR Corp. plans to unveil today a line of computer systems for retailers that incorporate recent advances in design intended to prevent system failures. 
Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Co.'s 300 Super Fresh Food Markets, which trimmed wages but gave workers some say in running stores and bonuses when sales revenues increase, are "the most successful part of our company," says A&P Vice President Michael Rourke.A&P recently converted stores to the Super Fresh line in Minnesota, Maryland, Virginia and Washington, D.C. 
Trico said that upon signing of a definitive agreement, it will withdraw the "poison pill" shareholder rights plan it adopted last month.A Paccar spokesman said the company thinks Trico's operations will make "a good fit" with the company's current lines. 
Valtek, based in Springville, Utah, manufactures automatic control valves and valve actuators for the chemical process industry.These products complement Duriron's line of valves, pumps and filtration equipment. 
Esquire Magazine Group's remaining unit, the press and video division, was acquired by a group of shareholders, including its management.The division publishes books and produces a line of how-to videocassettes. 
A few will be wildly successful -- but far more will fail."Commercial toy companies might introduce a total of about 40 lines a year," says Henry Orenstein, the owner of Toy Builders, which develops toy ideas and advises toy makers. 
"At least 25% of the rest will be flops."Crystal Starr is the central character in a line of dolls called "Moondreamers," which Hasbro has spent two years developing. 
The illustrator suggested a cast of characters called "Moon Beamers," who live in "Starry Up" and send dreams full of fun and adventure to children on earth.A line of mini-doll characters is hardly unique.Kenner Parker Toys' Strawberry Shortcake and similar lines sold by rival toy companies have been around for several years. 
The toy maker also decided to aim the doll at little girls; thus, all but one of the original story's male characters were changed to females."You don't sell (a line of) little boys to girls," explains Roseann Radosevich, design director for dolls at Hasbro. (But Bucky Buckaroo, a space cowboy, remained male to add an element of romance.) 
From start to finish, the costumes took eight months to complete in bulk.Finally, confident it had a winner after nearly a year of development, Hasbro gave a sneak preview of the five-doll line to four top toy retailers in September 1985. 
Encouraged, Hasbro marketers and designers went back to the drawing board.They enlarged the line to nine dolls to give it more variety. 
About 59,200 fewer shares were outstanding in fiscal 1986.The 1986 results reflect significant declines in sales of wood finishes and maintenance and marine coatings, but a "strong performance" by the coatings lines Valspar acquired from Mobil Corp. in 1984, Mr. Wurtele said. 
Beatrice Cos. purchased Ozarka in Texas, Arrowhead in California and Great Bear in the Northeast and now is the nation's largest bottled water company.And McKesson Corp., the nation's second-largest water bottler, is considering adding a sparkling water to its still water lines. 
Tonka Corp. said Hasbro Inc. has dropped its suit challenging Tonka's new SuperNaturals holographic toys.As previously reported, Pawtucket, R.I.-based Hasbro, a toy and game maker, and New York-based Abrams/Gentile Entertainment Inc., accused Tonka of misappropriating information about a "secret" concept for a toy line. 
For example, although Hasbro, the biggest toy maker, also markets board games and other "gender-neutral" items, it organizes its biggest sellers strictly along sex-role lines.Its wholesale catalog features a Girls Toys line that includes Real Baby and Get in Shape, Girl! exercise kits.The Boys Toys line includes Transformers and Inhumanoids -- small, hard-plastic characters that in a dollhouse might be considered dolls but in an imaginary war zone are known as "action figures." 
Moreover, the Fed said that even if such commercial paper activity were covered by the Glass-Steagall Act, banks wouldn't be considered to be violating the law, which prohibits them from being "engaged principally" in underwriting securities, so long as they follow certain guidelines.The guidelines, spelled out in the Fed's decision, are designed to ensure that the securities activities are "only an insubstantial line of activity." 
Creative Black Book publishes a directory of creative services used primarily by art directors in advertising agencies and by television producers.Macmillan, which is involved in educational publishing and information services, said it purchased the directory to extend "the line of informational products targeted to the advertising industry." 
A Seagram spokesman said, "We don't comment on rumors."The company is said to be interested in selling certain of its domestic brands, which include Taylor California Cellars, Taylor Wine Co. of New York, Paul Masson, Gold Seal Vineyards, the Monterey Vineyard line and Sterling Vineyards. 
Caesars World Inc. is betting it has a nose for upscale fragrances.The hotel and casino operator said its merchandising subsidiary has retained Roth/Horner & Associates, a Beverly Hills, Calif., concern that designed and marketed the successful Giorgio perfume line, to develop a new line of men's and women's fragrances. 
Mr. Sobel said these products, to appear on the market in the next eight months, will initially be sold at retail shops at the company's seven resorts, and then by direct mail.Caesars said it hopes eventually to have a complete line of toiletries, including soaps, shampoos and other products. 
Not all manufacturers are relying on productivity improvements to strengthen their positions.Parker Manufacturing Corp., for one, is adding a flashier, "high-fashion" look to its traditional line of conservatively styled costume jewelry. 
Rubbermaid Inc. said it agreed with analysts' projections that it will earn 95 cents a share to 96 cents a share in 1986, compared with 79 cents a share last year.Last year, the maker of household and commercial products, toys and other lines earned $57.1 million on sales of $671.4 million. 
He said that analysts' projections that the company was purchased for $30 million are "in the ballpark."However, he says he expects 30% of sales each year will come from new products -- defined as products developed internally that weren't part of Rubbermaid's line five years earlier, and not including line extensions, which merely modify style or design. 
Among the new products Rubbermaid is introducing are modular home office products, just now being shipped, and molded outdoor furniture, under the new brand name Sundial, which will be introduced in early 1987.Mr. Gault said orders for both lines are "very encouraging." 
Mr. Gault said orders for both lines are "very encouraging."Rubbermaid is in the process of expanding its international business beyond the housewares lines that now make up the bulk of it and it is moving into new territories. 
"The only way to go is up."RECENTLY, Lister Butler designed a paper bag decorated with an "aristocratic" ribbon and gold coat of arms to launch a line of deluxe candy from Nestle. 
"The premium segment belongs more to Pepperidge Farm."AWARE OF such pitfalls, marketers are closely monitoring consumer reaction to expensive line extensions. 
In year ended June 30, Lear earned $55.5 million, or $3.02 a share, compared with $100.7 million, or $5.51 a share, the year earlier.Sales rose to $2.46 billion from $2.37 billion, but the company's aerospace business and its Piper Aircraft business-plane line performed poorly. 
The unit prospered last year from the now-past fad for safari clothes and accessories.Others wonder whether Gap, which enjoyed a startling turnaround two years ago after hiring marketing expert Millard S. Drexler, may have made a misstep when it recently moved away from some of the lines that brought it out of obscurity. 
The complaint alleges that Guinness forced Renfield to be acquired by Mr. Riklis, who controls Schenley.The suit says Guinness did this to pay Mr. Riklis back for his purported assistance during Guinness's 1986 takeover of Distillers Co. According to the suit, Mr. Riklis was able to buy Renfield "at a price far less than its fair market value" because Guinness allegedly had already promised to switch the U.S. distributorship of its Gordon's gin and vodka line to Schenley from Renfield. 
The drug also is being tested for its possible benefits in treating gum disease.Upjohn is also testing a new line of drugs called lazaroids, which in animal tests appear to slow deterioration of tissue surrounding a traumatic wound. 
Mr. Max, who once designed costumes for the Soviet Union's Kirov Ballet, attended design school in New York and worked for Tahari Ltd., a New York designer, before moving to Los Angeles.His lines, which include short skirts and dress and jacket ensembles in soft knits, are now in many major department stores. 
A similar story is being played out in San Francisco.Four years ago, David Weinstein, now 39, launched a line of simple, loose-fitting, casual cotton clothing called CP Shades.The line is now in 30 department stores across the country, and wholesale revenue was $40 million in 1986. 
Mr. Weinstein got his start in the apparel business 15 years ago by opening a store called Fresh Pants, also in San Francisco.He sold dyed T-shirts, sweat shirts and painters pants, but problems with quality eventually convinced him that he should design and manufacture his own line of clothing. 
Some companies say their sales might be higher if they were in New York.San Francisco-born Eletra Casadei, 34, designs evening dresses, sportswear and a line of party gowns called TD4 ("To die for"), which are inspired by rock videos. 
But Gap's apparel hasn't been selling to the older crowd as well as it has in the past.And in deemphasizing its teen-age customers, Gap didn't promote its back-to-school lines as heavily as it usually has, hurting August sales. 
I imagine a tough decision like this from the ITC will remind them of the sensitivity of this issue in the U.S."The importation ban covers Samsung's line of dynamic random access memory chips, known as DRAMs, as well as computers, facsimile machines and certain telecommunications equipment and printers if they contain chips that infringe Texas Instruments patents. 
A federal judge, barely masking his mirth, dismissed a copyright-infringement and unjust-enrichment suit brought by two toy-animal designers against Hasbro Inc. and Walt Disney Co.The suit, filed by Joanne Bloom and Renee Scelia, alleged that the "Wuzzles" toy line introduced by Hasbro and Disney in 1985 infringed on their characters called "Whats." 
Consider Dean's knockoff of the Popsicle produced by Gold Bond Ice Cream Co. of Green Bay, Wis.When other companies brought out a private-label Popsicle line, supermarkets asked Dean for another version. 
Ohio Art Co. said it will stop distributing Britains Petite Ltd.'s line of typewriters, sewing machines, cash registers and other toys, effective Jan. 1. 
Last year, Petite toys represented about 9% of Ohio Art's $47.4 million in sales.The Bryan, Ohio, maker of toys and the Etch A Sketch drawing device said Petite, a United Kingdom toy maker, plans to handle the distribution and marketing of its own line, beginning next year. 
Brockway had previously been the No. 2 producer.Owens-Illinois had been diversifying in recent years but, faced with a threat to its major line, it became determined to expand in glass containers, sources said. 
Ford Motor Co. announced tentative base-price increases, many of them in the 4%-to-6% range, on the 1988 models it's currently shipping to dealers.The price increases cover nearly 70% of the company's car lines, and a spokesman said the auto maker will announce prices on the remaining products in the next few months. 
Chemical has a major acquisition pending of Horizon Bancorp., New Jersey's fifth-largest bank holding company.By deciding to sell its Cleveland-based Chemical Financial Services Corp. unit, Chemical is signaling its desire to have a full-service retail banking presence in the regions where it does business, not merely one line of service, analysts said. 
In 1987, it expects to sell 750,000 vehicles here compared with 550,000 in Japan.Honda is forecasting that about 100,000 of those U.S. sales will be from its Acura division, up from 52,869 in 1986 when it introduced the luxury line. 
The U.S. unit of Sony Corp. of Japan introduced a line of portable audio products designed for children. 
The company sold 184,378 cars in the U.S. in the first eight months of this year.Hyundai introduced its line, all versions of a subcompact called the Excel, in the U.S. in February 1986. 
A strike in Canada could hamper production because the company's U.S. plants depend on parts and assembly work done at Canadian facilities.Chrysler has scheduled overtime at its St. Louis No. 2 plant, which builds the company's popular minivan models, and at its Kenosha No. 1 plant in Wisconsin, which builds the Dodge Diplomat, Plymouth Gran Fury and the luxury Fifth Avenue lines. 
Houdaille made machine tools, largely ordered by manufacturers late in the year.But like many other Big Board-listed concerns, Houdaille eventually diversified its lines. 
"We begin to get orders each year in the spring," asserts a Rauch official.Professional traders move in to buy the shares in February, if they hear good reports of the new Christmas line displayed at trade shows. 
They include several types of missiles, and, not coincidentally, Japan now is focusing its defense research on developing its own missiles -- potential competitors to the U.S.-made Stinger, Sidewinder and Harpoon.U.S. trade officials say Japan has gone a step further, using technology bought in connection with U.S. arms purchases to broaden its lines of commercial aircraft. 
Its main defense products are radar and heat-seeking missile decoys and communications systems for anti-submarine warfare.Its commercial lines include electronic microscopes and fuses for industrial and electronics products. 
Together they provide the functions of IBM's new PS/2 Model 30, Mr. Campbell said.Mr. Campbell expects that Chips & Technologies will come out with chip sets mimicking the capabilities of other, higher-performance models in IBM's PS/2 line "by the end of the year." 
The first machine is designed for multiple simultaneous users via separate terminals in an office network, the second for use by a few scientists or engineers.The new MicroVAX models are likely to provide strong competition for IBM's 9370 line introduced last year -- and internally identified as the "VAX-killer." 
Kenneth Olsen, president of Digital, played down the IBM challenge saying, "We never thought they needed an answer."However, other Digital executives said the new products work as fast as a midrange 9370 but are priced below the bottom of the IBM line. 
It lost nearly $50 million over the past four years, and its market value was decimated.In January, as Activision struggled to rebound with a new line of PC software, Mr. Levy left his post as chairman amid a falling out with the company's board. 
The pricing of workstations introduced by Digital Equipment yesterday wasn't as aggressive as some analysts had anticipated, meaning less competition for Apollo's and Sun's products.Digital's new Microvax is seen as a challenge to International Business Machines' 9370 line. 
Tokheim sank 3 1/8 to 27 after the company said earnings for its third quarter, ended Aug. 31, were probably below analysts' projections of between $2.6 million and $3.3 million, or 40 cents to 50 cents a share.Officials cited slower-than-expected acceptance of a new line of its fuel dispensers, noting that August sales and earnings were particularly below expectations. 
Mr. Ostrander "has complete knowledge of Aris's confidential plans for developing the market for the Comfort Slipper," as well as "those suppliers Aris has discovered to be the most efficient and reliable," the company contends in its suit.Aris also contends that R.G. Barry recently introduced a line of Foot Soother slippers that are "a direct copy" of its Comfort Slipper. 
The company's most infamous recall also was fire related: The 1978 recall of 1.7 million Ford Pintos and Mercury Bobcats was to repair a defect that caused fires when gas tanks ruptured in rear-end collisions.The fuel-line recall affects some of Ford's biggest-selling lines: The Ford Taurus and Mercury Sable midsized cars, the compact Ford Escort, the Ford F-series and Ranger pickup trucks, and the Lincoln Continental and Town Car. 
Claude P. Mancel, formerly on a special assignment at the technical center, was named manager, research and development, at the center, succeeding Mr. Booth.Thomas A. Moore, formerly general manager of the Vidal Sassoon hair-products line, was named manager, health and personal care products division, succeeding Mr. Lieppe.Karen L. Hendricks, formerly associate director, product development, health and personal care products division, was named general manager of the Vidal Sassoon line. 
In the 1986 fourth quarter, Du Pont Canada, 73%-owned by Du Pont Co. of Wilmington, Del., earned 28.2 million dollars, or 88 cents a share, after a 13.8 million-dollar gain from the sale of a business.Du Pont and its Canadian unit have agreed to sell the explosives lines to CIC Canadian Investment Capital Ltd., a Toronto financial investment and holding company. 
Today, two West German publishers want to re-create Baedeker's past glories.Volkmar Mair, owner of a Stuttgart publishing house, and Florian Langenscheidt, scion of a Munich publishing empire, recently agreed to merge their various rights to the Baedeker name in hopes of engineering a major comeback for the venerable guidebook line. 
Guides in Italian and Hebrew are on the way.In the U.S., distributor Simon & Schuster Inc. says Baedeker's is its second bestselling line after Arthur Frommer's guidebooks. 
The investment group was led by Leach McMicking & Co., a San Francisco investment banking firm.The sale is part of Allied's continuing program to concentrate on its aerospace, automotive products and engineered materials lines, a spokesman said. 
Some dealers and market analysts fear the boom may wane because current owners are starting to have families, and thus are looking for bigger vehicles.Both GM and Ford Motor Co., which makes the Bronco line, will address that problem by introducing four-door compacts by 1991. 
Mannesmann said group profit also declined in the half, but it didn't provide figures.The company cited sluggish demand for capital goods in West Germany, continuous losses in its steelpipe lines and deteriorating conditions at its big Brazilian unit. 
While the company so dominates the field that it routinely can pick and choose from the best computer engineers and technicians, Mr. Chen's exit will sting.Cray's bestselling X-MP line was primarily a Chen product. 
He's apparently "pulling an Esmark" again.Some of Mr. Kelly's doubters, including a few Beatrice executives, worried that he would be forced to part first with the company's crown jewels, its domestic food lines, at fire-sale prices to meet borrowing agreements. 
American Home Products Corp., seeking to shore up its contraceptive-products line in the face of generic competition, agreed to acquire VLI Corp. for $7 a share, or about $86 million. 
Woolworth has several specialty footwear units including the Foot Locker, Lady Foot Locker, and the Athletic Shoe Factory.Mr. Bryant said clients have also asked him whether some apparel companies might have Korea-related problems because, for example, they might have arranged to produce an entire line in that country. 
Rick Anguilla, editor of Toy and Hobby World, said Korean contractors make many of the "plush" category of toys, such as stuffed animals.Toy companies with big "plush" lines include Hasbro, Russ Berrie, Coleco, Viewmaster Ideal Group and Tonka.Coleco has a hot toy based on the "Alf" TV show, Viewmaster has a new line of "Michael Jackson's Pets," and Tonka sells "Pound Puppies," Mr. Anguilla noted. 
Those two account for "a fairly minor percentage" of sales and, in any case, are "running full steam, no problems," the spokesman added.Limited Inc., a high-growth specialty retailer known for designing and subcontracting its own apparel lines, has been trying to boost the number of its U.S. contractors in response to the falling dollar and rising import restrictions. 
American Home plans to buy VLI, a maker of contraceptive products, in an attempt to bolster its line in the face of generic competition. 
But it'll let them establish beachheads in some DEC and IBM accounts."The Unisys source said the machines, to be called the A1, the A4 and the A6, will be marketed against the Models 20, 40 and 60 respectively of IBM's new 9370 line, joining the competition for small-business accounts and for sales to departments in large companies. 
But Digital also has come up with techniques of its own.DECworld came about because of concerns that salespeople didn't know how extensive the company's computer line was. 
According to those familiar with the 6386 machine, it will be able to run application programs that use the Unix operating system, developed by AT&T, concurrently with software running on MS-DOS, the Microsoft Corp. operating system popularized by International Business Machines Corp.The new system will also run software based on the new OS/2 operating standard for IBM's new line of personal computers. 
Accordingly, Unilever recently paid $3.1 billion for Chesebrough-Pond's Inc. -- the largest acquisition in its history -- in hopes that a home-grown American company would help restore its standing in the U.S. personal-products business.Chesebrough-Pond's doubles the size of Unilever's U.S. personal-products line to $700 million in annual sales. 
Unilever is still something of a trendsetter in Europe.For Europeans who are switching from perfume to deodorant, Unilever developed a new line of strong-smelling "deo-cologne" sprays. 
In addition to stroking customers, Digital is expected to introduce several new, low-end products that are three times more powerful than their predecessors but won't cost Digital any more to build.And it will reinforce its message that its line of VAX computers all run the same software and can easily communicate as a result. 
Early this year, analysts feared that International Business Machines' increased competitiveness could blunt Digital's success.IBM introduced its 9370 line of computers, which was internally dubbed "the VAX killer," and it started promising improved computer communications and low priced departmental computing -- the same attributes that Digital boasts. 
Moreover, Digital has continued to sell equipment in financial and insurance markets that were traditionally IBM's bailiwick.Mr. Schulman says products introduced at DECworld will give Digital an opportunity to counterattack against the 9370 line. 
Proceeds to the company will be used for payment of bank debt, working capital, plant and equipment expenditures and other general purposes.Based in Conshohocken, Pa., the company makes and services a line of medical ultrasound equipment. 
Mr. Gidwitz estimated sales for the quarter, ended May 31, rose 15% from $86.8 million a year earlier.He added that costs involved in promoting the new Helene Curtis Salon Selectives line are likely to cause a second-quarter loss. 
Sources put the price at $125 million to $150 million.At the same time, Revlon agreed to sell Bain de Soleil, one of the acquired lines, to Cincinnati-based Procter & Gamble Co.'s Richardson-Vicks subsidiary. 
The companies involved declined to disclose prices on the transactions, which have been rumored for some time.Revlon's purchase includes the Charles of the Ritz and Alexandra de Markoff cosmetics lines, sold in department stores; mass-market lines as such as Jean Nate and Enjoli, and Dynasty fragrances. 
Revlon's purchase includes the Charles of the Ritz and Alexandra de Markoff cosmetics lines, sold in department stores; mass-market lines as such as Jean Nate and Enjoli, and Dynasty fragrances.Revlon Vice Chairman Howard Gittis said Bain de Soleil, a sun-care line, would be sold because "we are developing our own sun-care lines, beginning with Ultima II. 
Schering-Plough Corp.'s Coppertone has about 30% of the market while Bain de Soleil has about 15%.Other Richardson-Vicks lines include the Vicks brands, Sinex and Oil of Olay. 
He's very persistent."Mr. Perelman has argued that combining Revlon's cosmetics products with Gillette's personal-care and razor lines would create one of the world's most formidable consumer-products companies. 
They hope the new offerings will help lure busy people with more than mundane taste in food back to the supermarket."This is for consumers who are too tired to cook and too tired to go out -- or who have no time for either -- but still want a nice dinner," says Richard G. Powers, the business unit manager of General Foods' premium Culinova line. 
He figures that a Sara Lee refrigerated dinner for two, including a side dish and dessert, would run about $14.And Sara Lee's line is among the least expensive. 
For manufacturers, the biggest challenge is coping with the short shelf life of refrigerated products."No national food processor yet has introduced a successful line of new refrigerated entrees and a lot of money has been spent," says John Luther, a Marketing Corporation of America official.Last month, in fact, Campbell Soup withdrew its Fresh Chef line of refrigerated soups, sauces and salads from national distribution. 
Another is what he terms a "sell-out strategy," making sure products are sold by a certain date through couponing and other inducements.(Using the lessons learned from Fresh Chef and an earlier group of refrigerated entrees that never emerged from test market, Campbell says it now is testing a new line of refrigerated entrees and side dishes). 
To prolong shelf life of their products, some manufacturers have resorted to novel strategies.Sara Lee's Emmber Brands is rolling out a complete refrigerated line called Tonight's Choice. 
So, Manhattan Toy, with $5 million in annual sales, has sued the $1 billion Gerber Products Co., alleging Gerber has infringed Manhattan Toy's copyrights.After his company began selling its dinosaurs in 1984 through retailers such as Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's and F.A.O. Schwarz, Mr. Goldwyn says, Gerber launched a line of inexpensive imitations. 
LAST MONTH, the closely held American Natural Beverage Corp. of New York got Anheuser-Busch Cos. of St. Louis to change the logo on its Zeltzer Seltzer soft drink, which American Natural claimed was "confusingly similar" to packaging for its Soho Natural Soda.And last November, Blue Mountain Arts Inc. of Boulder, Colo., won an injunction barring Hallmark Cards Inc. of Kansas City, Mo., from distributing a line of greeting cards Blue Mountain alleged were copied from its designs. 
As a result, Mr. Jager says, "a small business can look at a situation and say, 'Not only is the climate more favorable for me to take on a big infringer, but the chances for a higher return are greater than they used to be.'"In its suit, Manhattan Toy doesn't ask for specific damages, only an amount equal to the profits Gerber has made on its dinosaur line. 
At Beecham, he had been responsible for marketing such consumer brands as Aqua-Fresh toothpaste, Sucrets throat lozenges and Calgon bath products.Quaker State, maker of the nation's best-selling motor oil, turned to Mr. Snell in an effort to coordinate marketing of an unwieldy 6,000 products cutting across 12 company lines. 
Neither company would confirm or deny mounting speculation that Revlon, the closely held cosmetics giant, would pay $150 million or more in the transaction.It is understood that the purchase may include the Charles of the Ritz and Alexandra de Markoff brands, considered prestige cosmetics lines, as well as mass-market lines such as Bain de Soleil, Jean Nate, Enjoli and the Dynasty fragrances. 
Since Mr. Perelman acquired control of Revlon in November 1985, he has shed most of the company's health care divisions while seeking to bolster the beauty business.Last December he purchased Max Factor Inc., which includes the Halston and Almay lines, for $345 million. 
Earlier this year he bought the U.S. business of Germaine Monteil Cosmetiques Corp. for about $10 million from Beecham Group PLC, the London-based pharmaceutical concern.Lines included Diane Von Furstenberg fragrances and Lancaster skincare products. 
In the year-earlier quarter, the maker of personal-grooming products earned $1.1 million, or 18 cents a share, on sales of $30.9 million.The company said the earnings decline results chiefly from lower-than-expected volume for its Consumer Products division's new Textra line of care products. 
Since being taken private in April 1986 in a $6.2 billion leveraged buyout, Beatrice has rapidly reduced its debt by selling various units.Last month, it said it plans an initial public offering for its remaining non-food businesses and some of its smaller specialty-food lines. 
KID STUFF: Retailers expand to cash in on demographic trends.Gymboree Corp., a $10 million-a-year business built on tot exercise classes, launches a chain of stores with its own line of clothes and toys; 15 stores are to be open by year end.Conran's, New York, expands its children's furniture lines, while Carter Hawley Hale's Broadway chain upgrades its offerings to include Baby Dior, Esprit and Guess clothes. 
THE FACTORIES of the future turning out a new line of midsized cars for General Motors Corp. this fall won't be so futuristic after all. 
In addition, the fiscal stimulus from the Reagan presidency's record budget deficits has forced the Fed to maintain a firmer policy than it might otherwise have done.Meanwhile, increased foreign competition, domestic deregulation, and the wave of mergers and consolidation sweeping corporate America have pushed companies to lay off workers, shed unprofitable lines, adopt closer relationships with suppliers and tighten controls over inventories. 
FRA's programs manage the data bases of a museum's members, donors, and prospective donors, as well as generate standard paperwork such as membership-renewal reminders and year-end reports for donors for tax purposes.The American Federation of the Arts, an association of art museums, has been working with a software consultant, the Williamson Group, for several years and offers a line of software designed especially for art museums. 
Today's wardrobe for many men is triple layered: suits for work, activewear for sports and trendy sports coats, shirts and slacks for entertaining.And it's the two leisure lines that have surging sales. 
Despite the strength of sportswear in the $27 billion menswear market, manufacturers and retailers see considerable room for growth.Designers such as Ralph Lauren, Calvin Klein and Liz Claiborne, who introduced a new sportswear line for men two years ago, are avidly seeking the new male customer. 
Designers and retailers, of course, still count on women, who long have purchased at least half of all men's clothing.Liz Claiborne, Calvin Klein and others are betting that female customers, loyal to their womenswear lines, will also buy their new menswear lines for husbands and others. 
For the current fiscal year, Mr. O'Reilly said analysts' estimated net of $2.85 a share "seems reasonable."The executive said the fiscal 1987 marketing budget of about $383 million will be increased by about 15% in fiscal 1988, with most of the spending to be on such lines as Weight Watchers, Chico-San rice cakes, yogurt and Near East Foods -- a maker of flavored rice products. 
They're packaging it as 'the Don Kelly portfolio' instead of as an ongoing company."E-II will include the non-food businesses BCI hasn't already sold plus some smaller specialty-food lines. 
Montgomery Ward & Co.'s 2.5% rise in same-store sales was the slowest growth rate for the Mobil Corp. unit since fall.Sales were hurt by the chain's recent move out of the hardware and the lawn and garden lines, which typically are big sellers in May. 
Digital Equipment Corp. and Cray Research Inc., as expected, said they will jointly market and develop products to link their lines of computers. 
The company has said it intends to emphasize its fragrance business.It has cut prices on some cosmetic lines 50% and may sell the lines. 
Nevertheless, the company called the five businesses to be sold "sound businesses" that are experiencing an earnings improvement "with the upturn in the electronics market."The announcement follows a major restructuring program TRW began in late 1985 that involved selling businesses -- mainly aircraft parts and industrial products -- with annual sales of about $800 million, pruning back remaining lines to their most profitable products and a general cost-reduction effort. 
Still, troubles continue to be more common than triumphs for companies testing video catalogs -- even when the video itself is well done.Murjani International Ltd. tested a video catalog last year for its Coca-Cola clothing line. 
Glenview, Ill.-based Kraft long has wanted to expand in frozen foods, the fastest-growing packaged-food area right now.The company tried a line of frozen-cheese dinners that it quietly folded last year. 
Besides the All American Gourmet acquisition, Kraft is trying again internally.It currently is testing a line of frozen entrees that includes lasagna and several meat dishes. 
The acquisition would be Kraft's fourth in the frozen-food business in the past three years.And last week it agreed to acquire several of Chicago-based Quaker Oats Co.'s food lines for $235 million. 
He also said the company is considering actions to reduce interest and dividend expense starting in the second half.Mattel has said that substantially lower domestic demand starting last year for its Masters of the Universe and Rainbow Brite lines of toys are among the main factors troubling the company. 
In Mr. Welch's view, consumer electronics' main job is to give GE greater buying clout for its other business in the Pacific Rim by adding to the volume of components purchased there.Despite the fact that Mr. Welch regards consumer electronics as something of an albatross, security analysts say that even if GE eventually exits TV-set manufacturing, it will continue to market consumer electronics because of the valuable GE brand recognition that benefits more profitable consumer lines, such as light bulbs and major appliances. 
He has primarily focused the business on the side of the software market called systems utilities, which allow data-processing centers to manage their operations more efficiently.Computer Associates also has broadened its line of business software, which now includes spreadsheet and word-processor programs. 
Mattel will introduce Captain Power in September in 86 U.S. television markets and 17 foreign countries.The spokesman said Mattel is being "very cautious" about not repeating mistakes it made several years ago when its Intellivision game machine line and other electronics products encountered an extremely competitive environment and created huge losses for the company. 
"That experience is memorable," the spokesman said, adding that the new lines are less involved with educational electronics and more toy and game related.Thomas R. Kully, a securities analyst with the Chicago firm of William Blair & Co., said he didn't believe Mattel would make the same errors made with the now-discontinued Intellivision line. 
The Xerox copier, for example, is now part of an integrated office-information system that processes documents from creation to transmission, including storage and retrieval as well as reproduction.No company can cover the complete line competitively without help from other companies. 
The jury, in federal court in Illinois, awarded the damages to Georgia Roulo, a former licensor of the toy, trinket and greeting card firm.Ms. Roulo sued Russ Berrie in 1982, contending that the company's line of "Touching You" greeting cards infringed on the "Feeling Sensitive" cards she designed for Russ Berrie to sell from 1978 through 1980. 
In doing so, Yves Saint Laurent regained control of the perfumes that bear its name.Revillon, the fur-coat maker in the Cora group, took over Karl Lagerfeld's KL label to launch an up-market ready-to-wear line of women's clothing. 
Just this month, the family that runs Martell & Cie. agreed to sell control of the cognac company to Seagram Co. of Canada.Although industry analysts say a recession would hurt lesser-known brands and expensive items such as cars, furs and jewelry, most French luxury-goods companies don't expect demand for their most prestigious lines to be affected. 
"As long as I'm around," Mr. Schneider vows, "we won't go on the stock market."And Mr. Schneider also wants to prevent the Davidoff line of cigars from becoming mass consumer items. 
Susie Peterson, an analyst with First Boston Corp., recently said that Computervision was among the companies that Prime might try to acquire, though she thought other candidates were more likely.Prime, which had net income of $46.9 million, or 97 cents a share, and revenue of $860.2 million last year, is among the smallest computer companies that make a broad line of computer systems. 
Tele-Communications, a cable television concern, acquired Heritage Communications in August and immediately sold the broadcast properties.Heritage also said in October that it had retained First Boston Corp. to help shed the communications-products lines. 
Then some Japanese chocolate technicians reverse-engineered the M&M.Lotte K.K., a leading confectionary company in Japan, came out in April with a line of "new-type chocolate" that looks suspiciously like the Mars product. 
Panasonic Co. is a division of its American subsidiary.Along with making the Kodak batteries, the new company will make a separate, competing line of consumer alkaline batteries to be marketed under the Panasonic brand name. 
The plant, which may be located in the Sunbelt, is expected to produce several hundred million batteries a year beginning in 1989.Kodak entered the battery market last year with two lines of batteries: its alkaline Supralife batteries made according to Kodak specifications by Matsushita in Japan and its 9-volt lithium batteries made by Kodak's Ultra Technologies unit in Newark, N.Y. 
WOW said it will continue to develop new toys, and will unveil its 1988 products at the New York Toy Fair in February.The spokeswoman wouldn't discuss the planned products, but said WOW plans to broaden its line by offering more lower-priced toys. 
This year, Grey's work for Revlon was largely limited to a single television advertisement for Flex, a hair care product.Grey had been assigned to work on an ad campaign for a new hair care line that Revlon planned to introduce next year. 
The move reflects American Home's longstanding strategy of rapid growth.By acquiring Robins, American Home would add strong consumer brands to its own healthy over-the-counter lines and beef up its proprietary drug research, which has been barren in recent years. 
Sales of the Regal -- the first of the so-called "GM-10" cars -- more than doubled to 2,898 from a year earlier.That's an early indicator of how well customers are receiving the new line of midsized, front-wheel-drive cars that GM hopes will help reverse its market share decline. 
Alternative cards -- now the industry's hottest sellers and still growing -- represent between 17% and 22% of all cards sold.The Big Three are making their gains in the alternative card market largely at the expense of tiny competitors, who were successful early on in offering such lines. 
The alternative cards appeal largely to baby boomers; the companies say many young adults enjoy sending humorous cards to friends for no particular occasion or holiday, but just to stay in touch.Many of the alternative lines also are geared toward women, who buy 90% of all cards.Gibson, for example, offers a line called Women's Writes. 
Of the major companies, Hallmark generated the most controversy with its alternative-card entry.In the largest rollout of new cards in the company's history, it brought out the "Shoebox" line, aimed mainly at women, and "Personal Touch," a line of sentimental cards. 
"We're not adding a lot of mouths to feed," says Paul Shain, an analyst at Dain Bosworth Inc.He says those battling for "share of stomach" include salad bars, in-store delicatessens and a buffet line of home-delivery food services. 
"The past few months have been a difficult period for the company," Mr. Kingsborough said."Nonetheless, we are encouraged by retailer and consumer reaction to both our continuing lines and to the new products we introduced for this Christmas season. 
Group executives are expected to identify competitors that Simon & Schuster can acquire to broaden its market share.Since April, for example, the company bought two more document search firms, a line of training materials for computer software and a British professional publisher. 
Robins's profitable over-the-counter brands would be the primary attraction for any acquirer.Analysts estimate that the consumer lines account for almost 50% of Robins's sales and possibly as much as 60% of profit. 
The agreement is subject to regulatory and financing approvals.Executone, based in Norcross, Ga., markets and services a line of business telephone systems. 
Experts estimated the purchase price at one billion markkas ($248.5 million).The transaction included SEL's television-tube and loudspeaker lines, the company said. 
Chrysler's acquisition last summer of American Motors Corp. also contributed to the change in plans for Jefferson Avenue, a company spokesman said.Originally, Chrysler planned to replace the current K-car line at Jefferson with another model, and later shift the plant to light truck production, the spokesman said. 
Those are dictated by the company's buyers, who also adjust their plans as the season progresses.The day after Thanksgiving, for instance, the buyers ordered an emergency markdown of 40% on a line of women's sportswear. 
Pennwalt Corp. said it acquired a line of fungicides, insecticides and herbicides and their related manufacturing and distribution facilities from Le Raffineries de Soufre Reunies, Marseille, France. 
Essex also plans to sell its Baltimore phosgene chemicals plant; the spokesman said the company hasn't yet found a buyer.Essex also said it plans to sell write off or write down certain venture capital lines. 
Richard Laster, DNA president and chief executive officer, attributed most of the 1987 loss to a decision this year by Kraft Inc., Glenview, Ill., to withdraw from a national product launch.DNA is negotiating with two or three parties for a partnership to replace Kraft for the marketing of its VegiSnax line of specially bred carrots and celery. 
Digital is likely to promote it for companies that link many computer users to a central database, one of the fastest growing applications for big computers.The announcement of a more powerful mainframe computer in Digital's VAX line, has been widely expected, but Maynard, Mass.-based Digital hadn't given any details until William Demmer, a vice president, mentioned it last week at a user group meeting in California. 
The U.S. estimates that the four Airbus countries have poured $10 billion into the consortium since it was started 17 years ago.Washington says they are planning to spend an additional $3.2 billion on two new aircraft lines Airbus plans to produce. 
MAN and Hoesch added 2.50 each to 129 and 97.50, respectively.But Kloeckner Humboldt-Deutz, reeling from heavy losses in its agricultural machinery lines, fell 2 to 79. 
In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Mattel closed yesterday at $7.875 a share, up 25 cents.A Mattel spokesman said the company was concerned about the lackluster U.S. sales of most products except the "Barbie" doll line. 
Alfred H. Hunt III, president of IFR Systems Inc., a Wichita, Kan.-based producer of test equipment that is 84% owned by Regency, was named to fill Mr. Boone's vacancy on the board.The company said it intends to sell its consumer products lines so it can concentrate on businesses that provide the most potential for "long-term growth and profitability." 
The company said it intends to sell its consumer products lines so it can concentrate on businesses that provide the most potential for "long-term growth and profitability."Regency said it will try to sell its lines of scanners, information radio products, and marine radios, which together generated about 24% of the company's $75 million in sales for the fiscal year ended June 30. 
The companies will begin sharing models by late 1989 at the earliest but will sell cars under separate identities.The venture will make two car lines developed by Toyota and one by GM. Troubles in Australia prompted GM last year to restructure Holden's. 
Australia's minister for industry, John Button, praised the GM-Toyota announcement as "a major step in making the Australian motor industry internationally competitive."Attempting to revitalize its troubled auto industry, the Australian government three years ago said it wanted to cut by 1992 the number of car lines made there to about six from 13, and the number of car manufacturers to three from five. 
For all of 1986, Insilco earned $33.6 million, or $1.58 a share, on sales of $745.1 million.A spokesman said analysts, holders and the rating companies have been urging Insilco to quit the housing lines, which employ about 600 people. 
The company had taken charges in 1985 and 1986 against the housing business, the spokesman said.Insilco sees limited and difficult growth prospects for the lines, he said, and would have had to put much more cash into it to keep it going. 
The spokesman said that Insilco continues to look at acquisitions that complement its continuing businesses but that it has no plans for any more divestitures.Insilco said it plans to continue running the housing businesses for existing customers but will treat the lines as discontinued operations in financial reports. 
The industry, suffering from a drought of new products for more than a year, is still groping for a major crowd-drawer.In a rush to imitate the strong sellers, manufacturers have cluttered the major categories -- particularly the "action toy" line that features such items as G.I. Joe, Transformers and SilverHawks. 
Sales of video games, preschool toys, board games and basic toys have been brisk through most of the year, and many of these are expected to continue selling well.Some analysts, moreover, say shares of a few companies offering basic lines, such as Hasbro and Tyco Toys, may actually be buys for 1988. 
Tyco, one of the few toy makers due to post a profit this year, will increase earnings to about $1.65 a share next year from $1.48 this year, Mr. Kully predicts.Tyco traditionally has been strong in basic toys such as electric trains and has done particularly well with a line of radio-operated cars this year. 
What's more, investors for the Bass group, who raised their Macmillan stake to 9% earlier this year, appear to show particular interest in publishing.But some of Bell & Howell's lines could be a difficult fit if the publishing companies were combined. 
The rating concern had placed MCA on its CreditWatch list in October after the company authorized buying back as many as 10 million of its common shares.S&P said that while MCA's theater and television entertainment businesses remain strong and its record and book lines have performed well, "financial risk has risen in recent years, suggesting an increased emphasis by management on shareholder values." 
Restaurants and supermarkets increasingly woo shoppers with a wide array of refrigerated and hot, prepared dishes."Consumers realize that takeout is no longer so expensive relative to the premium frozen dinner market," says Charles Bowen, a group vice president at General Foods Corp., which has decided against expanding its premium frozen line called Fresh Creations until it sees where the market is going. 
Catering to this attitude has spelled success for some budget-minded brands.Most notably, All American Gourmet Co.'s Budget Gourmet line, which typically offers products costing less than $2, has seen its share of the entree market rise to 15% since its national rollout in 1985. 
The unit of Swiss-based Nestle S.A. also has slashed prices on its newly restaged Dinner Supreme brand and is offering 30% to 40% more cents-off coupons than last year on all its frozen dinner products.Not to be outdone, Campbell has withdrawn its upscale L'Orient line of Szechuan Chinese meals from the market entirely. 
But "only a very small segment of the population was willing to pay for that level of authenticity," acknowledges Robert Bernstock, Campbell's general manager of premium meals.Campbell has also begun to upgrade its Le Menu line. 
Pepper steak marinates in ($11 a gallon) rice wine imported from Japan.Today, the most expensive Le Menu carries a suggested retail price tag of $3.89 compared with $4.99 when the line was introduced in 1984. 
Wooden trains, priced at $15 to $100, wooden construction sets, for $12 to $25, and wooden doll houses, for $95 to $250, all are hot items at John Davy, a specialty toy store in Alexandria, Va.At competing Granny's Place in Alexandria, Playmobile products, a line of plastic pre-school toys from West Germany ranging in price from $2.60 to over $100, "are walking out the door," says owner Rodger Wall. 
The answer lies inside its sprawling assembly plant on the outskirts of Munich.There, on the second floor, workers buzz about like honeybees, assembling some 1,500 engines a day for BMW's 300 Series automobiles, its least expensive line. 
Ken Butterworth, chairman and chief executive officer, said the company expects quarterly sales to exceed $100 million compared with $81 million.Mr. Butterworth said the company's lines are strong both in the U.S. and internationally. 
Competition for counter space at department stores is intense.Neiman-Marcus, the 22-store specialty retailer, says that it customarily drops a "half a dozen" slow-moving cosmetic or fragrance lines each year. 
Celestial Seasonings, a Boulder, Colo., maker of 35 different kinds of specialty teas, was acquired by Kraft, a Glenview, Ill., maker of food products, in 1984.Kraft decided to sell Celestial Seasonings in part of a broad review of core lines. 
The teas, sold in highly decorated boxes with philosphical quotes printed on them, have names like Red Zinger, Morning Thunder and Mandarine Orange Spice.The company had grown considerably in the past three years, adding several new tea lines, but the relaxed, informal atmosphere has been maintained, the Kraft spokeswoman said. 
When less established designers have succumbed to AIDS, their clothes have died with them.Such budding talents as Karl Davis, who created a line of classic women's clothing, and Mark Pennywell, known for his original wedding gowns, didn't employ a staff of assistant designers who might have continued producing their styles. 
Many would consider the Braun studios in Kronberg, West Germany, to be the quintessential purveyor of "Eurodesign."But Braun is a unit of Gillette Co., in Boston, and the Braun line contains several items that were first designed for Gillette by Mr. Cousins, who has long been its consultant. 
The possible imports are further evidence of the increased buying power of the Japanese yen, and part of an effort to expand Isuzu's product line, a GM spokesman said.GM owns 42.4% of Isuzu, which makes three lines of subcompact passenger cars. 
Sirjang Lal Tandon, chairman of Tandon, said Tandon decided to sell its Winchester disk drive operations to "concentrate all our resources on our personal computer and subsystem product lines."The company's computer and subsystem lines are expected to account for about 85% of its revenue in the fourth quarter. 
System Industries said El Segundo, Calif.-based Imperial Technology has about 50 employees and had revenue of about $10 million in the fiscal year ended June 30.Imperial makes a solid state disk memory device that System Industries called "a logical extension" of its data storage line. 
Since last Friday, Outboard's stock has risen more than three points.Genmar's boat lines include Hatteras yachts, Wellcraft power boats and Larson and Lund fishing boats. 
The Premier is the first car for the Jeep/Eagle division following the purchase of AMC last summer.Jeep is a solidly successful franchise that appeals to the kind of buyers Chrysler wants, but the Eagle car line is a decidedly weak sister. 
Broadway Jeep/Eagle in Denver, Colo., for example, sells about 3,000 new Jeeps a year, but less than 300 cars."We don't really have much of a car line anymore," laments Steve Segal, the dealership's general manager. 
Indeed, Jeep customers have long disdained the cars offered by AMC and Regie Nationale des Usines Renault, the French auto maker that owned more than 40% of AMC before the Chrysler purchase.Now the Eagle car line consists mainly of leftover Renault models and the discontinued AMC Eagle four-wheel-drive car. 
Chrysler also decided not to go ahead with plans for a coupe version, in part because the coupe, without a lot of work, wouldn't have met the standards Chrysler has set for the division, company officials said.Chrysler also has sacrificed some profit for more volume with Premier's $12,474 to $14,079 price range, which Joseph E. Cappy, group vice president of Jeep/Eagle marketing, said is aimed right at the heart of Ford's Taurus line. 
He does his own writing in one room and tends to Black Lizard business in the other.The line has done so well that this year Mr. Ellis sold off his printing business, including the presses, and became a full-time publisher. 
The company insisted the change wasn't related to an 81% drop in third-quarter profit, which fell to $1.5 million, or 14 cents a share, from $8 million, or $1.03 a share, a year earlier.The poor results were attributed to higher cotton prices and costs associated with the introduction of a new line of stain-resistant carpet. 
Sales rose 16% to $8.47 billion from $7.31 billion.American Brands's best-known lines are its cigarette brands, including Pall Mall, Tareyton and Lucky Strike. 
The company also owns such major liquor brands as Jim Beam, Old Grand-Dad and Old Crow.Other lines include Swingline office products, Case cutlery, Titleist and Foot-Joy golf items and Master locks. 
He was brought back as Beatrice's chairman when it was acquired by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. last year in a $6.2 billion leveraged buy-out.In July, Mr. Kelly took Beatrice's non-food businesses and some of its smaller speciality food lines public as E-II Holdings Inc. 
Its array of consumer products is compatible with E-II's lineup, which includes Samsonite luggage and Stiffel lamps.Moreover, many American Brands lines, such as Master Locks and Case cutlery, fit his strategy of buying mundane businesses that are considered by analysts to be undervalued and undermanaged. 
He's more inclined to buy and sell companies than to run them for very long.Although analysts don't think he's particularly interested in cigarette or liquor lines, he's familiar with the distribution and marketing aspects of such retail businesses; thus he might be adept at selling those off separately. 
In the nine months, earnings fell 49% to $41.4 million, or 71 cents a share, on a 1.9% drop in revenue, to $966.7 million, from a year earlier.This year's results reflect the general softness in the toy industry, as well as disappointing sales for Hasbro from several new products -- including Air Raiders, Battle Beasts and Visionaries in the boys' action line; and Jem in the girls' doll category, Mr. Hassenfeld said. 
Surely nothing so becomes the Black Lizard line of fiction as its home. 
Vodavi Technology Corp. said it signed a $40 million, four-year contract with CTG Inc. to supply an expanded line of telephone systems and other products. 
MedChem Products Inc. said it signed a letter of intent to purchase for $31 million a line of surgical products used in stopping bleeding. 
Warnaco Inc. said it is in the final stages of negotiations with French fashion designer Emanuel Ungaro for licensing rights to his line of intimate apparel. 
The cereal boxes, which include red and green crunch berries, show Cap'n Crunch dressed as Santa Claus.Scott Paper Co. decided to roll out a line of red and green paper towels this year after the company's researchers found that 80% of consumers would be apt to buy such a product. 
Mr. Wilcox is director of Design Research Center, a division of Herbst, Lazar, Rogers & Bell, a Chicago design firm.In redesigning a line of telephone memo books for Avery International's Aigner division, Mr. Wilcox peered over secretaries' shoulders and studied copies in filled-in form books. 
Gould was suspended from bidding on government jobs because of alleged improprieties in setting prices.The move by the GSA comes as Gould is trying to sell its defense lines. 
Looart owns Current Inc., a major marketer of greeting cards and stationery based in Colorado Springs, Colo., that has annual sales of more than $125 million, Primerica said.The sale is part of Primerica's plan, announced in August, to sell all its mail-order lines in order to reduce debt on its $750 million purchase of Smith Barney Inc. 
LSI Logic Corp., a Milpitas, Calif.-based semiconductor concern, said it entered into a long-term agreement with closely held MIPS Computer Systems to manufacture and market MIPS's line of 32-bit microprocessors, including reduced-instruction-set computing, or RISC, chips. 
"It's great styling, priced right, and it's the best engineered car Buick has ever given us."That car is the first in a series of GM-10 products, a new $5 billion line of mid-sized cars that will come out over the next two years. 
General Motors Corp.'s Buick division formally introduced the first of GM's crucial new line of midsized cars, and predicted the model will reverse the division's two-year slide in sales. 
The new Regal is the first product of the $5 billion project code-named "GM-10."The GM-10 line is aimed at regaining sales that GM has lost in its bread-and-butter market: midsized cars aimed at upper-middle-class Americans. 
He and other Buick officials, however, said consumer incentives will continue."Given the supply and demand situation," Mr. Mertz said, referring to the increasing industry overcapacity and flat demand, "some forms of incentive activity will continue, but not on every car line." 
GM's Buick division introduced the first of the auto maker's crucial new line of midsized cars. 
Data General Corp. introduced a new computer system that reduces the base price for its line of 32-bit superminicomputers. 
"We wanted an honest reaction" from consumers, she now explains.But Ms. George ended the mystery recently by officially unveiling her Chicken by George line at a party with all the trimmings. 
It sparked the current dispute this summer by questioning a Customs Service ruling that its boards fell within the tariffs' reach.The Washington computer trade group said it understands International Business Machines Corp. was also affected by the new tariffs, because it buys boards for its new Personal System/2 line of PCs from Matsushita Electric Industrial Co. of Japan. 
Packaging Corp., which owns and operates Ekco Packaging, said it will manage the Kaiser facilities as part of its Disposable Packaging Group.KaiserTech, a holding company, called the sale part of its plan to focus on lines that offer "significant competitive advantage." 
Gillette recently acquired a majority interest in another French manufacturer of expensive pens, Waterman S.A.That acquisition is intended to broaden Gillette's Papermate pen line to include pens in the $60 to $80 range, Gillette officials said. 
Storage Technology Corp. added two new storage systems to its line of disk drives for mainframe computers. 
Toyota is entering the U.S. luxury car market by selling an upscale car line through a new dealer network. 
International Business Machines Corp. is unleashing an aggressive legal campaign to protect its new line of personal computers from clones. 
Outside the courtroom, IBM is issuing strong warnings that rivals won't be able to build a legal clone of its newest PCs unless they get patent licenses from IBM -- a requirement that could present a new barrier to entering the clone market.Big Blue already has filed two unusually broad lawsuits against alleged infringers of the trademark for its four-month-old PC line, called the Personal System/2. 
Such a drop, in IBM's most visible consumer market, would stand as one of IBM's most rankling public-image setbacks.In its first family of PCs, IBM specifically used widely available parts and an "open" design that would let independent companies make software, accessories and even full computers that compete with the IBM line. 
"You might even look at it as an insurance policy," he says.Chips & Technologies, based in Milpitas, Calif., makes widely used microchip sets for clone makers, designed to imitate the inner workings of IBM's old PC line. 
Toyota Motor Corp. said it will enter the increasingly crowded U.S. luxury-car market by selling a line of upscale cars through a new Toyota dealer network called Lexus. 
Toyota Motor Corp. said it will enter the increasingly crowded U.S. luxury-car market by selling a line of upscale cars through a new Toyota dealer network called Lexus.The auto maker, which said it will introduce the cars in late 1989 as 1990 models, becomes the third Japanese auto maker to opt for a so-called "second channel" of dealers to highlight a new line of cars. 
Honda Motor Co. introduced its Legend and Integra luxury cars in the U.S. in 1986 through a new dealer network called Acura.And just last month, Nissan Motor Corp. announced plans for a new line of upscale cars that, starting in 1989, it will market under the new Infiniti label. 
Competition has become so heated that BMW of North America Inc., a unit of Bayerische Motoren Werke AG, and Mercedes-Benz of North America Inc., a unit of Daimler-Benz AG, recently announced sales incentives to help trim excess inventory -- a rare move for the two West German luxury-car makers.Toyota hopes its upscale line will help it hang on to current customers who have had to look elsewhere when trading up to luxury cars, and says it isn't worried about the crowded market. 
It said the dealers, who will be picked from inside and outside Toyota's current rank of 1,085 U.S. dealers, will be situated in the top 50 markets in the U.S. -- markets that can sustain sales of luxury cars -- and will have to demonstrate a record of customer satisfaction.The auto maker plans to require this first group of dealers to have facilities for the Lexus cars totally separate from their current car lines. 
That strategy is common for auto makers setting up separate dealer networks and is meant, among other things, to make buyers of the upscale cars feel special and to underscore the exclusive ambiance of the luxury market.But some dealers have voiced skepticism about the practice, noting that sales of new luxury-car lines may not be big enough to support the expense -- often millions of dollars -- of separate facilities. 
Indeed, Toyota said it expects to sell only 30,000 of the vehicles in the first model year.Aside from hanging on to current customers, the Lexus luxury line could help boost Toyota's earnings, if it proves popular. 
The Japanese supply capital and technology and the Americans supply management and marketing.Four small, closely held firms, an American, a Dutch, a German and a Japanese -- each a leader in one narrow line of chemical solvents -- have merged their separate research labs with the lab of an American university with expertise in the solvents field. 
Only by banding together do they have the $200 million in sales needed to support a decent research budget in a rapidly changing technology.And then there is the Belgian producer of processed meats -- the largest producer in its specialty lines within the Common Market but still with sales of only about $60 million a year. 
U.S. exports dropped like a stone in the years of the overvalued dollar and imports soared; not one major American industry could maintain its exports in the face of a currency fluctuation of almost 50%.Yet only in steel, automobiles, consumer electronics, machine tools and a few semiconductor lines did the world share of American products go down at all. 
Dover Corp., New York, acquired the Duncan Industries parking-meter unit of Rymer Co. for $29 million.The acquisition adds Rymer's only nonfood operation to Dover's lines of industrial parts. 
"They've had tremendous market response for the workstation products," he said.Stephen K. Smith, computer analyst with PaineWebber Inc., cautioned that Hewlett-Packard's profit margin fell 1% in the quarter to 7.2%, a sign that brisk demand for the company's products may not be concentrated in its more profitable lines. 
Increasingly, such products are being made for Apple Computer Inc.'s Macintosh.Although add-ons aren't yet available to match the features of IBM's new Personal System/2 line, such features as the improved graphics probably will be mimicked soon. 
Some of the add-ons, however, are likely to be expensive.Still, as consumers try to decide whether to spend $5,000 or more for the most powerful of IBM's new PS/2 line, interest in the aftermarket is likely to grow. 
But Michael Kennedy, a food analyst at IDS Financial Services, believes the burger development is emblematic of Hormel innovations.Mr. Ramey is more excited about the Top Shelf line, which packages microwavable meat entrees in multilayered plastic that acts like a can. 
Mr. McMillin notes Hormel is selling at 19 times his estimate of $1.50 for next year's earnings, compared with a multiple of about 16 for all food stocks.Like any other high-multiple stock that includes a big bet on some future line, Hormel carries the risk that this profusion of new products will fall flat. 
Mr. Ramey says the biggest risk is that Hormel won't have enough advertising dollars to put behind its new ideas.But he believes the canned meat lines, having served as a cash cow to finance product development, can support those outlays as well. 
Perkin-Elmer shares closed yesterday at $38, up $1.25, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.In the past two fiscal years, Perkin-Elmer has taken various charges, though much smaller, as it undertook to refocus the chip equipment line and gird for what many in the industry say is a rebounding semiconductor market. 
Revlon is selling the two vision-care businesses for more than twice their annual sales; such businesses typically fetch the equivalent of 1.5 times annual sales, according to Ms. Hall of Smith Barney.The sale of the vision-care lines will leave Revlon focused on its cosmetics business, which analysts expect to have 1987 sales of about $1.7 billion, compared with $1.15 billion last year. 
Commodore's task to restructure its U.S. operations is formidable.The company's venerable model 64 computer is in the final years of its life cycle and its personal computer line is up against new products from computer giants, including International Business Machines Corp., Apple Computer Inc. and Tandy Corp. 
The company's venerable model 64 computer is in the final years of its life cycle and its personal computer line is up against new products from computer giants, including International Business Machines Corp., Apple Computer Inc. and Tandy Corp.Meanwhile, Commodore is banking much of the company's growth on its technologically impressive Amiga computer line, which also is faced with numerous competitive obstacles in the U.S. 
Sales rose 16% to $1.4 billion from $1.21 billion.The Framingham, Mass.-based discount store operator has had weak results from its large discount department store operations in recent periods because of strong competition and weakness in its apparel lines. 
The Japan Defense Agency allows vendors to earn less than 5%, but that is a godsend for Kawasaki Heavy Industries Ltd.The company's other manufacturing lines, such as shipbuilding, are awash in deficits. 
Cost-control measures have improved margins, he added, saying, "We're well-positioned to be a lot more competitive."About 75% of anticipated sales this year are expected to be to new customers, many of them cardiologists and internists, as the company introduces a line of desktop units to help detect heart and lung disease. 
Although a management change at Simac's plant in Gessate, Italy, has meant interrupted shipments of its Pastamatic to the U.S., Mr. Carter is awaiting a "new and improved" version in time for this year's Christmas selling season.Even so, his heart is really in a new line of toasters. 
For the second time in less than two months, Volkswagen U.S. Inc., Troy, Mich., said it will boost suggested retail prices of its entry-level Fox line. 
On July 1, the company added $100 to $150 to the base price of its 1987 Foxes.The line is assembled in Brazil. 
The company also is introducing a new product, a mixture of fruit liqueurs and brandy.In a bid to distinguish its brands, the Christian Brothers has taken its name off its generic table wines, renaming the line "Mont La Salle," and has reserved the Christian Brothers name for its top-of-the-line vintage wines, which are being pushed. 
Another recent campaign has targeted the market for inexpensive wines.One ad asks consumers to "Taste the Fun" of Christian Brothers' line of low-alcohol wines with names like "Wild Berry" and "La Blush." 
Sales for continuing operations for the fiscal year grew about 8% to $210 million from $194.9 million in fiscal 1986.Earlier in the current fiscal year, IPCO sold its Sterling Dental business and its dental prosthetics line, which had combined annual sales of about $20 million. 
Terms weren't disclosed.The 185-acre shipyard was shut down by General Dynamics last summer after it completed building a line of maritime positioning ships for the military. 
The amount of stock involved wasn't disclosed.Colgate plans to buy Minnetonka's SoftSoap brand liquid soap, Village Bath adult bath products, Sesame Street children's bath products and institutional-commercial lines of liquid soaps. 
Mr. Lewis apparently has ready buyers for some of his new Beatrice European operations.Certain co-owners of those international lines -- such as the Ballve family of Madrid, who sold Beatrice an interest in their Campofrio meat concern in 1977 -- have been trying to persuade Beatrice's Mr. Kelly to let them repurchase their stakes, according to the Ballves' attorney. 
He wouldn't elaborate, except to add that he has "no plan to dispose of a significant part" of his new holdings.For Beatrice, the sale of the international operations means Mr. Kelly has achieved his goal of stripping the company down to its U.S. domestic food core, led by its Hunt's tomato products and Wesson cooking oil lines. 
In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Del E. Webb closed at $25.75 a share, down 37.5 cents.Webb said the discussions, which it described as "cordial," centered around the two groups' interest in Webb; potential licensing problems the groups might encounter with Webb's Nevada and New Jersey gambling operations; Webb's recent announcements that it might split up its leisure and real estate operations and possibly sell parts of the company; and the company's intention to take hefty writedowns this year from its gambling lines. 
 new line of personal computers was among its best sellers in
Worlds of Wonder said Friday that it expects Lazer Tag toys -- of which it has $25 million in inventory -- to recover from recent weakness.It also said it has begun shipment of a new line of school accessories and a video game, and plans to ship other new toys soon. 
Then the company took a hard look at its remaining businesses."We asked what was it possible to do to eliminate expense without hurting the long-term vitality of those lines," Mr. Mockler says. 
Two of its business lines -- the manufacture of portable electric power tools and of gas meters -- could easily be spun off or sold.In 1986, these lines accounted for $294.5 million of Singer's $1.73 billion in revenue. 
If Singer does become a takeover target, a potential acquirer might have a relatively easy time gaining support from institutions, which own about 55% of Singer.While Singer's divestiture of its sewing line last year was hailed by shareholders and analysts, its top management hasn't always received the highest praise. 
In addition to common stock, Allied-Signal owns $200 million of Union Texas preferred stock that was purchased last year when Union Texas's cash flow fell below specified targets.Allied-Signal's second-quarter net income fell 22% to $148 million, or 85 cents a share, including profit from continuing operations of $111 million and a $37 million gain from the sale of discontinued lines. 
Tandon had been solely a maker of disk drives for IBM PCs, but decided to expand its business after posting hefty losses because of a glut in the disk drive market.However, the company had difficulties with its personal computer line domestically, and was hurt by the computer industry slump. 
Tandy Corp. unveiled additions to both the low end and high end of its computer line, including a powerful model that is priced about 20% lower than similar machines from International Business Machines Corp. and Compaq Computer Corp. 
As expected, the Fort Worth, Texas-based electronics retailer introduced a machine based on Intel Corp.'s 80386 microchip, which is becoming the standard chip for the highest performance IBM-compatible computers."They've broadened and strengthened their line, though there aren't any technological breakthroughs," said Eugene Glazer, analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. in New York. 
IBM's 80386 computers became available in June.Tandy introduced two additions to the low end of its line, aimed at two markets that are Tandy's traditional strength, schools and home users. 
DONNA RICE'S link to Gary Hart is starting to pay off.The Miami actress-model, whose relationship with Mr. Hart upset his presidential campaign, will appear in TV commercials and magazine ads this fall for a women's sportswear line called No Excuses. 
The beauty industry has been consolidating rapidly in recent years as drug companies have rushed to shed their cosmetics and fragrance businesses.Meanwhile, cosmetics and personal-care companies have snatched up the lines, preferring to buy established brands rather than build new ones from scratch. 
Avon hasn't changed its plans to expand but doesn't see any immediate candidates of Arden's size, he said.Early this year, Beecham Group PLC sold Diane Von Furstenberg fragrances to Revlon Group Inc. American Cyanamid Co. sold the Jacqueline Cochran fragrance and treatment lines, including the distribution rights to the Nina Ricci line, to Sanofi Inc. Squibb Corp. sold Charles of the Ritz Group Ltd. last November to Yves Saint Laurent, which in turn sold parts to Revlon months later. 
Revlon sold Bain de Soleil to Procter & Gamble Co.The few major beauty lines still owned by pharmaceutical companies include Schering-Plough Corp.'s Maybelline and Pfizer Inc.'s Coty line. 
"By using this approach, an investor can just about get his money back when the pool of equipment is sold," Mr. Smith says.In high technology, Phoenix Leasing Inc., a unit of Phoenix American Inc., San Rafael, Calif., says it cuts risk in its Cash Distribution Fund II by investing in 12 different lines of computers and peripheral equipment and leasing them mainly to Fortune 1000 companies. 
It's not a PCjr by any means," said Frank L. Bryant, president of Neeco Inc., a Canton, Mass., computer chain.While IBM officials and analysts said the company has had some success with its model 30 machine in the education market -- until now the low end of IBM's new PS/2 line -- the company faces stiff competition from both Tandy and Apple. 
Tandy officials wouldn't discuss details of the announcements.Also widely expected are new additions to the low-end of Tandy's computer line, which are aimed at the company's strongest markets, in education, small business and home computers.In addition, Tandy is expected to unveil a more powerful laptop computer to add to its already successful line. 
Terms weren't disclosed.Alfin stopped selling its skin-care lines last month and said it would take a pretax write-off of $15 million for its fourth quarter ended July 31, in addition to a third-quarter $4.6 million reserve, to cover costs of leaving the business. 
Tandy unveiled four additions to its computer line, including a powerful model priced 20% below similar machines by IBM and Compaq. 
Producing only one million barrels a year, Pittsburgh Brewing, which is a unit of Swan Brewing Co. of Australia isn't going to challenge giant Anheuser-Busch Cos.Still, Mr. Carota's job is becoming more complex as the brewery expands its line to 18 brands, including several beers (Samuel Adams Boston Lager, Pennsylvania Pilsner, Thirteen Colony Amber, Old Heurich) brewed under contract for other companies. 
SmithKline Beckman, based in Philadelphia, will own 60% and Sumitomo will own 40%.The joint venture will be based at SmithKline Beckman's Tokyo headquarters, and will develop and market the pharmaceutical concerns' lines of gastrointestinal, cold and analgesic products, including SmithKline's Contac and cimetidine, the active ingredient in Tagamet. 
The average price Chevron received for West Texas Intermediate, a benchmark product, rose to $18 a barrel from $14 a year ago; it currently is $20."Although benefiting our domestic exploration and production operations, this strengthening in crude oil prices hasn't helped our refining and marketing results," Mr. Keller added, noting that those lines were hurt by reduced returns on sales. 
But even when microwaved food looks and tastes acceptable, there can be unexpected snags.Gary Esbeck, marketing manager of frozen foods at Hormel, recalls that participants in a recent focus group in Kansas City, Kan., were suspicious of the authentic grill marks on his company's line of microwavable meats. 
Sales increased to $159.6 million from $116.5 million.Ronald J. Brown, senior vice president, marketing and sales, said the results reflect strong demand for the latest microcomputers -- Apple Computer Inc.'s Apple SE, International Business Machines Corp.'s Personal System 2 line and Compaq Computer Corp.'s new 386 machine. 
"There was some initial confusion when IBM announced the PS/2, but now there is major interest in the PS/2 and the other new microcomputers.At the same time, the whole line of older products, the PC-AT type products, is still strong." 
"It is our intention to own the company," said Howard Bermick, Alberto-Culver's executive vice president.Mr. Bermick said the proposed acquisition, if completed, would expand Alberto-Culver's retail and professional toiletries line. 
Mr. Kully says Western could raise its net by 25% annually for the next three years by boosting operating profit only 9% a year, "simply because interest will go down and goodwill amortization will go down."But he doubts the company can grow much faster than that, citing its need for more discipline and focus in its "helter-skelter" product development line. 
The exception is X-ray mammography equipment for the diagnosis of breast cancer."Thomson has a more complete line of mammography equipment," said Robert L. Stocking, vice president of marketing for GE's medical equipment group in Milwaukee. 
Compaq Computer Corp. reported that net income more than tripled in the second quarter on burgeoning sales of the company's high-end products.Sales climbed even after International Business Machines Corp. unveiled a line of competing computers April 2, a day after the period began. 
On June 30, however, the day Compaq's projection for the second quarter was made public, the shares jumped $3.375 to close at $46.875 a share.The results also strongly defied nay-sayers who said that Compaq might face a big slowdown in sales after IBM's new line of computers was introduced. 
Compaq Computer's profit more than tripled in the second quarter, exceeding expectations.Sales continued to increase despite IBM's introduction of a competing computer line. 
Ford Motor Co. said it will spend $900 million to develop a new line of auto or truck engines and retool its tractor plant in Romeo, Mich., to produce them. 
Coleco Industries Inc. has run into a hairy legal problem over a new line of its Cabbage Patch Kids. 
Putting nylon-rooted hair -- rather than braided cloth hair -- on Cabbage Patch dolls was its concept, Alberts says.According to Alberts, Coleco is paying royalties for using the concept on one popular line of dolls, but not on the Bubble Bath Babies line, which was introduced early this year. 
The suit also asked for unspecified monetary damages.Arthur Albert, who runs Alberts with his wife, said he has heard that a proposed "talking" Cabbage Patch line might also have nylon hair, and that he would expect royalty payments on that product, too. 
A week later, Clabir's General Defense unit said it would buy all of Hi-Shear's 5.9 million shares for $23.50 each.At that time, Clabir and General Defense Chairman Henry D. Clarke said Hi-Shear's new defense products fit well with General Defense's line of anti-tank weapons. 
Remind the comptroller that before he can create a bottom line, someone must generate the top line of the income statement.By having the sales representative do what he or she does best -- namely, meeting directly with the customer -- and by supporting that function with skilled people to do the automated administration for them via cellular phone connections, you can change the way your top line is created. 
Undistracted by the rabble, Mr. Smith ("Sinjin" to players and fans) stretches in a beach chair and awaits his first game.He wears blue and white togs from Sideout -- his personal sportswear line that is expected to have revenue of $5 million this year -- and lies under an umbrella bearing the name of a new sportswear shop he runs with his brothers and sisters in nearby Santa Monica. 
Nissan Motor Corp. plans to announce today a separate U.S. dealer network that will market an upscale car line, dealers familiar with the project said. 
Nissan Motor Corp. plans to announce today a separate U.S. dealer network that will market an upscale car line, dealers familiar with the project said.The move would make Nissan the second Japanese auto maker to opt for a separate dealer network in an effort to highlight a new line of cars. 
One dealer said Nissan told him that the sports coupe would be priced in the low-$30,000 range; the sedan may be priced in the mid-$30,000 range.He added that Nissan currently is considering introducing the line in the fall of 1988 as 1989 models. 
The new cars are expected to be powered by an eight-cylinder V8 engine, a move that would make Nissan the first Japanese auto maker to introduce a car with that large an engine in the U.S. Large engines can be very profitable for manufacturers because buyers are willing to pay more for the extra power.Persons familiar with Nissan's plans said the company could require some of the dealers in the new network to have separate facilities for the new car line, if their current dealership premises can't be geared to an upscale market. 
Stuart Hall Co. expects fiscal third-quarter net income to decline sharply because of competitive pricing of its school products line, said Charles G. Hanson, chairman and chief executive officer. 
But constitutional items should have a longer life, since the celebration runs through 1991."We think it has a lot of staying power," says Tom Elsbernd of Allen Co., Blanchester, Ohio, which offers a line of commemorative glassware. 
BRIEFS: The Second City's experimental theater group in Chicago opens a new revue, "Kukla, Fawn and Ollie, or Contra Hear Me Knocking." . . .A new line of exercise machines for children is called Future Force. 
International Business Machines Corp., in a move apparently aimed at shoring up lagging software development efforts, has formed a new software division.In addition, IBM has established a marketing unit that will focus on its midrange computer line, which has been under siege from rivals such as Digital Equipment Corp. 
Traditionally, IBM's bread-and-butter has been in operating systems for midrange and mainframe computers, the internal software instructions that guide the machines.The new Applications Systems Division will consolidate IBM's world-wide software development activities, and help outside software makers write programs for IBM's new line of personal computers, midrange systems and mainframe machines, said Joseph M. Guglielmi, president of the new division. 
He was assistant group executive, marketing and support, in IBM's big marketing arm, the Information Systems Group.Mr. Ford's appointment indicates concern on IBM's part over its midrange lines, which continued to have difficulty in the second quarter. 
BLACK & DECKER CORP. said it incorrectly stated in a recent interview that it was placing less emphasis on such personal-care products as hair dryers.In fact, the company said, hair dryers and other personal-care lines have already been eliminated. 
Mr. Schulman said he estimates that fourth-quarter orders rose 25% or more from the strong year-earlier level.He said the 9370 line of computers from International Business Machines Corp. doesn't appear to be hurting Digital's sales. 
Prime Computer Inc. said it added a more powerful system to its line of desk-side minicomputers. 
Comsat said it is negotiating with "several potential buyers" for the manufacturing units and the satellites.The company already has agreed to sell its Comsat International Communications subsidiary and remaining Comsat Technology Products lines. 
Merrill Lynch advanced 7/8 to 36 5/8.The brokerage firm was recommended by Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co., which cited its better-than-expected revenue in its mergers and acquisitions line in the second quarter. 
Sales rose to $2.8 billion from $2.5 billion last year.The figures for the 1986 quarter have been restated to exclude sales and expenses of discontinued lines. 
As of March 31, the most recent figure a spokesman said he could obtain, Ralston's debt totaled $1.49 billion.Much of that debt results from the company's $1.42 billion acquisition of Union Carbide Corp.'s battery division, which makes the Eveready line, in April 1986. 
In its fiscal first quarter ended May 2, Marcade earned $2.1 million, or seven cents a share, on revenue of $36.1 million.As previously reported, Marcade has agreed to acquire closely held Europe Craft Imports Inc., maker of the Members Only sportswear line, for undisclosed terms. 
Chrysler attributed the jump in operating earnings to cost-cutting moves and to higher profit margins from strong truck and minivan sales."We said we were going to put a heavier emphasis on trucks in this company, and move upscale to a richer product mix in our car lines," said Lee A. Iacocca, chairman and chief executive officer. 
Yet even Mr. Amerman's impressive international experience doesn't always prepare Mattel for the quirks of some foreign markets.The company recently started operations in India and was surprised to find that the Masters line and Hot Wheel cars far outsold the perennial star, Barbie. 
About $420 million of the total will be spent this year, he indicated.For example, Scott management will seek board approval soon for expanding production capacity in Dover, Del., for Softkins, a line of wet bathroom-tissue products aimed at adult markets. 
Apollo Computer Inc., Chelmsford, Mass., said it signed a multimillion-dollar agreement with Cetia S.A., a subsidiary of Thomson-CSF of France, under which Cetia will develop and market workstations based on Apollo computers and software.The contract calls for Apollo to deliver systems and servers from its Domain Series 3000 workstations and its DN500 line of graphics workstations over the next five years. 
The closing of the plant, which makes bias passenger and truck tires and radial light truck tires, will result in the layoff of 1,300 workers.The unit said any charges for the closing were included in a $65 million provision its parent took in last year's fourth quarter for the restructuring of its North American tire lines. 
Du Pont Co., Wilmington, Del., said it plans a $60 million expansion of manufacturing capacity for its Zytel line of nylon resins in Uentrop, West Germany. 
Mr. Exley said orders were "particularly strong" for the company's personal computers and Tower family of supermicrocomputers.The company in May bolstered its personal computer line with three new computers and a workstation, including one based on Intel Corp.'s powerful 80386 microprocessor. 
The household appliance company's net in the quarter fell to $47.4 million, or 65 cents a share, from $52.4 million, or 71 cents a share, in the 1986 second quarter.The company blamed the decline on, among other things, the depreciation and engineering costs of introducing a line of KitchenAid refrigerators and laundry appliances in the first quarter. 
Alco Standard Corp. said it plans to sell its Alco Beverage Co. unit, Alco Gift and Glassware subsidiary and Alco Packaging and Metalsource Corp.'s steel distribution operations.The lines represent almost 15% of the company's total revenue. 
But a dealer, a large customer and several IBM insiders confirm that an announcement is nigh.IBM had seemed to abandon the low end of the personal computer market when it introduced its new Personal System/2 line in early April. 
But "they still were making money on the XT, and IBM does not leave money on the table," said Bob Orbach, director of business development at 47th Street Computer, a New York retailer.IBM is expected to bring out a machine that uses the same central processor as the XT, has the same color monitor as the machine that is at the low end of the company's new PC line, according to the industry executives. 
Historically, IBM remains flexible until the last possible moment on the pricing and configuration of a new product, so the industry sources caution that their information is somewhat speculative.Though IBM's new line of personal computers has done moderately well, it is by no means certain that a new low-end machine would succeed. 
Tandy said it thinks it would continue to hold a price advantage over IBM."You're competing with equipment that's available . . . in Tandy's line from $599 up, and we discount," said Ed Juge, director of market planning at Tandy. 
"You're competing with equipment that's available . . . in Tandy's line from $599 up, and we discount," said Ed Juge, director of market planning at Tandy.Separately, dealers said IBM has begun offering additional discounts on its new line of personal computers and has begun paying freight charges. 
That was much less than expected, analysts said, and reflected heavy discounting in response to competition.IBM said both orders and shipments increased during the quarter, and singled out its new line of personal computers as showing particular strength. 
IBM said its after-tax profit margin fell to 8.4% from 10.4% in the 1986 half.In the second half, IBM is expected to benefit as it starts to ship in volume the new versions of its 3090 mainframes, its 9370 minicomputers and some products in its new personal computer line. 
Ford Motor Co., Dearborn, Mich., said it is investing $563 million in a new line of light trucks and the expansion of its Louisville, Ky., truck assembly plant to accommodate production of the trucks.The auto maker said $260 million will be used for the expansion, and $303 million will be used for development, engineering and other costs related to the truck line. 
Heinz said the transaction is subject to completion of a definitive agreement.Champion Valley Farms, based in Bloomsburg, Pa., makes a line dog food products marketed under the "Recipe" brand. 
The PC1, which will arrive on the Italian market this month, has a base price of one million lire ($750).Its operating program makes it compatible with models made by INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS MACHINES CORP. and other main computer lines. 
As part of the agreement, Cooper will acquire certain rights to use the Joy name and trademark in connection with the acquired business.Cooper, a maker of tools and compression and drilling equipment, said the new businesses complement its existing compressor lines and should improve its market position and extend the horsepower range it can offer in certain types of compressors. 
From a 52-week low of 26, Microsoft shares nearly quintupled to a peak closing price of 126 1/2 reached May 8, ranking the stock as one of the great stories of the current bull market.Behind the move: strong sales of personal computer clones that also use the PC operating system Microsoft developed for International Business Machines, and IBM's decision to use Microsoft software in its new PC line. 
But now he believes the risk is on the downside.With second-quarter PC software business down 5% to 10% from the March quarter and third-quarter prospects uncertain due to customer confusion about the new IBM line, the Roberston Colman analyst says, "there is going to be an unusual lack of visibility at a time when investors needed some comfort." 
Since 1984, Mattel has tried to focus on toys, abandoning its electronics and entertainment businesses.Recently, Mattel has been hurt by slumping demand in the U.S. for its Masters of the Universe and Rainbow Brite toy lines. 
The operating system is software that directs some of a computer's basic operations.The OS/2 system, scheduled for release in the 1988 first quarter, was announced April 2, the same day International Business Machines Corp. unveiled its Personal System/2 computer line. 
Northern Telecom Ltd. is expected to unveil today a new line of digital telephone switch hardware and software that doubles the current voice and data processing capacity of its existing switches. 
In early May, the New York attorney general's office said it was investigating Alfin's advertising claims for Glycel.In late May, Alfin said it would refocus its business back to fragrances, its original business, and said it had hired Bear, Stearns & Co. to study alternatives including the sale of the skin-care line. 
In late May, Alfin said it would refocus its business back to fragrances, its original business, and said it had hired Bear, Stearns & Co. to study alternatives including the sale of the skin-care line.Besides Glycel, Alfin's skin-care line includes Birthright cosmetics for pregnant women, and Irma Shorell, a diversified line of cosmetics that Alfin acquired in 1985. 
International Minerals & Chemical Corp. said its Mallinckrodt Inc. unit is divesting a handful of peripheral businesses as part of an effort to focus on lines with higher profit margins and stronger market positions. 
International Minerals & Chemical Corp. said its Mallinckrodt Inc. unit is divesting a handful of peripheral businesses as part of an effort to focus on lines with higher profit margins and stronger market positions.Proceeds from the sale of the various lines are expected to exceed $100 million, the company said. 
Terms of the two transactions weren't disclosed.In addition, Mallinckrodt has put its Forma Scientific laboratory-equipment business and its barium gastrointestinal imaging-products line on the block, International Minerals said. 
Sun Microsystems Inc. is slated to introduce today a new line of high-performance workstations that provide the horsepower of conventional minicomputers costing 10 times as much. 
In April, Sun chopped the price on its low-end workstation 37% to less than $5,000, a move that has since been matched by its main competitors, Apollo Computer Inc. and Digital Equipment.The company also recently announced a line of communications products that can connect a full array of personal computers, workstations, minicomputers, mainframes and supercomputers. 
Between 40% and 50% of Data Translation's products are used in International Business Machines Corp. personal computers, or IBM compatible machines.Mr. Molinari said the company is designing products for the IBM PS/2 line of personal computers, as well as for Apple Computer Co.'s new Macintosh II. 
For Texas Instruments, the agreement is one of its first major announcements to flesh out a business strategy the company outlined in December, emphasizing alliances with other semiconductor makers.Intel is an obvious choice in that strategy, analysts said, because Texas Instruments' line of semiconductors is weakest where Intel's is strongest. 
"This gives rise to hope," Mr. Mandresh said.The bullish analysts said many IBM customers ordered the company's new 3090E line, a series of enhanced versions of its mainframe computers, and many others upgraded their existing machines. 
He added that, "by the 1990s, concern about IBM's dominance of the industry will resurface."Still, it remains to be seen how fully customers will adopt the 9370 mid-range line and IBM's new line of personal computers. 
Sun Microsystems will unveil today a line of computer workstations it hopes will be the industry standard. 
Mr. Schafer moves quickly to suit his shoppers' tastes.When the AIDS epidemic struck, he introduced a line of key chains bearing plastic-encased condoms and the message, "In case of AIDS, break glass."When Saks Fifth Avenue made a splash with S.F.A. T-shirts, South of the Border's T-shirt shop introduced the S.O.B. fashion line. 
The company will add a new melting furnace, upgrade an existing furnace and install new glass-forming equipment.An additional 100 jobs are expected as a result of the improvements, which will allow the plant to add to its line of scientific glassware. 
E-II, to be headed by former Esmark Chairman Donald P. Kelly, is an offshoot of closely held Beatrice.The new company, which contains Beatrice's non-food businesses, such as Samsonite luggage and Stiffel lamps, and some smaller specialty-food lines, will be used primarily as a vehicle for acquisitions. 
He couldn't be reached yesterday for comment.The new company contains Beatrice's non-food businesses, such as Samsonite luggage and Stiffel lamps, and some its smaller specialty-food lines. 
She owns a London wine bar and recently bought a big house in the country, where she plans to install herself and the entire family (Mum, Dad, kid sis and the dogs).She's also launched a line of cosmetics. 
At a news conference scheduled for today at the Marriott Marquis Hotel in New York, Compaq will roll out some computer industry royalty -- its own president, Rod Canion, plus a triumvirate of software princes: Chairmen William Gates of Microsoft Corp., Edward M. Esber of Ashton-Tate Co. and Jim P. Manzi of Lotus Development Corp.The purpose: to put out the word that the new line of computers from International Business Machines Corp. hasn't locked Compaq computers out of important future advances in software. 
Applications software, such as spreadsheets and word processors, is written to fit "over" the operating system.OS/2 was introduced April 2 along with the new line of computers from IBM. 
While it isn't out yet, Microsoft says it will run on computers currently available, like those made by Compaq and others, as well as on the new IBM models that deviate in some ways from the standard design that Compaq uses.Compaq apparently thinks some computer buyers believe OS/2 can only be used on the new IBM line. 
If buyers are confused, it isn't surprising.For one thing, the new IBM line is, not coincidentally, called PS/2. 
What's more, while Microsoft has done most of the development on OS/2, IBM is making some slight alterations and will put out its own version, called IBM OS/2.In its public statements, IBM hasn't denied that OS/2 will run on computers made by Compaq and others, but it says the system will run faster and with clearer graphics on the new IBM line. 
"I find a lot of my clients equate PS/2 with OS/2 and figure everyone else is out in the cold."Industry watchers say IBM may well be right that OS/2 will run better on the new PS/2 line, which includes some hardware enhancements that other computer makers don't have yet. 
The acquisition will allow Bell Atlantic to start a new leasing unit for medical equipment, particularly medical imaging devices, the spokesman said.The company intends to fold National Funding's other leasing lines into Tricon. 
Mr. Johnson said that the company hasn't any immediate plans to make an acquisition and that it hasn't acquired a new company for at least 10 years."We've had all that we can do to improve the lines that we're in," he said. 
Earlier this month, BSN entered negotiations to acquire Medalist Industries Inc., a Milwaukee-based maker of commercial and industrial products, for $25 a share.Last year, BSN purchased Medalist's protective equipment division, adding it to its line of cheerleader supplies and its Tennis Lady Inc. chain of athletic clothing stores. 
A Fireman's Fund spokeswoman said the decision applies to all kinds of insurance written by Fireman's Fund and its affiliates."Massachusetts doesn't allow a company to withdraw from just one line," the spokeswoman said. 
"We've never handled Toshiba.We don't have a need for the line," said Warren G. Hyman, chairman of Newmark & Lewis Inc., a retail chain based in Hicksville, N.Y. 
He runs a pro tournament in Los Angeles for Volvo, is chairman of the Southern California Tennis Association, and is active in junior-development programs for the U.S. Tennis Association.Perhaps most notably, Wilson Sporting Goods Co., with whom he has been associated since he turned pro, just came out with a new line of mid-sized graphite rackets that will bear his name. 
Compaq computers range in price from about $2,000 to about $9,000.The increases -- similar to gains the company has registered in previous quarters -- indicate that Compaq's products are faring well despite new competition and uncertainty created by International Business Machines Corp.'s new line of personal computers that debuted on April 2. 
The microprocessor is a complex of integrated circuits on one silicon chip that performs the computer's basic computations.Mr. Canion was cautious, however, about drawing conclusions regarding the success of the new IBM line. 
CCX, a maker of tool steel, glass fiber and wire screening, said the charge consists mainly of a $9,870,000 write-down of assets and closing expenses related to certain domestic and foreign specialty steel operations.The company also had another, smaller one-time charge and some profit from discontinued lines in the quarter. 
Volvo Cars, a Dutch auto maker, is owned 70% by the Dutch government and 30% by Volvo, a Swedish auto maker.The Dutch Economics Ministry said that as part of the debt rescheduling, a second dedicated trust would be created to help fund future model lines. 
Mr. Krumm said in an interview that slowly rising interest rates and a downturn in the housing industry will hurt the industry after four years of record sales.Mr. Krumm said the Magic Chef acquisition moved Maytag into the major appliance lines in which it wants to be, such as refrigerators and ranges. 
He said one reason for the expected gain is that the company expects to benefit from the new federal tax law.Mr. Atwater attributed the gains largely to strong increases in unit volume and market share by the food and restaurant company's packaged food lines, including cereals, flour, Betty Crocker baking and dessert mixes and Gorton's frozen seafood. 
Before the 1986 fourth quarter, the ailing auto maker's most recent profit was in the 1984 fourth quarter.Mr. Cappy made the forecast here while introducing part of AMC's 1988-model line. 
"Perelman wants this company bad enough that he's willing to pay enough to get it," said one person close to the Revlon chairman.Mr. Perelman has argued that combining Revlon's cosmetics products with Gillette's lines would create one of the world's most formidable consumer-products companies. 
In the past five months, no fewer than five bids have been made for Becor, a century-old Rust Belt fixture in South Milwaukee, Wis.Becor's excavation equipment lines are well regarded, and they fit well with most of the suitors' businesses. 
The spokeswoman added that the company is notifying existing policyholders their policies will be canceled in 60 days.She said Liberty isn't writing any new workers' compensation policies in the state but it will continue to handle other lines. 
KRAFT INC. said it completed the previously reported acquisition of the Anderson Clayton Foods division from Quaker Oats Co. for $235 million.The Glenview, Ill.-based food concern said the unit, which includes the Chiffon margarine and Seven Seas salad dressing lines, had sales of $433 million in fiscal 1986. 
Caterpillar Inc. said it was selected by Navistar International Corp., a Chicago-based truck manufacturer, to supply fuel system components for Navistar's future line of diesel engines. 
Current sales: 1,000 meals a month.Two Minneapolis-area hospitals plan national distribution this year of their Nutritious Cuisine line, made by a local food processor.American Hospital Supply Corp. plans a line of special-diet meals to help increase hospital food-service revenues. 
American Hospital Supply Corp. plans a line of special-diet meals to help increase hospital food-service revenues.NutraCare Inc., Newport Beach, Calif., expands its line of hospital-marketed meals, hoping hospitals themselves will begin using them for patients. 
J Boats Inc., Newport, R.I., predicts sales of 22-foot to 36-foot sailboats will double in the next 10 years.Still, some sailboat makers hedge their bets by starting powerboat lines; others drop their sailboat lines altogether. 
Parker G. Montgomery, chairman and architect of a series of such spinoffs of CooperVision companies over the past several years, said the proposed actions are designed to "help maximize shareholder value."The company's eye-care products line had sales of $162 million in fiscal 1986. 
Your May 7 story on ITT Corp.'s potential sale to an investor of its telex line and its merger with Western Union stated that if the LeBow group also bought the telex business of RCA Corp., the resulting combination of all three telex businesses would result in MCI Communications Corp.'s being the only remaining U.S.-based competitor in the international telex business. 
Ing.C. Olivetti & Co. introduced a line of six personal computers designed to compete with a group of machines unveiled in April by International Business Machines Corp. 
Both can be used either in local-area networks or alone.In addition, the line includes a workstation called the S-281 for use in networks and a low-end, stand-alone model called the M-240. 
"It will be a record year in terms of (unit) volume and revenue" for IBM personal computer sales, Mr. Lowe said.He added that IBM has increased its sales forecast for the machines since the April 2 introduction of the PS/2 line. 
In composite New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, IBM closed at $164.875 a share, up $1.625, and was the third most-active issue with 2.2 million shares changing hands.Earlier this month, rumors were widespread that the PS/2 line was selling poorly and that its new operating system -- the software that controls the basic functions and promises enhanced capabilities for the IBM computers -- would be delayed. 
The availability of the special IBM-designed version of the operating system, which will give the new computers features that makers of less expensive compatible machines can't easily copy, will be announced in the fourth quarter.Mr. Lowe also indicated that most of IBM's old personal computer line will be phased out by the end of the year. 
As foolish as the question may seem, Rep. Wyden's bill is sillier still.We might avoid much legislative nonsense if he and other congressmen would learn a basic truth of economics: Any attribution of costs, and therefore profits, to different lines in a multi-product firm is entirely arbitrary. 
Ford's sales jumped 14.1% in mid-June.A number of its car lines, including the Crown Victoria and Taurus, posted gains. 
GM may allow inventories to remain high as leverage against a possible strike by the United Auto Workers union during contract talks that start in July.Still, the excess of 1987 models crowding dealer lots could hinder GM's efforts to introduce its 1988-model line this fall, which is why many analysts expect more financing incentives or bigger production cuts. 
Ramada Inc., adding budget motels to its current line of midpriced and high-priced lodgings, said it acquired Parkmount Hospitality Corp. and its 160 Rodeway Inns in the U.S. from a unit of London-based Ladbroke Group PLC. 
After a three-year string of successes in the European computer market, AMSTRAD CONSUMER ELECTRONICS PLC of Britain has encountered its first major sales disappointment.A spokesman for the fast-growing company confirmed that sales of an important new computer line are running below original expectations. 
Unconfirmed reports of the sales setback, circulated by London financial analysts, had wiped #280 million ($450 million), or 23%, off Amstrad's stock-market value in the past three weeks.The computer line, Amstrad's PC-1512 range of personal computers, compatible with the industry-standard International Business Machines Corp. PC, was launched last September with great fanfare. 
Marcade Group Inc., an apparel maker, said it agreed to acquire closely held Europe Craft Imports Inc., which makes the Members Only sportswear line. 
No one considers the strong-willed Mr. Sarni a pushover.He wins praise from analysts and shareholderas as a cost-cutter who has expanded overseas sales and moved the company from slow growing commodity-type businesses into higher-margin specialty lines. 
Stauffer's specialty-chemical division makes lubricants, flame retardants, additives for the synthetic-rubber industry and catalysts for the petrochemical industry.All are sectors that exist within Akzo's lines. 
American Brands agreed to buy ACCO World Corp., an office-supply concern, for $29 a share, or $602 million.The purchase continues American Brands' aggressive acquisition of consumer-products lines. 
Though Bausch & Lomb argued against the recall, it said the court order wouldn't affect its finances because retail inventories of the solution are small.The Rochester-based company said it had already introduced an improved line of saline solutions known as Hypo-Clear. 
The Dutch electronics maker already supplies LCD screens for computer, industrial and professional applications.Japanese electronics companies have been producing televisions with five-centimeter LCD screens; Philips plans to launch a line of sets with six-centimeter LCD screens later this year. 
The family of David Grutman, a Barco vice president, has agreed to tender to the Donners the 600,000 shares it controls, Barco said.Michael Donner said the family hasn't any immediate plans to expand the company, but will develop existing lines of the business, founded by the elder Mr. Donner's stepfather in 1929. 
Most of the charge in the current period stems from a decision to halt production of a disk drive, Quantum said, and as a result, it intends to dismiss 29 employees, or about 3% of its work force.Quantum said it canceled the product as part of an effort to concentrate on its core line of disk drives and development of higher-performance, smaller disk drives. 
Among the more attractive assets that could be sold is the mail-handling equipment business.Mr. Boksen estimates the line alone could fetch between $250 million and $300 million. 
Pennwalt Corp. said it agreed in principle to acquire a line of fungicides, insecticides and herbicides and their related manufacturing facilities from Le Raffineries de Soufre Reunies of Marseilles, France. 
Fleet said it also acquired the lease for Equipment Finance's offices in New York and agreed to retain its staff of 40.Providence, R.I.-based Fleet Financial is a bank holding company operating several lines of financial services, including commercial and trust banking, mortgage banking, real estate lending, investment banking and data processing. 
Fremont earlier took a $31.4 million charge against third-quarter earnings to cover potential losses from certain discontinued operations.Moody's said its review will focus on Fremont's off-balance-sheet exposure and the adequacy of its reserves for discontinued lines. 
A few interactive toys are already on the market.A line of "Captain Power" figures from Mattel Inc., for example, can exchange infrared gunfire with the villains in a new cartoon show. 
He hasn't eliminated enough jobs, many analysts say, and he has also been criticized for unveiling some products too soon.For instance, IBM's new line of personal computers were introduced in April, while the line's new operating system won't be available until next month. 
Later on, it is expected to roll out operating-system software that would even more sharply increase the processing speed and would finally let programmers take advantage of some of the fancy new features of the current hardware.Then, by 1990, IBM is expected to announce a whole new line of mainframes, starting the product cycle all over again and making its competitors play catch-up for a while. 
Advertising agency J. Walter Thompson Co., which has endured a string of recent account losses, yesterday lost PepsiCo Inc.'s Slice soft drink line. 
The human group was paced by an 18% rise in its naproxen and naproxen sodium anti-arthritic drugs.The company's diagnostics lines showed an 8% sales increase, while sales of animal-health products rose 7% from a year ago. 
"This could be a terrific opportunity for good value, mid-priced brands to reassert themselves," says Nancy Posternak, managing director of strategic services at Thompson."People still will splurge on a European car or the top-of-the line stereo system, but they may choose a lower-priced dishwasher or TV set if the brand is perceived as a good buy." 
The company also said the base prices for its 1988-model cars will be an average 1.7%, or $195, higher than 1987 models.Chrysler has been announcing prices piecemeal but yesterday gave firm prices for its entire model line. 
"You don't normally see price reductions in the model year, you usually see incentives."The company's pricing moves are meant to increase buyer interest in Chrysler's slow-selling line. 
C. Olivetti & Co., the Italian computer maker, is bracing for trouble following the stock-market crash, but company executives said they remain optimistic about a revival of sagging profits next year.To speed its expected comeback, Europe's second-biggest maker of personal computers yesterday introduced a line of powerful minicomputers and a new marketing strategy designed to increase its slipping share of world computer sales. 
Analysts predict net income will fall as much as a third this year, from 565.5 billion lire in 1986.One problem has been flat sales of Olivetti's five-year-old line of minicomputers.The new line of minicomputers shown yesterday seeks to boost Olivetti's minicomputer sales by 50% annually over the next two years, Mr. Levi said. 
A lawyer for Elizabeth Taylor Co. couldn't be reached for comment.Unilever Group's ChesebroughPond's Inc. unit, which distributes and licenses Ms. Taylor's line of perfumes, said it wouldn't comment until it has reviewed the opinion. 
Fidelity Investments is preparing a major expansion of its year-old line of Plymouth funds and, in effect, is hiring its competitors as its sales force. 
It traditionally has sold its funds through direct marketing techniques, such as newspaper and magazine advertising backed by a telephone network.Although the company clearly isn't abandoning such methods, it is looking to broker-dealers to sell the new fund line. 
That compares with $3.3 billion through direct marketing.To try to tap that market, Fidelity last year rounded up a "pilot group" of 12 brokerage firms, financial planners and others to sell the Plymouth line. 
All Plymouth portfolios are run by Fidelity managers, or what William T. Ryan, Plymouth's general manager, calls "the first team."In fact, the first Plymouth fund, the Special Situations Fund, was a well-established Fidelity capital-appreciation portfolio that was moved over to anchor the Plymouth line. 
Kaypro Corp., which entered the computer sales market in 1982 with a line of transportable computers, said it discontinued the line, and partly as a result, the computer products concern posted a fiscal fourth-quarter net loss. 
Kaypro Corp., which entered the computer sales market in 1982 with a line of transportable computers, said it discontinued the line, and partly as a result, the computer products concern posted a fiscal fourth-quarter net loss.Kaypro said the line of transportables, which are larger and bulkier than portable machines, was dropped because of "competitive pressures and the amount of sales effort" required to promote it.The line accounted for only about 5% of Kaypro's sales of $105.6 million for the fiscal year ended Aug. 28, a company spokeswoman said. 
In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Kaypro shares closed at $1.0625, down 0.1875 cents.Sales of the Kaypro transportable line have dwindled in recent years, as smaller, lighter-weight laptop computers have gained popularity. 
Kaypro has focused lately on other computer products, and in 1985 introduced its personal computer that is compatible with International Business Machines Corp.'s PC AT, marketing it primarily to small businesses and professionals.Andrew F. Kay, Kaypro chairman, said eliminating the transportable line would allow the company to concentrate on marketing of "a smaller group of mainstream technology computers." 
Goodyear's departure from Thompson was expected; the tire maker had said in June it would leave Thompson if WPP's bid succeeded.Although Goodyear will move most of its account to New York-based Young & Rubicam, a closely held ad agency, Thompson will keep the company's high-performance tire line. 
In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Ashton-Tate's stock fell $2 to $17.50.Ashton-Tate cited strong sales of its MultiMate word processing software line and "rapid acceptance" of its dBASE Mac, a database management software product for users of Apple Computer Inc.'s Macintosh model. 
The company said it expects to bring to market in 1988 new products which it predicted will "have a significant impact on the computer industry."A spokesman said the company is planning another generation of its dBASE line, additional products for the Macintosh, and more software aimed at letting dBASE users on a personal computer access information stored on larger systems. 
DeVilbiss accounted for $250 million, or about 28%, of Champion's total 1986 sales of $883.8 million.But the unit had a loss last year, and analysts have said its lines of auto-painting systems and health-care products didn't match well with Champion's basic auto-parts business. 
Prestolite also will purchase buildings and land in Arcade, N.Y., where the products are made.Motorola said that the two lines no longer fit its business strategy and that their sale is part of the company's plan to focus on high-technology electronics. 
Sears also will develop a Disney brand of merchandise.Sears's line of Winnie-the-Pooh clothes and accessories, developed under a previous 22-year-old exclusive licensing agreement with Disney, has generated sales of more than $1 billion in the past decade, the company said. 
Eastman Kodak Co. said it will begin marketing a new line of medical kits to be used in physicians' offices to test for pregnancy and various infectious diseases. 
Olivetti, Europe's second-largest supplier of personal computers, was "trying to convince everybody that whatever IBM {International Business Machines Corp., the first-ranking supplier} can do, they can do better," recalls customer John Heaps, deputy general manager of Britannia Building Society, a British thrift institution.The Olivetti sales pitch succeeded: A few weeks later, Britannia spent #4 million ($7.2 million) on a new line of Olivetti personal computers for its tellers. 
The most powerful model -- which Olivetti bought from Scottsdale, Ariz.-based Edge Computer Corp. -- crunches numbers about four times faster than Olivetti's existing "Line 1" minicomputers.The Edge model is expected to cost more than twice the 50 million lire of Olivetti's top-priced mini in its current line. 
Among other things, analysts say, it risks confusing customers and dealers because its Line 2 machines also may compete with minicomputers it already markets in Europe for AT&T.The expected unveiling of the new minicomputer line, along with September's introduction of a line of new Olivetti personal computers, seems to correct one of Olivetti's biggest problems this year. 
ICI has folded the agrichemicals business into its ICI Americas Inc. unit, based in Wilmington, Del.Then, in short order, ICI sold Stauffer's specialty-chemical line, to Akzo N.V. of the Netherlands for $625 million, and agreed to sell the basic-chemicals business, to France's state-owned Rhone-Poulenc S.A. for $505 million. 
Yet Mr. McDonald has brought some surprises of his own.Since the annual meeting, he has backed off a rosy earnings projection and delayed the introduction of a new computer line, and the company has said it is the subject of a Securities and Exchange Commission investigation. 
Brokerage houses are rolling out a new line of defensive investment products and strategies to appeal to investors still quaking from the Oct. 19 stock-market crash. 
Last year, for example, the company announced a "silver parachute" plan to help protect all company employees -- not just executives -- in case of a hostile takeover.The company also pioneered the open office concept with its "Action Office" line of furniture.That line is being succeeded by a line of flexible office components called Ethospace, which was introduced in 1985 and uses removable tiles to adjust to different situations. 
But the Omni and Horizon account for less than 40% of Chrysler's sales drop, and the addition of American Motors car sales -- where year-to-year comparisons are terrible -- for only an additional 15%.The problem also lies in such places as Chrysler's midsize LeBaron line, which has had flat sales this year, even though it has been expanded to four models from two. 
Commodore International Ltd., West Chester, Pa., said fiscal first-quarter net income jumped 70% on increased sales of its Amiga line of computers, but revenue edged down 1.2%. 
Shipments of two of the three Amiga models began only this year.Mr. Gould said sales also were strong for another line, its PC-compatible computers. 
But its task is formidable.The company's model 64 computer is mature, and its personal-computer line is up against stiff competition from giants like International Business Machines Corp., Apple Computer Inc. and Tandy Corp. 
Lexus cars, which will cost in the low $30,000 range, will be introduced in an increasingly crowded marketplace.They will compete not only with established luxury cars but with Honda Motor Co.'s new Acura line and Nissan Motor Corp.'s planned Infiniti luxury cars, which it intends to introduce in 1989. 
International Business Machines Corp. said it upgraded its line of System/88 computers. 
Daihatsu will originally limit sales to eight Western states, and its product line will include only three separate models, which the company describes as in the high range of "entry-level" cars.But it said it will eventually expand throughout the country and may offer a full line. 
Quaker Oats Co. said it's considering bidding on certain of Beatrice Co.'s food lines. 
Quaker Oats Co. said it's considering bidding on certain of Beatrice Co.'s food lines.William D. Smithburg, chairman and chief executive officer, told reporters after the company's annual meeting yesterday that he's interested in such Beatrice lines as Hunt tomato products, Wesson cooking oils and Tropicana juices.But he said he hasn't decided to make a bid for any of the lines. 
I'm sure Mr. Silverglade inadvertently overlooked the fact that Campbell has sold low-sodium soups for years.Also, this past summer we brought out a line of "Special Request" soups with one-third less salt. 
Sales rose 29% to $59.7 million from $46.2 million.Talley said the loss included charges of $19.8 million from discontinued operations, reflecting anticipated losses in the planned divestitures of Talley's slow-growing consumer lines. 
The 12-acre facility produces chemicals used in the personal care, detergent, agricultural and oil-field chemical industries.National Distillers is an energy and chemicals concern here; the company has shed its distilling lines and has said it plans to change its name, effective Jan. 1, to Quantum Chemical Corp., subject to shareholder approval. 
The survival rate for most new toys is pretty dismal.But Tyco Toys Inc. has devised a marketing strategy for one of its new toy lines that sounds practically suicidal. 
Even though Christmas gifts account for roughly 60% of all toy sales, the company is ignoring the holiday altogether this year.Not until Dec. 26 will it begin a $10 million advertising and promotional push for its Dino-Riders line of dinosaur action figures. 
Moreover, kids will be itchy to spend holiday gift money and will probably have a few presents they want to exchange as well.Robert Lurie, Tyco's vice president of advertising, says the post-Christmas introduction of the Dino-Riders line is primarily a marketing decision, but he concedes that production delays also influenced the timing."About two-thirds of the line could have been ready for Christmas," he says, "but if we had hurried it, the quality and authenticity of the dinosaurs might not have been as good." 
In 1986, IBM's fourth-quarter earnings dropped 48% to $1.39 billion, or $2.28 a share.Most analysts expect much stronger earnings in the current quarter primarily because of lower expenses and new products such as the company's new personal computer line and its model 9370 mid-range computer.However, Mr. Akers said that IBM's mainframe line -- the model 3090 -- would show only slight growth for the year. 
GM said the move, in addition to other things, helps the company ensure that workers keep their skills sharp.The auto maker said the cutbacks will be particularly apparent in the Celebrity and Cutlass Ciera model lines. 
A Medalist spokesman said the company hasn't had contact with BSN in a while and that BSN is leaving its options open by saying it might seek control of Medalist while lowering its stake.The filing said that should BSN increase its stake, it may seek representation or even majority representation on Medalist's board, or sell certain lines of Medalist's business "not complementing BSN's current businesses." 
Toyota already makes about 200 Corolla FX and FX-16 model cars a day in with General Motors Corp. at a joint venture plant in Fremont, Calif.The engines in both those lines are 1.6 liter. 
The company, taken private last year by its management and Merrill Lynch, also concerns analysts.Public documents indicate that the company's earnings are far behind projections, largely because of continuing softness in the trailer and container businesses -- its principal lines. 
At a national hardware show in Chicago, the company recently exhibited about 30 new power-tool products and an expanded group of accessories.Among them is a patented line of drill bits called "Bullet," which the company hopes will have the same impact as its popular "Piranha" line of circular saw blades. 
Sun Microsystems Inc., which previously sold its line of technical workstations through its own direct sales force, said it is signing up outside resellers to help it broaden distribution. 
The products on display here have convinced participants that the industry will maintain this year's 30% to 35% growth rate for at least a few months even if the rest of the economy falters.Various products have supplied some of the missing pieces for International Business Machines Corp.'s new line of personal computers. 
LAS VEGAS, Nev. -- Unisys Corp. introduced a line of personal computers that brings it up to date with competitors and gives it a basis for expansion in this field. 
Unisys lost 1/2 to 33 1/2.The computer maker introduced a line of personal workstations. 
For some, that means offering bigger-ticket items, such as a $295,000 lynx coat.For others, it means selling X-rated products, including a line of anatomically shaped chocolates. 
There's even a taped "Hot Shopper" program in New York featuring X-rated products for cable-dish owners.A producer says sales totaled $40,000 in September, but the line of anatomically shaped chocolates had to be eliminated because the candies melted during shipment to a Florida consumer. 
The "extended" version of OS/2 includes features that make it far easier for personal computers to talk to mainframes and extract data from them.It was promised at IBM's April announcement of its new line of personal computers and is a major feature of IBM's push to lock up the corporate market. 
Whenever they appear, the applications will finally bring to a head a simmering war of words between IBM and its competitors, notably Compaq Computer Corp. of Houston.IBM has been saying it thinks the new software will run faster on its new line of computers than on competitors', but Compaq and others have said IBM was just blowing smoke. 
AST said there was no recovery of profits, damages or attorneys' fees in the settlement.The IBM lawsuit against AST is part of the computer maker's aggressive legal campaign to protect its new line of personal computers from clones. 
Technology stocks were mixed.International Business Machines fell 2 5/8 to 121 7/8 although the computer maker said the operating system for its new line of personal computers would be released ahead of schedule. 
Christian Lacroix's flashy, billowy clothes are as cumbersome as the gowns Marie Antoinette's ladies-in-waiting dressed her in.Last week, Mr. Lacroix, the hot French designer, brought his fall 1987 line here for a charity fashion show at the World Financial Center in lower Manhattan. 
Electrolux, which isn't affiliated with AB Electrolux of Sweden, has annual sales of about $400 million.As previously reported, the Electrolux unit didn't fit with Chicago-based Sara Lee's lines in packaged non-durable consumer products. 
Orange-co Inc., a citrus grower, processor and shipper, acquired its first juice line by purchasing Premium Juices of Florida Inc., Lakeland, Fla. 
Occasionally, he even loses the grace and simplicity that characterize his best work: In one set of coats, the shoulders are so awkwardly padded they look as if the coat hangers have been left in by mistake.Marketing the Zaitsev line here should be an enjoyable challenge. 
The group also said it would consider filing with federal antitrust regulators for clearance to boost its stake.The group, which has held talks with investment bankers regarding some of the possible actions, said it would consider selling certain Atlas lines and properties, should it gain control. 
Singer is considered by analysts to be an excellent takeover target.While the company's divestiture of its sewing line last year was hailed by shareholders and analysts, its top management hasn't always received the highest praise. 
Meanwhile, demand for the Omni and Horizon models is very strong.Sales of the subcompacts rose sharply after Chrysler cut their price early in 1986, but Chrysler had to stop building them last March when it began retooling the Belvidere, Ill., plant where they were made for a new line of luxury cars. 
One General Motors Corp. plant remains down for model changeover this week.The Doraville, Ga., plant will begin output of a new line of mid-size cars late next month, a company spokeswoman said. 
The latest results, which exceeded analysts' earnings estimates of about 81 cents a share, indicate that Compaq's computers sold well even as competition from International Business Machines Corp. heated up.IBM introduced a new line of computers April 2, but many of the models weren't available in large quantities until later in the summer. 
Singer shares traded at a 52-week high of $59 in September.Though analysts hailed Singer's divestiture last year of its sewing line, they still consider the company to be an excellent takeover target. 
Northern Telecom Ltd. said it is forming a new venture with two French concerns to manufacture and distribute its SL1 line of private branch exchanges in France. 
Third-quarter operating profit from Tenneco's energy businesses rose to $101 million from $77 million a year earlier.Its manufacturing businesses had a loss from operations of $52 million, compared with year-earlier profit from operations of $101 million, on lower results from its Newport News Shipbuilding unit and a "significant" deficit at its Case IH tractor unit, which posted losses from discounting a line of tractors. 
Even the company's corporate symbols seemed to take on a new significance.Mr. Hope's wife, Mary, was eager to see singer Jimmy Dean, who has lent his name to a line of the company's sausages. 
The books with croaking frogs and other talking characters have also been delayed.Mr. Kingsborough still expects diversification to bear fruit, and some retailers report that a line of school accessories, called Class Act, did well late this summer. 
Among other things, the pact was spurred by investor confusion about the market value of Minstar's hodgepodge of businesses.Minstar's sports lines include Ben Hogan golf clubs, Head tennis and ski equipment, and swimming gear. 
J.C. Penney Co., New York, said its stores will no longer sell home electronics, hard sporting goods, or photographic equipment.The retailer plans to expand its women's apparel lines. 
The move is part of a continuing strategy to focus on family apparel and other soft goods such as jewelry, cosmetics, shoes, and home accessories at its more than 1,400 stores nationwide.The discontinued lines, which still will be available in Penney's catalogs, represent about $550 million in total store sales for 1987, the company said. 
It would not estimate sales volume for the year.In 1986, the lines contributed 5.1% to store sales. 
In 1986, the lines contributed 5.1% to store sales.The company estimated that sales from added apparel lines will represent about two-thirds of the sales of discontinued hard goods. 
The merchandise change, which involves redesigning departments, will cost about $65 million.William R. Howell, chairman and chief executive officer, said the change was dictated largely by consumer priorities, as well as the profit potential in apparel lines. 
Uniroyal Goodrich Tire Co. is having a "tough year" because tire shipments to auto makers have declined 22% and raw-materials costs have increased, Patrick C. Ross, chairman and chief executive officer, said.The company, formed in August 1986 in a merger of the tire units of B.F. Goodrich Co. and Uniroyal Inc., also is being hurt by production inefficiencies that arose when it introduced 24 new tire lines in late 1986, Mr. Ross said in an interview. 
The company also had "difficulties and frustrations" meshing accounting and data-processing systems, he said.But Mr. Ross said that the added tire operations -- some of which filled holes in the company's lines and some of which are new -- strengthen Uniroyal's position in replacement and original-equipment markets as well as in the private-brand segment. 
Research Industries Corp. said a federal judge here upheld its right to sell a line of open-heart surgical catheters in a patent-infringement suit against it by Minnesota Mining & Manufacturing Co. 
Research Industries Corp. said a federal judge here upheld its right to sell a line of open-heart surgical catheters in a patent-infringement suit against it by Minnesota Mining & Manufacturing Co.The judge rejected claims that the line infringed on a Minnesota Mining patent, and the judge ordered the Minneapolis company to pay $600,000 in costs and attorneys' fees, Research Industries said. 
The tendered shares represent about 96% of Lamaur's outstanding shares, a spokesman for the chemical producer said.The acquisition gives Dow Chemical a new consumer products line. 
These products currently use rayon, cellulose and other synthetic materials as absorbents.The company dropped its line of disposable diapers a few years ago. 
Industry officials expect IBM to negotiate similar accords on intelligent networks with other international switch makers in coming months.IBM's new desktop-publishing package consists of a printer, a circuit card, a "mouse" pointing device and Aldus PageMaker software for use with the high-end versions of its new line of personal computers. 
"Most fast-food operators aren't true to their original products anymore and that strategy is working," Mr. Rockwell said.He cited a new line of bagels introduced by Pillsbury Co.'s Burger King Corp. unit, a SuperBar buffet that includes Italian and Mexican items at Wendy's International Inc. and packaged salads at McDonald's. 
A second 8% cut in August took Nova production down to 550 cars daily.In addition to the Nova, New United Motors, also known as Nummi, builds 200 Toyota FX models a day, but doesn't plan production cuts of that line, the spokesman said. 
Some celebrities doing commercial announcements try hard to keep it a secret.Actress Kathleen Turner read the lines in a Fab laundry detergent commercial earlier this year, and her contract specified that her identity remain confidential. 
Meanwhile, McDonnell Douglas Corp. is conducting its own propfan aircraft development program.The St. Louis-based company believes the program could bring propfan-powered derivatives of its current MD-80 line onto the market in early 1991. 
The maker of life-science research equipment had a net loss of $800,000 in the year-ago period."The two main lines that we sell are molecular- and cell-biology products, and both are doing really well world-wide," Mr. Thompson said in an interview. 
Whirlpool Corp. said it formed a joint venture with Sundaram-Clayton Ltd. of Madras, India, to make a full line of major household appliances. 
Alliant Computer Systems Corp. introduced a computer to fill the gap in its line between its high-end and low-end machines. 
The executive expects the company's onshore and offshore contract drilling services business to have a "modest profit" for all of 1988.As reported, the company is considering, among other options, spinning off or selling the drilling-services lines. 
Others wonder if Gillette is boosting near-term profits by actions that will hurt future profits.Gillette is trying to dispel that notion by disclosing plans to step up marketing in its sagging toiletries business, such rolling out a line of Dry Idea antiperspirants for men. 
Sales in the Buick division tumbled 68% in early October compared with a year ago.Buick sold only 778 of its 1988 Buick Regals, the debut model in the newly introduced GM-10 line that GM is hoping will increase the company's share of the midsized car market. 
AT&T will announce today a technology accord with Sun Microsystems that is intended to help AT&T develop a new line of high-performance minicomputers and workstations. 
NCR Corp. said it agreed to acquire the printer unit of DatagraphiX, a division of Anacomp Inc., for undisclosed terms.The printer unit, which had revenue of about $30 million in 1986, markets and services a line of high-speed, non-impact printers. 
The agreement is also an admission by AT&T that its Bell Labs research arm needs help developing commercial computer products.AT&T is expected to use the Sun chip design as a blueprint for new chips that it will eventually make in-house and use to power a new line of high-powered computers using the so-called RISC, or reduced instruction set computer technology. 
Earnings for the quarter were on target, analysts said."All segments of their business were up in sales, and they had an especially strong gain in their prescription line," said PaineWebber's Mr. Nordmann. 
Despite Apple's emphasis of late on the business market, schools and students still represent a big slice of Apple's business pie.Indeed, Apple's original Apple II computer line is still a mainstay in many classrooms, accounting for nearly 40% of the company's total sales, analysts estimate. 
Such a move would bring GM's practices into line with the accounting rules Ford and Chrysler use.In addition, GM has invested heavily in new factory machinery and in developing its GM-10 series, a new line of mid-sized cars that begins with the 1988 Buick Regal. 
Indeed, the latest quarter was the first in which the company posted a profit from its personal computer business.NCR recently expanded its personal computer line with three new computers and a workstation, including one based on Intel Corp.'s powerful 80386 microprocessor. 
First Boston's Mr. Milunovich said, "If there's a risk for NCR, it's in how well the market will accept the company's new products."He said that NCR's 7000 line of terminals -- used by retailers and the food industry -- and its 9800 mainframes "are selling a little below expectations. 
The restructuring should be complete in the next few weeks, he said, and could involve more layoffs.In addition to concentrating on a few profitable lines, McDonnell Douglas, an aircraft, aerospace and computer company based in St. Louis, has been narrowing losses at the information systems group through cost reductions. 
A Mattel spokesman said it is targeting the infant and preschool toy market for expansion.He said that while the company will continue to make other unrelated toys for that market, all new products will be Disney brands and will represent a "significant" portion of its preschool lines. 
Western Digital said samples of the chips used in its Micro Channel copy will be available in January, and commercial quantities of the chips will be available a few months later.Initially, the company said, the chips will duplicate the functions of the Micro Channel just in the models 50 and 60, the medium-range models in the new IBM line. 
To be a legal copy, a device has to be slightly different from its model, so there are sometimes gaps in a device's ability to mimic IBM's equipment.Clones of IBM's initial line of personal computers took time to catch on in the market, partly because of horror stories about overblown promises of compatibility with IBM equipment. 
For example, the bulk of IBM's model 9370 shipments for the year -- which IBM estimates at 5,000 units -- will take place in the quarter.IBM also says that demand for its new PS/2 line of personal computers "remains very strong." 
The book follows Mingolla and his lover, a rebel named Debora, as the two powerful, drug-enhanced psychics are sucked into the war's black labyrinths, which reek of blood and history.The book is the fifth in Bantam's New Fiction line of original trade paperback fiction, which was kicked off this past summer. 
Clones of IBM's new line of personal computers could appear next summer following a California firm's announcement that it has duplicated a key device inside the machines. 
International Business Machines Corp. introduced a line of telephone-switching devices that it hopes will shore up its position in the huge but fiercely competitive market. 
IBM also said the devices, which basically replace its existing product line, will take up far less space, require less power, and be much easier to modify as time goes by and new features become available.Armonk, N.Y.-based IBM is trying to switch the emphasis in the market to the added features available on its line, so it can escape the price competition that has made life so tough for Rolm. 
American Honda Motor Co.'s Acura division is increasing base prices on its 1988 Legend cars 1.5% to 7.9%.Peugeot Motors of America said base prices for its entire 1988 model line will rise 1% to 9.9%. 
The firms claim IBM has granted the Japanese firm concessions long denied to them.Separately, IBM unveiled a line of telephone-switching devices. 
Dealers and securities analysts said the move shows that IBM overestimated the demand for that product, but they weren't sure whether the move portends problems for other models in the new line.The Model 60 is one of five models in IBM's new PS/2 line of personal computers, and IBM has said demand for the line as a whole has been extremely strong. 
IBM cut the suggested retail price by $500, to $5,795 from $6,295, on the Model 60 version with a hard disk drive that contains 70 megabytes, or roughly 35,000 pages, of information.It cut by $300 the price to dealers on the machine, which is based on the Intel Corp. 80286 processor and is in the middle of the IBM line. 
Raytheon said results were aided by higher earnings in electronics, particularly in its defense business, and in its energy services division, which was restructured last year.The company said its major appliance division, which includes Amana refrigerators, was essentially unchanged, while its aircraft products line "continued to be affected by weak market conditions." 
Clearly they are getting some of the costs out," she said.Ms. Landis noted that GE in the quarter had a restructuring provision equal to $54 million, or about three cents a share, related to its appliance business and certain consumer lines. 
THE PEPPERIDGE FARM division of Campbell Soup is also trying to appeal to consumers worried about heart ailments.Its ads tout the fiber content of a new line of breads and note that "diets high in soluble fiber can help lower serum cholesterol, a risk factor for heart disease." 
Compaq Computer's chairman, Benjamin Rosen, recalls an analyst's blunt report the day after International Business Machines introduced a spiffy new line of computers in April. 
"One of the most important things driving the (stock) price up is Compaq's ability to increase the average selling price (of their computers) ahead of the industry," says Michael Geran, an E.F. Hutton analyst.Also, some say Compaq is benefiting from IBM's discontinuation of most of its old line of personal computers.Compaq still makes machines compatible with IBM's old line, and IBM's move has "forced the world to go out and sample the other guy's product," says Daniel Benton, an analyst with Goldman Sachs. 
Software to take full advantage of the hardware IBM introduced in April won't be available until 1988 and later.Mr. Geran compares the situation to 1964, when IBM streamlined its line of mainframe computers and handed prosperity to Honeywell -- for 18 months, before IBM bounced back. 
H.J. Heinz Co. said it has reached an agreement in principle to acquire the pet foods operations of California Home Brands Holdings Inc. Terms weren't disclosed.California Home Brands' pet food line consists primarily of canned dog and cat foods, including the Skippy Premium, Vets, Sturdy, Petuna and Glamour Puss labels. 
Along with new menswear and children's stores, Limited plans separate stores selling just its Limited Forenza label.It also will launch a line of Limited lingerie that will compete with its Victoria's Secret lingerie chain. 
Such moves help cut costs as well as offer customers "more real choices" instead of lots of different vehicles with similar features, says Donald T. Sullivan, former director of planning for Chevrolet.Chevrolet is also adding new equipment, particularly in its truck line, which Ford outsold in the 1987 model year by more than 200,000 vehicles. 
"We think very highly of this," said Roy D. Burry, an analyst with Kidder, Peabody & Co."These are both fairly low return businesses" relative to American Brands' other lines. 
Digital Equipment Corp., Maynard, Mass., and EMC Corp. agreed to drop suits against each other as part of a settlement under which EMC will be granted a license to use some Digital technology.Digital, a computer company, sued EMC in U.S. District Court in Boston in 1985 charging that one line of EMC's computer memory products infringed on Digital patents. 
Westinghouse, a Pittsburgh defense contractor, broadcaster and electrical products maker, said Challenger had sales of about $275 million last year.The transaction includes substantially all Challenger's operations and businesses in the U.S., Puerto Rico and Canada, with the exception of certain businesses in Albemarle, N.C., including its Stab-Lok line. 
While many companies usually see a 25% increase in revenue each September, he believes the increase this year could be about 35% and even as high as 40% in some cases.The reason, Mr. Erlap believes, is that corporations are through evaluating IBM's new line of personal computers introduced in April and "an enormous amount of pentup demand has been let loose" as some customers go for IBM new machines and others go for IBM-compatibles. 
GenCorp Inc. said its General Tire unit will increase prices on its replacement tire lines 2% to 5% effective Nov. 2. 
In those categories it will offer a range of goods, from its traditional bargain-basement fare to items with higher quality and fashion, and higher prices as well.The new thrust first became evident two years ago, when K mart hired former "Charlie's Angels" star Jaclyn Smith to endorse a new line of women's wear designed to shed the "polyester palace" image of K mart apparel.In its first year, the Jaclyn Smith line reaped $100 million of sales -- without reducing sales of K mart's other women's clothes. 
IC Industries has approximately 113 million shares outstanding.Investment sources said other possible bidders for IC may emerge, including E-II Holdings Inc., the fledgling Chicago-based company carved out of Beatrice Cos.' nonfood lines in July. 
Led by such brands as Old El Paso Mexican foods, Progesso soups and Whitman's candies, Pet has an estimated breakup value of more than $1 billion, analysts said.The company's other units, all profitable, include Midas International Corp. auto repair shops, Pneumo Abex Corp.'s lines of aircraft landing gear and flight controls and the bottling operations. 
A 14-inch-long sleek plastic aircraft with curved wings, it even resembles drawings I've seen purporting to show the super-secret Lockheed Stealth fighter.The little plane is equipped with a flashlight beam that can register hits on other toys in a whole Mattel toy line. 
International Business Machines Corp. will introduce an improved line of telephone-switching devices next Tuesday, according to industry sources. 
In addition, he said, the unit's carpeting didn't fit into the company's strategy of pushing brand-name products, such as its Martex bed and bath products and Burberrys clothing.J.L. Lanier Jr., West Point's chairman and chief executive officer, said in a statement that the sale would provide funds to expand into more profitable textile and apparel lines. 
Coloroll also just finished sorting out Crown House PLC. Mr. Ashcroft sold Crown House's engineering interests, raising #57 million of the #87 million ($141.6 million) takeover price.To save the operations it wanted -- mainly tableware lines -- Mr. Ashcroft accelerated his usual eight-week timetable for reorganizing acquired companies. 
More recently, Marks & Spencer PLC, Britain's largest retailer, paid what Mr. Ashcroft suggests could be a backhanded tribute to Coloroll.Marks & Spencer is trying to extend its St. Michael in-house brand to a recently created line of home furnishings. 
A Marks & Spencer spokesman said the major reason is Coloroll's involvement in its own shops, apparently referring to a showcase retail outlet Coloroll opened this year on London's expensive Regent Street, as well as Coloroll's relations with other retailers.Mr. Ashcroft speculates the deciding factor may have been Coloroll's move to start its own brand lines of lighting and furniture. 
Sales rose 5% to $6.13 billion.Criticism has been growing among securities analysts that Mr. Stafford, whose experience is concentrated in packaged-food lines, has done a poor job of managing Pillsbury's restaurant operations. 
Six months after International Business Machines Corp. introduced its new line of personal computers amid fireworks and a rush of favorable publicity, reality has set in. 
"Most users are starting to recognize that despite the hype, the . . . (new IBM line) offers no significant performance advantages over competitors (and) costs a lot more than most of them," William F. Zachmann, an analyst at International Data Corp., wrote recently in InfoWorld, a trade publication.K mart Corp., for instance, investigated the new IBM products but decided to buy clones of the IBM AT -- the high end of the prior IBM line -- as part of a program that may involve 13,000 personal computers. 
Much of the software that will take advantage of the Micro Channel won't be available at least until 1989, and the only way to truly test a copy is to run the new software on it.That issue, which is crucial to the fate of the IBM line, may not be resolved for another year or more. 
Unitrode stated that the agency said the concern's procedures are now "in compliance."Unitrode, based in Lexington, Mass., said it will resume shipping products in November and will be back to full production of most of its line by January. 
The new pathway clears some of the bottlenecks of the pathway in other Compaq computers, which are based on the design set by International Business Machines Corp. with its IBM PC in 1981.The change is significant because IBM made changes to the pathway -- which it calls the "microchannel" -- in its new line of computers introduced in April. 
Many schools and companies make such purchases easier these days by selling new machines to students or employees and passing along volume discounts of 25% to 45% that they get from the manufacturer.In addition, some companies that bought PCs and PC XTs a few years ago and are now replacing them will sell the machines -- the low end of IBM's original line of personal computers -- to employees for a song. 
In general, industry executives, analysts and members of user groups say someone who wants business software will want to look at IBM-compatible machines, and particularly at Tandy models introduced last month.A consumer who doesn't know computer basics and wants a machine that's especially easy to use may want to look at the Apple line, including one of the Macintoshes introduced in March. 
That's hundreds of dollars less than an actual IBM XT and only slightly more than most comparable no-name clones.IBM has stopped producing PC XTs as part of a bid to get the world to shift to the line it introduced in April. 
But the risk of machines compatible with the XT becoming orphans appears small.XT-compatible computers can run all existing software for IBM-compatible machines and can be upgraded to run software written for an operating system that Microsoft Corp. is close to shipping for the new IBM line. 
For someone seeking more power -- to handle a spreadsheet or a big data base, for example -- many specialists recommend Tandy's 1000 TX.This computer is compatible with the PC AT, which represented the high end of IBM's old personal-computer line. 
But the Compaq and IBM machines respond more to the needs of business than of home users.The IBM line, for instance, is designed to make it easier to link personal computers with each other and with a mainframe -- hardly an issue in the home. 
In any case, the benefits of the IBM and Compaq computers carry a hefty price: The machines cost several hundred dollars to $1,000 more than the Tandy 1000 TX."The performance of all the machines is pretty much the same, and the average consumer doesn't need the architecture of the new IBM line," says Michele Preston, an analyst at Salomon Brothers Inc. 
It and the Macintosh II are aimed primarily at the business market and are a bit pricey, but their ease of use has attracted some people buying for the home.Because they have sold well, software companies have released more programs for the Macintosh line, including some solid business software. 
Because they have sold well, software companies have released more programs for the Macintosh line, including some solid business software.The Macintosh II, which is roughly equivalent in power to the high end of the new IBM line, is overpowered for the home market. 
Both companies will continue to operate separately outside this country.San Francisco-based Chevron for many years has produced the Ortho line of chemical products, which has had a difficult time in an increasingly competitive business. 
IBM will introduce an improved line of telephone-switching devices Tuesday, sources said. 
To start with, Microsoft is writing OS/2, which will enable high-performance computers built around Intel Corp.'s 80286 microprocessor, such as IBM's PC-AT and most of its new PS/2 series machines, to run several programs at once, and will make it possible for several connected machines to share the same programs and data.Microsoft is also building, along with OS/2, what it calls "presentation manager" software to handle on-screen graphics in a consistent way for both personal computers and IBM's full line of larger computers. 
The weapon would be launched from anti-submarine helicopters and planes as well as from surface vessels.Development of the Mark-50 began in 1983, as the Navy recognized it would need a sophisticated successor to its current submarine-seeking torpedo line. 
"We plan to keep improving the product and building an industry around the product," says Michael Kolowich, Lotus's vice president, marketing.Indeed, the company has announced plans for two new versions of 1-2-3 for the IBM PC line and compatible systems. 
Compaq Computer Corp. is expected to introduce next week speedier versions of its top-of-the-line portable and desktop computers.The moves are Compaq's first product introductions since International Business Machines Corp. revamped its personal computer line in April and indicate that Compaq is following its tested strategy of trying to leapfrog IBM performance and concentrate on high-powered business computers. 
"It'll give (the Compaq entries) the amazing graphics that have so far been available only on workstations.And it should be better even than the improved graphics on the new IBM line," the source said. 
It's the first time you'll have a (personal computer) with workstation power."While Compaq is improving its graphics to match advances made by IBM in its April line, sources said the Compaq models won't mimic the most important change in the new IBM computer -- the "microchannel," IBM's term for the pathway between the parts of the computer that actually perform computations and other parts like the memory, storage, modems and printers. 
In doing so next week, Compaq will be directly challenging IBM's new line in the big business market.That is a sign of Compaq's belief that buyers still aren't completely enamored of the new IBM line, and also, perhaps, that the new IBM computers are proving more difficult to copy both technically and legally than the old line. 
The friendly transaction saves Lamaur from the hostile takeover campaign launched last month by Alberto-Culver Co.At the same time, acquisition of the St. Paul, Minn., hair-care products concern gives Dow Chemical a new consumer products line. 
The farmland to be purchased is developed for citrus groves, nut trees, table grapes and a number of other products, Castle & Cooke said.Among the products added to Dole's current line of pineapples, bananas and various vegetables, it said, would be almonds and pistachios, raisins, cherries and strawberries. 
Mr. Murdock said that his company sees the growth of Dole helping to unify "the fragmented agricultural marketing industry" in the U.S.Castle & Cooke will retain the Morrow and House of Almonds names, he said, and will review Tenneco's other lines to determine which will be changed to the Dole name. 
The projection includes several expected one-time transactions.Profit from continuing lines will rise about 50%. 
American Home doesn't produce contraceptive sponges or condoms, and its two oral contraceptives are facing increased competition from generics.VLI earlier this month introduced a line of condoms. 
Castle, a holding concern that also develops real estate, would assume about $16 million of debt in that purchase.The Dole unit, which Castle describes as the world's largest processor of fresh fruits and vegetables, would add olives and figs to its produce line with the purchase from Apache. 
Igene Biotechnology Inc. said it will build a $10 million facility to manufacture the company's ClandoSan line of natural chitin pesticides and organic fertilizers. 
General Motors Corp. set the base price of its new Buick Regal -- first of a new line of midsized cars that is crucial for GM's comeback effort -- 7.7% higher than the model it replaces. 
That pricing tactic is expected to be used widely in the model year that begins Thursday, because auto makers expect a sales decline next year and thus will try to compensate by boosting profit per vehicle.The Buick Regal is the first of GM's new line of midsized cars developed under the code name "GM-10." 
The team's machine would extend Cray's parallel processor architecture, which involves using more than one processor to simultaneously perform calculations on different parts of a large problem.Presumably the machine would debut in the early 1990s, after the Cray-3 model from the company's other design line. 
Without 43-year-old Mr. Chen, the company would have relied primarily on its founder and premiere designer, 61-year-old Seymour Cray.His machines differ significantly from those on which Mr. Chen worked; lately Mr. Chen's line, called by the suffix 'MP' for multiple processors, has been outselling Mr. Cray's designs. 
Mr. Rollwagen said that he has detected "no major fallout" from Mr. Chen's departure, other than questions such as, "What does this mean for Cray five years out?"Cray now plans to unveil its Y-MP addition to the MP line, the last machine Mr. Chen completed, early next year. 
National Theme, which has found that its hottest Halloween costumes are the ones it designs itself, also hopes to apply that lesson to the crystal business.Next year it will add its own crystal and pewter line to the items on this year's shelves. 
It is granting exclusive distribution rights to another company for the first time.Smith Corona will continue to sell its full line under its own brand name in the U.K. 
One of AT&T's most successful internal ventures is Conversant Systems.The Columbus, Ohio, unit has developed and is selling a line of machines costing between $20,000 and $80,000 that understand simple commands spoken into a telephone. 
Pathmark's experience isn't unique.The problem often crops up in the household-cleaner and health-and-beauty product areas, where hefty advertising budgets for national lines often make store brands look too cheap by comparison. 
International Business Machines Corp. is using the huge computer trade show here this week to try to prove a much disputed marketing claim of the past year and a half: that its PS/2 line of personal computers really does offer unique benefits. 
Yet, even here, the impact is mixed because there are fewer clones than were expected a few weeks ago, and they are mainly from little-known companies.IBM also unveiled a new addition to its line of local area networks, or LANs, which can lash together groups of computers, even from different makers. 
The new product lets information move along IBM's network at 16 million bits per second, quadruple the previous rate, IBM said.Also at the Comdex show, Commodore International Ltd. is showing off two new computers in its Amiga line, a less-visible but feisty rival to Apple Computer Inc.'s Macintosh in the market for easy-to-use machines with flashy graphics. 
Black and white generic goods are dying.In one sign of the times, retailers are replacing them with a new breed of products that falls between the old generics and mainstream store lines. 
"We want to bring private label up from being a poor second cousin compared to national brands to being on a par -- not just a cheap imitation," says David Freedman, art director of the Glaser firm.Indeed, many supermarkets are trumpeting in every way they can that their main store brands are equal, if not superior, to nationally advertised lines. 
Says a Pillsbury spokesman, "Whatever claims Pathmark may make, we have serious doubts they can meet the quality of Haagen-Dazs."The biggest risks are with a new generation of premium store lines that are even more upscale than national brands.Several years ago, Grand Union, witnessing brisk sales of specialty imported foods, introduced Laurent, its own line of fancy fare. 
Nevertheless, with profit margins higher on upscale than mainstream store brands, many chains are following suit.A&P got into the act this summer when it started rolling out a line of jams, pastas and other foodstuffs called Master Choice, an effort to fill what the company sees as a price gap between costly imported brands and mass-market national lines. 
A special panel of RJR Nabisco Inc. directors questioned President F. Ross Johnson and some top lieutenants yesterday about the state of the company's businesses.The session was part of the panel's "due diligence" process, as it seeks to evaluate RJR's food and tobacco lines and lay the groundwork for considering bids for them. 
This is the strange tale of how the biggest name in muscles, Nautilus Sports/Medical Industries Inc., lost its strength.The company was founded in 1970 by Arthur Jones, an eccentric former wild-animal importer who had invented a revolutionary line of exercise machines. 
With Mr. Jones distracted, Nautilus fumbled efforts to come up with new products of its own.A line of machines for home use bombed with would-be consumers and angered Nautilus's traditional customers -- health clubs -- which saw the new machines as a threat to their business. 
They blame their troubles on Mr. Jones and on since-departed Nautilus executives (their own people, not Jones holdovers), who they say spent too aggressively in the diversification effort.And they are upbeat about new products -- a line of exercise machines for handicapped people and computerized medical machines designed to diagnose and treat bad backs (in competition with Mr. Jones's new device) and other maladies."We're excited about the medical line," says Mr. Bonney. 
One area of expansion will be licensing agreements with other apparel companies.This year, for example, Playtex Apparel Inc. licensed the Gitano label for a line of fashion bras in the $6 to $8 range to complement Playtex's basic $15 bras. 
He maintained that Forstmann Little has acted with "total integrity" and "we need no advice from you in this regard."Separately, Quaker Oats Co.'s chairman and chief executive officer, William D. Smithburg, said he would be interested in any RJR businesses put up for sale that related to the Chicago concern's own lines. 
William E. Stevens, executive vice president, proudly describes how the company has reduced the lineup of motors its makes for its power tools to about a dozen models from more than 50.Recently, a revamped line of under-the-cabinet Spacemaker kitchen appliances was given a sleek, European look that won a top award from the Industrial Designers Society of America. 
He had come from Beatrice Cos., where he headed the consumer durables group.At Black & Decker, he found aging, inefficient plants, shabby sales efforts, and an undernourished line of small household appliances recently acquired from General Electric Co. 
The company promises another breakthrough in such accessories within the year.Similarly, it recently rolled out Thundervolt, a line of power tools driven by a battery pack that a user wears on a belt.The line is aimed at industrial and construction users. 
Similarly, Black & Decker is facing its Japanese competition head-on.Last month it signed an agreement with Shin-Daiwa Kogyo Ltd. to market a special line of Black & Decker professional power tools in Japan. 
It was also wrong.As franchisees in any line are quick to point out, they own their businesses. 
Mr. Amerman said both of Mattel's core brands, Barbie and Hot Wheels, are selling well in retail stores.The company's line of infant and preschool products featuring Disney-licensed characters and its new large doll, Li'l Miss Makeup, are also selling briskly. 
But Nestle isn't without its worries.Some lines have been losing market share as competition mounts. 
National, based in Santa Clara, Calif., meanwhile, said it expects its loss to result from a "sharp decline" in chip bookings and sales for the current quarter.This forecast surprised some industry analysts, who were told by National's chief executive officer, Charles Sporck, last month that all but two of National's chip lines are profitable. 
As part of the transaction, AT&T will obtain exclusive technology and marketing rights to Harris's VSAT earth stations that it currently markets.It also will acquire all existing inventory, test systems and related equipment of the VSAT line. 
Seiko Instruments USA Inc., Torrance, Calif., said it has reached a joint agreement with Kisho Corp. of Japan to develop and market a line of consumer audio products for the U.S. market. 
Seiko Instruments USA Inc., Torrance, Calif., said it has reached a joint agreement with Kisho Corp. of Japan to develop and market a line of consumer audio products for the U.S. market.Seiko, the U.S. unit of Seiko Instruments Inc., said the consumer products will include a line of audio compact disk players, portable radio/cassette players, personal cassette players and home compact disk bookshelf systems. 
Revlon, a unit of cosmetics concern Revlon Group Inc. of New York, said the fragrance should be on the market by fall, but the company hasn't decided on pricing or distribution.Fragrances connected with lines of designer wear or clothing manufacturers have become popular recently. 
Fragrances linked with Gloria Vanderbilt, Calvin Klein, Ralph Lauren and others have done well, as has Colors, a fragrance launched last year by Benetton.But Andrew Shore, a Shearson Lehman Hutton analyst, noted that a successful line of clothing doesn't necessarily mean a fragrance will do well. 
EgyptAir, the national carrier of Egypt, placed an order totaling $20 million.Total orders for the engines involved, Pratt's PW4000 line, have reached nearly $6 billion. 
But it is testimony to racing's conservativism that the innovations drawing the biggest cheers touch only the horses' skins and hoofs.One is a new line of jockey silks designed under the Aeroform label by Rhonda Allen, a sculptor whose husband, Joe, owns horses. 
As for One of a Klein, Uncle Gene opined that she'd be back, health permitting, to win again."We could start a whole line of 'Klein' horses," he mused. 
Such brands as Citrus Hill orange juice and Pringles potato chips, for instance, have struggled.For Ralston Purina, combining Nabisco's cereal lines with its own lines could raise its market share almost to that of General Foods Inc.'s Post brand, the nation's No. 3 cereal maker.Nabisco makes Shredded Wheat and Cream of Wheat, while Ralston's cereal line includes Chex cereals. 
H.J. Heinz Co., seeking to expand as a world marketer of fish products and to broaden its pet food line, is dividing its Star-Kist Foods Inc. unit into two separate operating affiliates. 
He also contends the $900 million-a-year canned dog food business "is showing slight-to-moderate growth and is sufficiently large to be attractive, especially because it appears to be undermarketed."Heinz, which has sharply increased its dog food business through recent acquisitions, currently is testing its own line of canned dog food. 
So yesterday's fall stunned some analysts.It came after the Austin, Texas, company, which designs and rents a line of specialized beds for the acutely ill, reported third-quarter per-share earnings of 15 cents, compared with nine cents before an extraordinary item the year earlier. 
Sales rose 15% to $200.2 million from $173.9 million.Commodore's chairman, Irving Gould, said the latest results reflect significant expansion in sales from Commodore's expanded product mix in its line of Amiga personal computers, the MS-DOS personal computer compatibles and traditional C64/ C128D computers in Europe, North America and Australia. 
The company, a unit of North American Philips Corp., which in turn is a New York-based subsidiary of N.V. Philips of the Netherlands, was charged with claiming that the device made tap water cleaner, even though Norelco knew that methylene chloride leached into the water from a glue used in the appliance's filter, the commission said.The company learned of the problem in 1982 from Consumer Reports magazine and developed a new filter, but it continued to sell the initial filter line for three years, the commission charged. 
But the Center for Auto Safety says the Winnebago diesels may have the highest percentage of defects of any vehicle since 1969, when the nonprofit consumer group was formed.The center estimates that of the 7,800 Winnebago diesels sold before the line was dropped in 1986, one in two is a "mechanical lemon." 
Clarence M. Ditlow III, executive director, says the ratio of problem vehicles rivals only that of the diesel cars made by General Motors Corp. in the late 1970s and early 1980s.The Winnebago diesel line is "one of the worst, if not the worst," of all vehicles, Mr. Ditlow says. 
A year earlier, net income was $87 million, or $1.39 a share.The latest period's deficit reflects a $51.9 million loss from discontinued operations, largely from losses in the multiple employer trust group health line. 
The company said it acquired the pizza business when its consumer products unit, Dial Corp., bought the consumer products division of Purex Industries three years ago for an undisclosed amount.Ellio's was Dial's only line of frozen-food products. 
Instead, Charles Sporck, National's president and chief executive officer, focused on the company's huge semiconductor operations.His speech included previously undisclosed details on the size and profitability of National's various chip lines. 
That price, he said, would be roughly $350 million.Several analysts said Mr. Sporck's detailed comments Friday on National's chip lines were meant to pave the way for the sale of NAS. 
As manufacturers get bigger, they are likely to pour more money into the battle for shelf space, raising the ante for new players.But even the consolidated food giants would still lack the clout to completely derail retailers' demands or to tip the balance of power back toward manufacturers. (In the case of Kraft, for example, the company pays slotting fees only on its frozen food line. 
In another uncharacteristic move, Digital decided to buy a microprocessor from Mips Computer Systems Inc., Sunnyvale, Calif., to produce a powerful workstation that uses the industry standard Unix operating system.The decision meant canceling Digital's own project to build a microprocessor and a departure from its message of compatibility across the whole computer line. 
The quarter also included a $14 million write-down for costs associated with the company's credit-insurance business.The company recently announced plans to discontinue that line. 
In national over-the-counter trading, Applied Biosystems rose 75 cents to $25.25.Applied Biosystems, which pioneered the making of so-called "picks and axes for the biotechnology gold rush," produces a line of more than two dozen automated machines plus chemical reagents for the analysis and synthesis of genes and proteins by commercial and academic laboratories. 
U.S. Shoe Corp. and Leslie Fay Cos. announced a licensing agreement in which U.S. Shoe will make and sell a line of Leslie Fay footwear. 
Terms weren't disclosed.The line will be made in the U.S. and introduced in February for the fall 1989 season, the companies said. 
The Fragrance Foundation lists at least 45 for this year and next."The marketing mission today is to be able to steal share of market from existing business," says Martin Danielson of Parlux Ltd., New York, which will launch the Joan Collins line this spring. 
Mr. Hirsh said he recently resigned from the partnership.In addition to owning the Vanderbilt line, Murjani last August signed a licensing agreement with Chrysler Corp. to market the Jeep trademark on a broad range of consumer products, slated for delivery next spring.Murjani also has majority ownership of Tommy Hilfiger, a struggling men's sportswear brand, and Coca Cola clothes, a sportswear line that a Murjani spokesman described as "fizzled in the U.S. but still selling abroad." 
Its premium priced "metal bar" disposable shaver, which stretches the skin as it shaves, is now being shipped.Bic plans to introduce its first line of perfumes, which will be aimed at the mass market, in the 1989 first quarter. 
The huge Japanese trading company has been considering joining the buy-out effort for about two weeks, according to Japanese bankers, but the company hasn't yet made a decision.The bankers say that Mitsubishi is interested in certain of RJR's food lines. 
Mazda Motor Corp., which just launched its first U.S. minivan, recently discontinued the wagon version of its 323 subcompact car.GM's Chevrolet division won't have a station wagon in its new Lumina line of midsize vehicles, which includes a sedan, coupe and an "all-purpose vehicle." 
Station wagons won't disappear, however.Chevrolet will continue to produce the midsize Celebrity wagon after it rolls out the Lumina line. 
Hallmark Cards Inc. said it reached an agreement to settle a two-year dispute involving a line of its cards that resemble those of Blue Mountain Arts, a small Boulder, Colo., concern. 
Hallmark Cards Inc. said it reached an agreement to settle a two-year dispute involving a line of its cards that resemble those of Blue Mountain Arts, a small Boulder, Colo., concern.As previously reported, Blue Mountain sued Hallmark for trademark violations, contending that its Personal Touch line of cards was too similar to Blue Mountain Arts' products. 
Last week, the Supreme Court left intact a preliminary injunction that barred Hallmark from selling 83 "Personal Touch" cards.As part of the settlement, Hallmark said it will introduce a greeting card line with a new name that will replace the Personal Touch line and agrees not to infringe Blue Mountain's trade dress. 
In Boulder, Bob Gall, general manager of Blue Mountain Arts, said the company is elated that its creative designs are protected and that "we can get back to publishing cards without fear of being copied."Mr. Gall said Blue Mountain publishes about 100 different cards under the lines it had charged Hallmark with copying. 
The company declined to disclose the potential buyers.If it were to sell the building-materials line, the company said it would expect to report a one-time $10 million after-tax loss.The line consists of the 35-store Lloyd chain of retail home-improvement centers, located mainly in southern Connecticut and in Westchester, N.Y. 
It's a good fit."In the U.S., Hoover's vacuum cleaner lines will fill a gap in Maytag's offerings. 
Chicago Pacific also has a furniture operation, which analysts note is an awkward fit with Maytag's appliance focus, and which likely will be sold to help finance the acquisition.The furniture lines could fetch about $300 million, estimates Mr. Ryan of Merrill Lynch. 
And as they got more involved in the spirit of the season, adult costume parties evolved as a tonic for bored yuppies.Adult Halloween parties have ballooned 25% in the past three years, estimates Hallmark Cards Inc., which introduced a line of Halloween gifts and novelties two years ago. 
But he plummeted almost overnight both in ratings and sales, forcing stores to institute steep markdowns.Retailers are already worried that last year's high-roller, Pumpkin Productions' Oh Lanterns line of grotesque, polyurethane pumpkin faces, is heading the same way. 
Retailers are already worried that last year's high-roller, Pumpkin Productions' Oh Lanterns line of grotesque, polyurethane pumpkin faces, is heading the same way.Marc Firestone, vice president of sales for Firestone & Associates, which sells the Oh Lantern line to retailers, contends that "there is nothing wrong with selling a pumpkin in April." 
Meanwhile, Standard and Poor's placed West Point's $80 million of senior debt on its CreditWatch list and said the securities could be downgraded if Mr. Farley's bid succeeds or if the company pursues expected measures to remain independent.For his part, Mr. Farley said in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that he intends to sell West Point's apparel, apparel fabrics and industrial fabrics lines.He would keep the company's sheet and towel lines, which are the crown jewels of company. 
Moreover, the sheet and towel business is considered fairly recession-proof and provides high profit margins.In keeping the sheet and towel business, Mr. Farley would inherit West Point's Martex and Lady Pepperell brand names as well as the Utica and Tastemaker lines that originally were developed by Stevens. 
Sales at Sears stores open at least a year actually declined slightly in the quarter, analysts said.And profit was hurt by higher markdowns in apparel at the stores, and in several lines of catalog merchandise Sears is trying to clear out before discontinuing. 
The third quarter is typically the strongest one of the year for toy makers because the bulk of Christmas orders are shipped during the period.Galoob said it saw strong demand for its Micro Machines, a line of miniature cars that retail for about $4.It also cited demand for a line of dolls called Bouncin' Babies, retailing for under $10, that it began shipping in July. 
Micro Machines are expected to account for about 40% of Galoob's sales this year, sparking renewed interest in the market for die-cast cars, as plastic action figures for boys have fallen out of favor.Micro Machines are likely to continue strong through the Christmas season, but analysts say next year the line will face stiff competition from other toy makers, including new offerings from Universal Matchbox Group Ltd.'s Matchbox Toys and Mattel's Hot Wheels line. 
This was a Nebraska where "carriage and Conestoga wagon alike wallowed to the hubs in the black mud," where the Arikara and the Sioux and the Comanches were "angered at the slaughter of the buffalo, at the steel rails pointing west."Many of the volumes in the Bison line are like "The Lieutenant's Lady," best sellers reclaimed from the past through photographic reproductions of earlier editions. 
You've created such a clutter that I don't know what to use.'This kind of confusion will lend itself to some pretty negative positions for some lines." 
Lopid could have been a billion-dollar-a-year seller but now looks like a $300 million drug, one investor says.There's talk that the New York investor Ronald Perelman, among others, might want Warner-Lambert for its over-the-counter drug lines. 
Sales at Sears stores open at least a year declined slightly for the quarter, analysts said.And profits were hurt by higher markdowns on apparel at the stores and on several lines of catalog merchandise Sears is trying to clear out before eliminating, the analysts said. 
Mr. Trugman left to assume the top posts at Del.General Microwave's instrumentation line is particularly attractive to Del, a maker of high-voltage power-conversion devices. 
KRAFT REJECTED Philip Morris's $90-a-share offer and said it is developing a recapitalization plan worth at least $110 a share.The plan, which would force Kraft to sell some lines and would boost its debt over tenfold, calls for the company to distribute about $98 a share, or nearly $12.5 billion, in cash and securities while letting holders keep their stock. 
But if the Johnson-led group were to win the company with a higher bid, it would have to do much the same.The $75-a-share offer contemplated keeping the tobacco line and the best parts of Nabisco Brands, if proceeds from certain asset sales and financing terms allowed it. 
Mr. Jacobs said he didn't intend to use the borrowing in another takeover.The transaction also calls for Volvo North America's marine division, Volvo Penta of America, to supply as much as 20% of the engines for Genmar's boat lines through June 30, 1991. 
Ashton-Tate Corp. and Digital Equipment Corp. will announce today plans to co-develop versions of Ashton's popular dBASE personal computer database manager software for Digital's line of minicomputers. 
"Our customers would like simpler training for users and consistent programs from the terminal to the PC, to the workstation, to the corporate computing level," said Henry Ancona, vice president of the business and office information systems group at Digital, based in Maynard, Mass."This will provide for a common set of database language tools for the whole line." 
He is "very, very impressed," he says, by the performance to date of Mr. Sege's heir apparent, Norman H. Pond, who was brought in as president last December and is credited with many of Varian's cost-cutting measures.While Varian derives much more than half its sales from a diverse line of other electronic products, its fortunes tend to rise and fall on the health of its semiconductor-manufacturing equipment group, which moves in tandem with the volatile semiconductor industry. 
Digital Equipment Corp. introduced two MicroVax computer systems, to bolster the low end of its minicomputer line. 
Domenic LaCava, Digital's group vice president for low-end systems, said the MicroVax 3400 has 50% more performance than an AS/400 B40 "for only 60% of the cost."The new Digital computers will replace the upper range of its MicroVax II line, providing twice the performance for the same price, Mr. LaCava said. 
A second button opens the trunk remotely.Code-Alarm also is developing a line of home-security systems, which it says will get some of the proceeds from the new stock offering. 
And in the testing stage now are Kool Shots, a liquid-concentrate version, and Kool-Aid Sports Koolers, for young jocks.Line extension, this is called. 
Philip Morris is a master of it, selling its famous cigarette brands not just as ordinary smokes but as lights, menthols, kings, slims.If Philip Morris succeeds in its bid to add a host of Kraft brands to its already huge line of General Foods products, consumers could face ever more such slight variations on a familiar theme. 
Large food companies already vary their best-known products this way, but companies in Philip Morris's business are the real experts."Tobacco companies are heavily into line extensions," says Al Ries, chairman of Trout & Ries Inc., a New York marketing strategy firm. 
"There is no lack of adventure or innovation in General Foods," he says, noting that it has introduced 75 new products as a Philip Morris unit.In particular, he cites Culinova, a new line of refrigerated entrees, and ready-to-eat Jell-O pudding dessert. 
For all its potential, the Philip Morris strategy of accumulating well-known brands carries certain risks.Ultimately, stretching a brand to its limit with line extensions can erode brand loyalty if managers try to make the brand all things to all consumers. 
Kraft itself recently learned that lesson the hard way, after its 1984 acquisition of the Celestial Seasonings herbal-tea company.It aggressively extended the line, marketing 34 flavors from Cranberry Cove to Grandma's Tummy Mint. 
But putting the Celestial Seasonings imprimatur on mixed seasonings, salad dressings -- and even cosmetics -- proved a blunder.Last year, with Celestial barely profitable despite $38 million of sales, Kraft sold the line to a management group. 
For instance, Wisconsin canner Stokely USA Inc. is fighting a David vs.Goliath battle with General Foods and Kraft for freezer-case space for its competing lines of single-serve vegetables. 
International pharmaceutical operations gained in several product areas.Higher U.S. consumer-product sales reflected gains from foot-care products and the Maybelline cosmetics line. 
Foreign producers worked hard to establish themselves in the U.S. market and won't give up their gains without a fight.As was the case in some consumer lines, foreign producers drove many U.S. companies out of business in some industries, such as in certain lines of advanced construction, printing and textile machinery. 
Last year, the foods division, which contributes about 10% of Coca-Cola's profit, posted a loss because of restructuring expenses.While the unit has reorganized, cut costs and taken bold new-product steps recently by introducing Premium Choice, a top-of-the line chilled juice product, analysts don't expect the division to contribute significantly to profit anytime soon. 
She currently is fielding more than 20 endorsement offers from apparel, cosmetics, soft drink and other companies, says her personal manager, Gordon Baskin.One possibility is a Flo-Jo doll line from MCA Inc. "Florence is different because she's beautiful, she excels as an athlete and she has flair," Mr. Baskin says. 
The proposed merger would create a giant with $20 billion in annual sales and some of the best known trademarks in America.The General Foods unit, acquired for $5.7 billion three years ago, owns the Maxwell House, Jell-O and Kool-Aid lines. 
Both companies said orders fell in the period, causing the more sober outlooks.Taken together, the two concerns make a broad line of computer products, ranging from large mainframes to mid-sized workstations and smaller, specialized personal computers. 
Unisys has generated impressive earnings growth largely through cost-cutting, but it can't continue to improve its performance that way much longer.W. Michael Blumenthal, Unisys's chairman, said customers waiting to order the company's new 2200 series computers, which begin shipments next spring, and holding off buying its older 1100 line accounted for part of Unisys's order declines. 
A. Schulman Inc., an Akron, Ohio, supplier of plastic compounds and resins, said it agreed with Mitsubishi Kasei Vinyl of Tokyo to form a partnership, Sunprene Co., which will make a new line of polyvinyl chloride thermoplastic compounds for the North American auto market. 
At Kraft, based in Glenview, Ill., Mr. Miles has been credited with a string of successes such as a "light" version of Philadelphia Brand cream cheese, and with introducing products and raising sales and profits in the highly competitive dairy business, which includes such brands as Frusen Gladje ice cream.Mr. Miles has stepped up annual volume growth on several of Kraft's brands to about 4% a year from 1%, largely through line extensions -- new versions of existing products. 
VW dealers in the U.S. hailed the change as a much-needed breath of fresh air for an automotive organization on its knees."I think Volkswagen has a really tough time competing in the U.S. and they're going to have to assess how they can realistically keep up here," said J. Rick Hendrick III, a big North Carolina dealer who sells VW's Volkswagen and Audi lines. 
Last year alone, Audi lost an estimated $341 million in the U.S. Even an infusion of several new models in the past year and a heavily marketed extended service warranty program have failed to halt the slide.While not subject to such jarring problems, the Volkswagen line has seen its once-dominant position in the U.S. imported small-car market evaporate. 
Bausch & Lomb Inc. said it will build a sunglass assembly and distribution facility in San Antonio, Texas, to keep up with strong demand for its Ray-Ban line of sunglasses. 
EVEN THE lowly wastebasket can be made over.King-Casey Inc., a New Canaan, Conn., design and marketing firm, interviewed 2,000 consumers about their dissatisfactions with wastebaskets and incorporated the results in a new line of trash containers for Mobil Chemical Co., producer of Hefty trash bags. 
"Unfortunately, sales inducements are becoming a more practical part of the business."The GM incentives are in addition to discount leasing programs that the No. 1 auto maker offers on about 20 of its 1989 car and truck lines. 
Unisys Corp. said it introduced several products in its BTOS line of computer workstations, including a workstation, a graphics processor and software. 
Takasago's resulting odors have provided the basis for two bath-product lines -- including bubble baths and bath oils, soaps and talcs -- from Avon Products Inc. Tranquil Moments, a floral bath line introduced in 1986, supposedly relaxes bathers.Its success prompted Avon last year to unveil Reveille, a citrus floral bath line with "revitalizing" effects. 
Waldenbooks stores display Longmeadow's books lavishly and keep Pageant books on their shelves more than twice as long as other paperbacks."We've given Pageant more space because we're trying to prove some points, to show that you can create a publishing line by promoting it properly," Mr. Hoffman says. 
The company's proceeds from the offering will be used for working capital, product development and other corporate purposes, including possible acquisitions.The company develops and sells a line of interactive computer games for personal computers made by International Business Machines Corp. and by Apple Computer Inc. 
It already sells about 300 of the garments a year, mainly for industrial workers to wear under heavy suits for hazardous materials handling, but also for race car drivers, armored vehicle crews in the Canadian army, and Israeli tank crews who are putting the suits through desert trials.The line is "mildly profitable," says Bill Elkins, president. 
Mr. Shaffer said Rohm & Haas had earnings gains in the latest quarter in its largest segment, which consists of polymers, resins and monomers, and in its second largest segment, industrial chemicals.But plastics segment earnings lagged behind those of a year earlier because of a gain on the sale of the company's Kydex plastic sheet line in 1987. 
A spokesman at General Tire, Akron, said the problem was exacerbated because the intense battle among the global producers to increase market share kept prices down.He said General Tire had difficulty getting price increases to hold despite tight supplies in some lines. 
Mr. Arguetty said another reason for the company's performance was Jan Bell's improved product mix.Jan Bell recently began selling a line of watches. 
Weight Watchers International Inc. accused Stouffer Corp. of unfairly tipping the scales in favor of Stouffer's Lean Cuisine food line in advertisements. 
In a suit filed in federal court in Manhattan, Weight Watchers, a weight-loss business based in New York, accused Stouffer of unfairly using its trademark name in Lean Cuisine ads.Weight Watchers, a unit of H.J. Heinz Co., Pittsburgh, also has a line of low-calorie foods. 
It's one further step away from the 'wires suppliers' image of the old Radio Shack."The agreement will give Digital's sales force a line of low-priced, IBM-compatible personal computers to sell to big customers. 
Power-tool sales have been brisk, he said, and the company "has been bringing out home-run products in the accessories area, such as the Bullet Pilot Point drill bit and Piranha saw blade."He expects the company to unveil another significant accessories line early next year. 
Norman G. Fosback, editor of New Issues newsletter, says Gitano is "attractive" at 18.Start-up costs for Gitano's new menswear line and the unfavorable retail climate are drawbacks, says Mr. Fosback. 
Well almost.Earlier this year, Malcolm S. Forbes, Forbes magazine editor-in-chief, gave her a purple Harley to celebrate her new perfume line, "Elizabeth Taylor's Passion." 
There are no other negotiations taking place for the time being."Chrysler hopes that the program will increase sales of its own cars in dealerships that carry the Alfa Romeo line by increasing showroom traffic, Gerald Greenwald, chairman of the Chrysler Corp. unit said. 
Ford Motor Co., for example, announced yesterday it will offer leasing discounts to consumers on seven of its 1989 model cars and all of its compact and full-size pickup trucks through the end of the year.The move follows by about a week a similar announcement from General Motors Corp. of special leasing discounts on about 20 of its car and truck lines. 
Chrysler's new program offers customers a choice between interest rates as low as 7.8% and rebates ranging between $300 and $1,500.The 1989 model cars included in the program are the subcompact Omni and Horizon and the compact Aries and Reliant, which will be replaced starting this January with a new line of midsize cars; the Eagle Premier and Medallion, which haven't been selling up to the company's expectations; and the Japanese-built Conquest TSi sports car. 
The new management last month sold Schering-Plough its U.S. contact-lens care solutions business for $40 million.Still on the block are Cooper's diagnostic business, its plastic and reconstructive surgical products operation, and its remaining optometric lines, which includes its contact lens business. 
But he said lenders are "working hard to find a viable way to continue to support this company."The former Zayre Corp. chairman also said Regina has temporarily stopped selling both its Stutz vacuum cleaners, which in July began selling through dealers to small vacuum-cleaner shops, and its more expensive Cambridge line of cleaners, which began limited distribution in department stores last summer. 
Digital Equipment will buy Tandy computers and sell them under its own label.The pact boosts Tandy's image and gives Digital a competitive, IBM-compatible line. 
Overall, though, Scott has made headway by holding down production costs and avoiding the premium segment of the market, where rivals such as Procter & Gamble excel.Instead, Scott has stuck to its economy line, emphasizing basic consumer values such as more sheets per roll and more rolls per pack. 
Mr. Lippincott explains, "It isn't easy to walk out with one of those rolls under your arm."In the past two years, Scott has extended the jumbo concept to include a line of paper towels and soap dispensers. 
Data General Corp. introduced a line of high-performance superminicomputers that vault it past archrival Digital Equipment Corp. in the midrange-computer performance race. 
Speed can be increased by adding as many as three more central processors, producing a $1.5 million computer that handles as many as 50 MIPS.By contrast, Digital's high-end line, which spans about the same price range, handles from six MIPS to 24 MIPS. 
Most vintners suffered even sharper declines as the industry leaders, Seagram Co. and E & J Gallo Winery, gained market share at the expense of rivals.In the past six months alone, California Cooler, a unit of Brown-Forman Beverage Co., revamped its entire cooler line and spent $20 million to promote it. 
The agreement marks a significant move by Digital, the second-largest U.S. computer maker, repeatedly faulted when it has tried to sell its own personal computers.Tandy, based in Fort Worth, Texas, manufactures a broad line of computers that are compatible with those made by International Business Machines Corp., and it sells them through its Radio Shack stores. 
When Mr. Arnault began investing in Moet Vuitton, there were rumors he would seek direct control of Dior perfumes.Mr. Arnault has said he is interested in Moet Vuitton itself, not just the perfume line. 
Regina Co.'s problems with defective vacuum cleaners apparently involve more than its Housekeeper and Housekeeper Plus lines, according to a judge's opinion. 
The judge's opinion said one reason for his leaving was distress over the company's failure to correct problems with the machine.Defective equipment and a high rate of returns in the Housekeeper and Housekeeper Plus lines have apparently contributed to Regina's recent financial problems. 
Last week the company announced that its fiscal 1988 results were materially incorrect, and that it expected to report a loss for its current fiscal quarter, reversing previously positive earnings projections by Donald Sheelen, who resigned as chairman last week.Regina has made impressive sales inroads in the vacuum cleaner business in recent years with its low-priced models aimed at discount stores; the Stutz line is more expensive and will be sold in specialty stores. 
Regina has made impressive sales inroads in the vacuum cleaner business in recent years with its low-priced models aimed at discount stores; the Stutz line is more expensive and will be sold in specialty stores.A memorandum submitted by Regina about its Stutz line of cleaners was ordered sealed for competitive reasons. 
Individuals familiar with Regina noted that the Stutz cleaner hadn't been introduced until after the close of the company's 1988 fiscal year; the company has withdrawn financial figures for that period as materially incorrect.Nevertheless, the difficulties with the Stutz line suggest other possible problems for dealers caused by faulty equipment. 
Nevertheless, the difficulties with the Stutz line suggest other possible problems for dealers caused by faulty equipment.In denying the company's request for an injunction, the court noted that Mr. Geehring's new job involves selling commercial equipment that doesn't compete with Regina's consumer line, and that there was no evidence that he planned to disclose trade secrets. 
Ford Motor Co., Dearborn, Mich., said it is discontinuing its Merkur XR4Ti line at the end of 1989 model year. 
Chrysler, however, will have to "struggle like hell" to retain the 11% car-market share it earned in 1988, Mr. Greenwald acknowledged, largely because it will have limited availability of some important models as it shifts production sites and adds new products, including the Spirit and Acclaim midsize models that begin replacing Aries and Reliant K cars in January.Lloyd E. Reuss, executive vice president for GM's North American Automotive Operations, predicts the No. 1 auto maker will pick up "a point or two" in car and truck market share in 1989, partly because of gradually increasing sales for the company's so-called GM-10 cars, a line of midsize, front-wheel-drive cars that initially sold below the company's expectations. 
The fees were first challenged by Mid-America Pipeline Co., a Mapco Inc. unit.The case is significant because it is the latest in a line of Supreme Court appeals raising questions about the separation of power under the Constitution. 
Honda Motor Co. will introduce a super-luxury car in its Acura line within the next couple of years, two top executives said, and later probably will enter two market segments -- minivans and entry-level cars. 
Times Mirror acquired Dorsey Press as part of its $135 million purchase earlier this year of Richard D. Irwin Inc., a college textbook publishing concern, from Dow Jones & Co. Dorsey Press publishes social science college textbooks.A spokeswoman for Times Mirror said the sale was made because Dorsey Press's operations weren't consistent with Times Mirror's core college and professional textbook lines, which are primarily for courses in accounting, law, medicine, marketing, management and economics. 
Advanced Micro Devices Inc. said Japan's Hitachi Ltd. will use the Sunnyvale, Calif., company's Am29000 microprocessor chip as the heart of a new line of medical instruments. 
The Japanese auto maker will discontinue the Charade CSX, at $9,232 now the costliest of the three models it sells in the U.S. and the most sporty Daihatsu, with air conditioning and a premium stereo system as standard features.In its place, Daihatsu will offer the Charade CES at a $6,197 base price, lowest in the line. 
If that is in the ball park, investors buying Xerox shares today would pay only about $1.4 billion, or less than $14 a share, for the company's copier and document processing machine businesses.In a takeover, Ms. Sloate thinks Xerox's business-products lines might fetch $85 a share, or 6.5 times cash flow from operations. 
At the same time, it hopes to attract new buyers by introducing new computers that use industry standard microprocessors and the UNIX operating system.It is expected to introduce upgraded versions of its MV line next week. 
Many executives at IBM hold stock options, he said, and "a lot of options are under water there," having been awarded when the price was a good deal higher.IBM has undertaken a massive cost-control program, so far reaching into its manufacturing and marketing lines and involving substantial staff cuts and some plant closings. 
L.A. Gear's backlog at Aug. 31 was $55 million, up from $9 million a year ago.Mr. Horowitz attributes the strong earnings growth to increased demand for the company's shoes, including its recently introduced men's line. 
To take on other companies at this time in our life doesn't seem wise."The company has been adding to its apparel business, with a line of jeans and plans for a line of watches. 
It is being squeezed by Asian competition in the company's traditional office-equipment market.Sales of a new line of minicomputers haven't met the company's projections. 
In the previous fiscal year, Porsche's profit fell 31%, to 51.9 million marks.The auto maker said unit sales have improved in recent months and that it expects increased demand for its cars and improved earnings in the current fiscal year, based on modifications of its model line and spending reductions. 
Donald Harnett, Graham-Field's chief financial officer, said the company shares markets and customer bases with Lumex's unit.The Lumex division, with about $37 million in annual sales, emphasizes durable medical equipment, a good complement for Graham-Field's disposable-equipment lines, he added. 
The merger proposal would involve subsidiaries of a company controlled by Mr. Picower and Montgomery Medical as well as Controlled Therapeutic Corp., a closely held company to which a Montgomery Medical affiliate has provided venture capital.Controlled Therapeutic, a development company, holds a license for a line of polymers designed to allow precise administration of pharmaceuticals without the need for mechanical equipment. 
Trade books are all books sold directly to consumers in book stores and through mail orders.McGraw-Hill noted that the college division's strengths in social sciences, humanities and foreign languages will complement its own line of business, accounting and engineering books. 
Seven years ago, 90% would have found it unprintable.ATTENTION, IMELDA MARCOS: A new line of numbered made-to-order designer shoes from Charles Jourdan cost up to $4,000 a pair. 
Poor quality and an unusually high rate of vacuum cleaner returns may have contributed significantly to Regina Co.'s recently disclosed financial problems.Interviews with retailers and vacuum cleaner industry executives indicate that several of Regina's Housekeeper cleaner lines have had high rates of return, bringing into question the company's sales figures. 
Problems with faulty belts, weak suction, or other flaws have led to return rates as high as 30% to 50% on certain models, some retailers said.Target Stores, a subsidiary of Dayton Hudson Corp., said in the last month it dropped one Regina line because of customer complaints. 
The plaintiffs in the suit, which seeks class-action status, are identified as investors who bought Regina stock between July 19 -- when the company released results for its year ended June 30 -- and Sept. 20, when Regina told analysts that first-quarter results would be lower than expected.The majority of the return problems seem to be with the Housekeeper vacuum line, which was introduced in 1986 and sells for $59 to $79, and the 1987 Housekeeper Plus line, which sells for about $100 to $150. 
But the old 1000 machine was discontinued last month, he said, and Regina is in the process of introducing a new version.Mr. Dorn added that other Regina lines haven't had such high rates of return. 
Officials at both companies said a return rate of as high as even 3% would be considered cause for alarm.A Target Stores spokesman said the 332-store chain discontinued Regina's Housekeeper Plus 5000 line, an updated and more expensive offering than the Housekeeper 1000, after "at least half" were returned. 
Lucas, with automotive, industrial and aerospace interests, has annual revenue exceeding $3 billion.Allied-Signal, based in Morris Township, N.J., said in March that it planned to shed Utica as part of a reorganization of its aerospace lines. 
But a recent case suggests patents can be obtained quickly enough to deter ripoffs.It took only nine months for Avia Group International, a unit of Reebok International Ltd., to get a patent on a line of running shoes. 
Backlogs stand at two years or more for many new aircraft models.The company's whole aerospace segment, both commercial and military lines, accounted for 73% of last year's sales. 
The purchase price was increased from $26 million, a sum on which the companies agreed earlier this month.Car Care markets car-wax products under the Rain Dance and Rally brand names, and a line of engine additives and performance chemicals under the No. 7 label. 
The small health and beauty aids concern said its filing listed assets of $1.6 million and liabilities of $1.2 million.It said it will continue to sell its line of solid perfumes, disposable thermometers and other products. 
"The Micro Channel is our strategy," said Bill Lowe, the head of IBM's PC division."We've been consistently saying that since April 1987," when the PS/2 line was introduced. 
"If we kept changing directions, I could see people questioning that."A new machine without Micro Channel would be significant because the Micro Channel is the ingredient in IBM's PS/2 line that it has promoted heavily as the major technological improvement over earlier PCs. 
That's because the Intel 80386-SX is more powerful than the 80286 used in the recently unveiled machine, even though the Micro Channel is supposed to be best-suited for powerful machines.IBM's defenders say the company is merely trying to get back into a part of the market that it abandoned too quickly when it introduced the PS/2 line a year and a half ago. 
"Is it $3.50, $2.50, a dollar, is it negative?" he asked.Mr. Sheelen has been a visible and outspoken salesman for Regina, often boasting that the company would become the leader of the $700 million vacuum-cleaner market by 1989, overtaking household name Hoover Co., a unit of Chicago Pacific Corp. Regina had traditionally been known as a marketer of lightweight "stick" cleaners, or electric brooms, but under Mr. Sheelen's direction the company has begun marketing a broad line of appliances. 
Coburn Optical Industries Inc., a Tulsa, Okla., subsidiary of the British concern Pilkington PLC, says U.S. sales have risen 50% in each of the past three years.The company recently introduced a new line of magnifiers with thicker handles so that users with arthritis can hold them easily. 
GM's new companywide program, called SmartLease and offered through General Motors Acceptance Corp., replaces a patchwork of leasing programs offered through GM's six vehicle marketing divisions.To launch SmartLease, and to give a shove to 1989 model sales, GM said it is offering special lease discounts of as much as $1,300 over four years on about 20 car and truck lines through Dec. 31. 
 Mattel Inc., Hawthorne, Calif., named Joseph S. Whitaker as senior vice president, marketing, with responsibility for its lines of boys' toys. 
Cars marketed as the Geo Metro is have altered the way the EPA breaks down the fuel-economy lists.Because of the increasing number of auto lines that spring, as the Geo Metro does, from U.S.-foreign joint ventures, the EPA no longer bothers to compile its list of the most fuel-efficient U.S. cars. 
Light trucks are among the most profitable vehicles built, with an average gross profit margin of 39% on each one sold, compared with an average of 35% on each car. (They are of particular importance to Chrysler.Sales of light trucks, including its Jeep line of vehicles and its minivans, make up 60% of the company's pretax profits.) 
Compaq Computer Corp. introduced a smaller version of one of its powerful desktop computers at a reduced price, a move aimed at heading off potential competition from International Business Machines Corp., analysts said.The announcement surprised many industry observers, who had expected Compaq to unveil its long-awaited line of laptop computers. 
Sept. 24-Nov. 27.Guggenheim Museum, Manhattan: "Andy Warhol, Cars" -- The 35 paintings and 12 drawings on view are part of an extensive series of works that was to depict a century of automotive history based on the Mercedes-Benz line. 
Bob Kosky was named to the newly created post of president of Christian Dior Sportswear & Accessories, a division of this apparel company.Mr. Kosky, 39 years old, had been president of the men's knitwear lines. 
Industry executives had expected the top job to go to William C. Lowe, the president of IBM's PC division.Industry executives and securities analysts have said Mr. Lowe, who was largely responsible for IBM's entry into the PC business seven years ago, gambled and lost by prematurely killing off IBM's AT line and trying to get customers to switch to the PS/2 line of personal computers. 
Industry executives and securities analysts have said Mr. Lowe, who was largely responsible for IBM's entry into the PC business seven years ago, gambled and lost by prematurely killing off IBM's AT line and trying to get customers to switch to the PS/2 line of personal computers.While IBM consistently has said it is pleased with the PS/2 line, a group of its competitors announced last week that it was producing a computer design to compete with the PS/2 design. 
By April, Suzuki expects to ship 20,000 of the cars and 30,000 of the sport-utility vehicles to the U.S.Versions of both vehicles will be imported by General Motors Corp. for its new Geo line. 
Chrysler Corp. said it will boost production of its profitable Jeep line of vehicles 20% in 1989, spending $24 million on plant improvements and adding 575 workers. 
Cosmetics giant Estee Lauder Inc. is making its first foray into regional marketing with an unusual strategy to sell products designed specifically for the West Coast and Japan.The cosmetics company's Aramis division plans to launch a line of men's fragrances next month -- called New West -- that will be sold in California for six months, and then marketed in Japan. 
Chrysler Corp. said it will boost production of its profitable Jeep line of vehicles 20% in 1989, spending $24 million on plant improvements and adding 575 workers.Sales of light trucks, including the popular Jeep line of sport-utility vehicles and pickups, make up more than two-thirds of the Highland Park, Mich., auto maker's pretax profit. 
"Like a pirate ship with a hundred guns, Hallmark's army of lawyers are trying to prove that might makes right."The dispute developed when Hallmark produced a line of cards similar to those of Blue Mountain -- both featured watercolor decorations and long free-verse poetry with mostly personal messages. 
Analysts said Digital will have a problem trying to sell both the workstations based on the Mips microprocessor and its older workstations, which are far less powerful."When they introduce a line, it will wipe out their VAXstation family," said Ms. Brown. 
A good example is its July purchase of Cessna Fluid Power division from General Dynamics Corp.The unit, with annual sales of about $100 million, fills out Eaton's hydraulics products line and provides an entry into Europe's hydraulics business. 
Beverly Hills High School is hoping that consumers will jump at the chance to wear the school's tony name on their tanktops and shorts.A new line of sportswear and athletic wear, emblazoned with the school's "BHHS" logo, was introduced at a trade show Friday in Los Angeles.The line, which will start appearing in upscale stores this holiday season at prices between $20 and $90 per article, is the result of a licensing agreement that the Beverly Hills Board of Education signed last year with Twentieth Century Fox Film Corp., granting the entertainment company exclusive rights to the Beverly Hills High School trademark. 
The district will get 60% of the royalties from the licensing arrangement.The clothing, made by Great Southern Co., Macon, Ga., comes in a rainbow of "trendy yet unique" colors, including bright orange, hot pink, turquoise and chartreuse, said Shannon Richey of San Diego-based Lucas Enterprises Inc., which is helping to market and promote the line. 
POSH PERFUMES are going to the dogs.Snooty Scents Inc. of Houston is selling a line of dog shampoos and conditioners that it claims smell like Obsession, Giorgio, Polo and Aramis. 
Many in the industry had expected the vacancy to be filled by William C. Lowe, the president of IBM's PC division, and say IBM's decision will be a referendum on his performance.Ulric Weil, a principal at Weil & Associates, a research firm said he believes Mr. Lowe didn't get the job because the executive had prematurely killed off IBM's AT line and tried to get customers to switch to the PS/2 line of personal computers, introduced a year and a half ago. 
IBM declined to confirm or deny that Mr. Gerstner was being transferred.It has consistently said, however, that it is pleased with the progress of the PS/2 line of personal computers. 
The production rate could be cut back by nearly half, without jeopardizing commitments it has with certain manufacturing plants to buy approximately 2.3 million pairs of shoes a month from them, Mr. Jacobson said."Nike has upscaled all of its line," said Alice A. Ruth, an industry analyst for Montgomery Securities, San Francisco. 
In last year's second half, Reebok's net was about $83 million.The earnings decline also raised questions of whether Reebok is losing even more ground to arch rival Nike Inc. Reebok overtook Nike in sales in 1986 but has recently seen Nike's Air shoe line erode its market share, according to people familiar with Reebok. 
The company's products perform 3-D graphics for workstations, primarily used in the manufacturing, scientific and engineering markets.IBM, Armonk, N.Y., will most likely use the technology in its IBM PC-RT line of technical workstations. 
The 2200-600 models will be roughly twice as powerful as those of the 1100-90 models they replace, the executives said.That will make them the most powerful in the mainframe line that came from Sperry Corp., which merged with Burroughs Corp. two years ago to form Unisys. 
Once a negligible presence in the U.S., the maker of chemicals, pharmaceuticals and fibers has quickly established itself in the U.S. chemicals market through sizable acquisitions.Over the past two years, it has bought the agricultural chemicals business of Union Carbide Corp. for $575 million and a basic chemicals line from Imperial Chemical Industries PLC for $505 million. 
As an unprofitable business now, analysts estimate it will sell for about $500 million -- or about half its annual revenue.The company may also be considering writing off the low-margin products, such as smaller TV sets, and finding a joint venture partner to help build up the more profitable lines, such as large-screen projection TVs. 
When Hallmark's former agency, Young & Rubicam Inc., began using emotional advertising for its client American Telephone & Telegraph Co., Hallmark saw that as a conflict of interest and dropped the agency.Included in the review will be Hallmark's lower-priced Ambassador line of cards, which Ogilvy, an Ogilvy Group Inc. unit, has advertised since 1981. 
This year's redesign of the DeVille and Fleetwood series is more significant.The two model lines are expected to account for about 64% of the 261,000 cars Cadillac expects to sell in the 1989 model-year. 
The Chevy Nova, for example, becomes the Geo Prizm, and like the others it will be sold exclusively through about 80% of Chevrolet's 5,000 or so U.S. dealers.The introduction of the Geo line marks the most ambitious attempt ever by Detroit to succeed at something that has largely eluded the Big Three for 30 years: marketing so-called captive imports -- vehicles made by a foreign company and sold through domestic dealerships. 
The car won't go on sale until May, so Chevy officials didn't say much about it.But they did say that the Lumina name will go on a line of vehicles -- including a coupe and a sleekly styled, plastic-body minivan -- that they expect will be one of the division's most popular vehicles in the 1990s. 
Families often shun two-door cars because it's more difficult to get children into and out of the back seats.The family focus for the line is one of the reasons Chevrolet decided to include under the Lumina umbrella its new minivan, nicknamed APV (for all-purpose vehicle), which won't be available until next June. 
In establishing products with consumers, he said, it's easier to focus ad dollars and marketing efforts if there's only one name to promote.Chevrolet is using the same approach with its Geo line of import cars that debuts this fall. 
Scientific Micro Systems Inc. said it sold, for about $10 million, most of the assets of its SuperMac Technology division to a group led by the division's management.The division makes and markets enhancements for Apple Computer Inc.'s Macintosh line of personal computers. 
Reebok has gone outside for marketing talent at a time when competition is increasing.Nike Inc., its chief rival, is hot on its heels, with the success of its Air shoe line. 
Playtex Family makes Playtex tampons, disposable nursers, gloves and Tek toothbrushes.The hair-care unit, Jhirmack Inc., makes a line of hair-care products sold in salons and pharmacies. 
Hyundai Motor America said it raised the base price on its line of 1989 Excel subcompact models as much as 3.4%. 
Armor All, an Irvine, Calif., maker of automotive-care products, said it will finance the acquisition initially from a combination of cash reserves and short-term borrowings.Borden's Car Care division markets car wax products under the Rain Dance and Rally brand names, and a line of engine additives and performance chemicals under the No. 7 label. 
Motorola Inc. and five of its former top semiconductor engineers who it sued last week for misappropriating confidential information reached a preliminary agreement that could result in the settlement of the lawsuit.According to a filing with a Texas state court in Austin, the five employees who now work for Ross Technology Inc. of Austin, agreed to refrain from using or sharing technical and marketing information about Motorola's line of microprocessor chips. 
Mr. Harrison said McCormick doesn't have a specific target in mind.But he indicated that the most likely type of candidate would fit with McCormick's retail or consumer-brand products, which include major lines of spices and sauce mixes. 
Sources close to both companies say that IBM has agreed to license some software technology from Next, including the so-called graphical user interface that controls the on-screen appearance of the Next computer and makes it easier to use than some others.The sources said IBM would like to use the software on its RT family of technical workstations, a line that has been a sluggish seller so far in a market that itself is the fastest growing segment of the computer industry. 
Terry Pillow, 35 years old, was named president of Chaps by Ralph Lauren, one of this apparel company's lines. 
George Ackerman resigned the position to pursue other interests.Mr. Pillow had been executive vice president of merchandising for the apparel line. 
Although the risks Mr. Canion faces are big, so are the potential benefits."Compaq would be the big winner" if the effort succeeds, says Charles Wolf, an analyst at First Boston Corp. Notably bearish on Compaq after IBM introduced the PS/2 line, he now views the company's outlook as bright: "With their distribution and marketing, they would be the high-end leader in the marketplace. 
In the latest nine months, Rockwell had net income of $626 million, or $2.34 a share, on sales of $8.79 billion.Sales from the automotive lines of Rockwell, based in El Segundo, Calif., will jump to $2.1 billion from last year's record $1.7 billion, he said, adding that the company views the growth of its auto business as "substantial progress we are making in replacing B-1B sales and earnings." 
But both sides agreed that the new PC war could confuse their customers and hurt everyone's sales.A string of new PC products was introduced by IBM in a bid to beef up its personal computer line. 
Mr. Sugar's comments came at a news conference yesterday to introduce a new range of Amstrad personal computers.Contrary to prior press reports, the new machines aren't fully compatible with industry leader International Business Machines Corp.'s new line of Personal System/2 personal computers. 
The unit will sell air conditioners to GE and other customers under private label as well as the Fedders, Airtemp and Climatrol brands.Fedders makes a broad line of room air conditioners. 
A lot of users were still trying to figure out just what difference IBM's Micro Channel makes when rumors began circulating last month about a personal computer coming from Big Blue that won't have the vaunted Micro Channel.IBM has also been trumpeting another new way to stay on the cutting edge of PC technology: Take out the old software at the heart of your machines (DOS) and replace it with a new program (OS/2 -- not to be confused with PS/2, the name of IBM's new line of personal computers). 
This spring just two companies -- Tandy Corp. and Dell Computer Corp. -- introduced PS/2 clones.Like parents of a new baby anxious not to upset their older child, they both declared that their PS/2 look-alikes were great products, but not so great that their clones of the old IBM PC line wouldn't still be big sellers. 
Moreover, PC add-on boards, used increasingly to add speed and functions, have to fit whatever bus is inside a machine.IBM will also be making news today (just a crosstown bus away from the gang of nine) when it unveils the latest addition to its PS/2 line. 
In the past that strategy has made businesses nervous about buying Apple's maverick machines.But now Apple can point to the scuffling going on in the IBM world as a reason to opt for the more stable Macintosh line. 
Mattel Inc. is preparing to flood the country with 582 million store-redeemable coupons this fall as the centerpiece of a new marketing campaign.The coupons offer discounts of $1 to $5 on toys including Barbie and other dolls, Hot Wheels Speed Shift 500 race sets, TV Play-Along Wheel of Fortune games, and a new line of Disney infant and preschool toys. 
Other analysts, though, stress that the coupon concept may need fine-tuning."Barbie is red hot and Hot Wheels has emerged as one of the fastest selling toy lines in the country," says Paul Valentine of Standard & Poor's Corp., noting that parents always seem willing to pay a premium for the hottest toys. 
Kayser-Roth Hosiery Inc. plans to unveil today a new brand of pantyhose that it hopes will lure department-store shoppers into the supermarket to buy their dressy nylons.Called Burlington Sheer Indulgence, the hosiery line is an attempt to develop a new niche and bring some excitement to the sagging pantyhose market. 
Sheer Indulgence will be sold in food, drug and discount stores and will be promoted as "department-store quality at affordable prices."The line is priced between $2.25 to $4.40, which Kayser-Roth says puts it about 20% above such mass-marketed pantyhose brands as its own No Nonsense and Sara Lee Corp.'s L'eggs, but about 20% less than Sara Lee's Hanes and other department-store brands. 
David B. Jones, chief executive officer of Holiday's Homewood Suites unit, said the company has signed contracts with franchisees this year to develop 55 extended-stay hotels, which are expected to start opening next summer.He predicted Holiday's line would grow more rapidly than Marriott's because Holiday plans to rely on franchisees to develop 80% of its extended-stay hotels. 
Seagram said dividend income from its 22.9% stake in Du Pont was $52 million for the quarter and $98.5 million for the six months.The company's beverage line includes distilled spirits, wines, wine and spirits coolers and juices. 
"GM has lost market share in every market segment in which it competes," said Ronald A. Glantz, an analyst with Montgomery Securities in San Francisco.He said GM's success this year with its Chevrolet Beretta and Corsica compact cars seems to have come at the expense of its other car lines, including its new intermediates, the Pontiac Grand Prix, Buick Regal and Oldsmobile Cutlass Supreme. 
After months of hesitation, the European personal computer industry is gearing up to clone International Business Machines Corp.'s struggling new line of personal computers. 
After months of hesitation, the European personal computer industry is gearing up to clone International Business Machines Corp.'s struggling new line of personal computers.Starting this week with the announcement by Britain's Apricot Computer PLC, most of Europe's major personal-computer makers are expected to unveil plans to sell machines compatible with IBM's Personal System/2 line. 
The IBM spokesman added that the European product announcements confirm the company's view that PS/2 "is the way forward for our customers into 1990s."IBM launched the PS/2 line to regain market share lost to U.S., European and Asian clones of its PC and AT lines. 
But experts say that program trading of the kind that contributed to the volatility of the New York stock market during the October crash is still a long way off.Japanese brokerage firms are yet not allowed to hook up direct computer lines to the Tokyo Stock Exchange. 
The group is expected to develop what it hopes will become a standard "bus," the component that handles the communications flow inside a computer, letting the central processor talk to the keyboard, the floppy disk and so forth.The IBM rivals are expected to argue that their bus will provide all the advantages of IBM's Micro Channel bus, which, though arcane, the company has marketed hard as the major innovation of its PS/2 line. 
Eric Zimits, an analyst with Morgan Keegan & Co., said the company has a 50% share of that market, and derives more than 70% of its profit from it."There has been a lot of speculation that the Irma line is due for obsolescence," said Mr. Zimits. 
To be sure, a few companies are trying to use the Olympics to make the transition from a subcontractor to an internationally known brand.Kukje Corp. shifted from producing Nike shoes to developing its own Pro-Specs line of athletic shoes five years ago. 
The effort, a major challenge to IBM, will include Compaq and Tandy.Europe's computer industry is set to begin cloning IBM's struggling new line of personal computers. 
This is a big week for Sun Microsystems Inc., as more chip and computer manufacturers sign on to Sun's grand plan to establish a high-performance computer design standard for the industry to clone.Today, Sun and Texas Instruments Inc. will outline a sweeping technology licensing agreement under which Texas Instruments' chip division will manufacture Sun's high-performance Sparc microprocessor and its computer systems division will begin using the Sparc chip to power a new line of computers. 
Chrysler Corp. is attempting to jump-start the sluggish sales of its Eagle Premier luxury car by boosting cash incentives 25% to $750.The move comes at a time when rebates on most cars are being reduced, and thus reflects the difficulties Chrysler has faced since late last year with the flagship of the new Eagle line. 
Recently, Mr. Taki said he will invest in another Seventh Avenue designer, Jeffrey Banks, a 34-year-old menswear designer who has run his own struggling business since 1985.Mr. Banks's chief success so far came when he was head designer of Merona Sport sportswear, a hot-selling line of boldly colored knit weekend clothes that became as trendy in the early 1980s as jogging suits once were. 
Terms of the agreement weren't disclosed.The first products introduced under the program will be a line of men's and women's sportswear, which will make its debut next March. 
The Masson repositioning is the latest attempt by a major vintner to appeal to wine drinkers' increasingly sophisticated palates.Earlier this year, for example, No. 2-ranked Heublein Inc., owned by Grand Metropolitan Inc., introduced a line called Sylvan Springs and is now rolling out Navalle Selections to expand its presence in fighting varietals. 
As the capacity utilization figures indicate, the American economy is terrific at production.However, once a product is off the line and in the hands of a customer, it seems that all too often the system breaks down. 
Within days, Prime Minister Noboru Takeshita felt compelled to apologize for his country.But for Sanrio, which produced and marketed the Sambo caricatures as the design on a best-selling line of toys and beachwear, the consequences were more tangible and potentially more lasting. 
Then came a Securities and Exchange Commission investigation of the company's disclosure of certain financial information.Later, it was the delay of a much-heralded computer line. 
XTC Products Inc., a Larchmont, N.Y., toy maker, filed suit in New York, charging Walt Disney Co. and Dover Handbag Co. with trademark infringement.Since 1983, XTC has marketed a line of soft toys under the trademark Hugg-A-Planet. 
The value of Beatrice assets sold so far, about $8 billion, still doesn't equal the amount investors paid for the company.Donald P. Kelly, Beatrice's chairman, has auctioned off 10 major businesses, including the company's Coca-Cola bottlers and Tropicana juice lines, in an effort to break even. 
A special dividend may help save Kohlberg Kravis from possible investor criticism that it overpaid for Beatrice.A year ago, some Beatrice insiders boasted that by selling off Beatrice's remaining major businesses -- its lines of Hunt tomato products, Wesson cooking oils and Swift meats -- the investors would earn a pre-tax profit that could exceed $3 billion. 
The company hopes to get federal clearance later this year to begin human tests of the melanin skin cream and to invade the $300 million-a-year sun-screen market in 1990."We're developing a new line of skin protectants based on melanin produced by genetic engineering," says Sergio Nacht, vice president for research and development and a biochemist who has specialized in dermatology research. 
The Washington-based consumer group said its rankings were based on information compiled by the Department of Transportation but not widely disseminated.The group's analysis showed General Tire's Ameri Classic line should last between 66,000 and 70,000 miles, depending on the size of the tire. 
In fact, some of the tires that rank low in the center's study are specially designed for better handling and are used primarily in motor-racing sports.For instance, at the bottom of the center's list were Goodrich's T/A R and R1 line made by Uniroyal Goodrich Tire Co., Akron, and Yokohama Tire Co.'s A001R/A008R. 
The center said neither tire should last more than 10,000 miles on average.But a spokeswoman at Uniroyal Goodrich said its T/A R and R1 lines are essentially road-racing tires that aren't expected to last long. 
She said the tires are shaved to low tread depth for competition.Japan's Yokohama couldn't be reached, but industry experts said its A001R/A008R line also is a racing-style tire. 
Armstrong is a unit of the Pirelli group of Italy.However, a spokesman for Armstrong in New Haven, Conn., said the study apparently was based on dated information, explaining that its Tru Trac line was phased out in early 1986 and replaced with a line called Coronet Ultra Trac, which was rated in the study to last between 40,000 and 44,000 miles.Another Armstrong line cited in the study was discontinued in 1984, the Armstrong spokesman said. 
Operating systems are programming that control the inner workings of computers.The new Digital products further extend the company's line of equipment based on the Ultrix operating system, which utilizes a standard developed by American Telephone & Telegraph Co. that has been widely adopted in the industry. 
For the full year 1987 the company earned $16.8 million on $366 million in sales.During the latest six month period, the company said it had a 30% increase in unit volume in women's apparel and children's wear, as well as some selected price increases in women's jeans, sales from a new menswear line, and the opening of additional retail stores. 
KITCHEN appliances that hang below wall cabinets are marketed as space savers, so the thinner they look, the better.Black & Decker Inc.'s new Spacemaker Plus line is indeed thin -- some appliances measure less than half the height of the models they replace. 
But clever design makes them appear even thinner than they are.This week the line of appliances, which includes a coffee maker, can opener with optional knife-sharpener and a task light, won the Industrial Design Excellence Award in the "product" category from the Industrial Designers Society of America. 
The company said it was the largest first-customer shipment of a multiuser system in its history.As previously reported, the new AS/400 line is part of the computer giant's bid to regain dominance in the midrange computer market. 
The new line merges the IBM System 36 and System 38 machines.Doing so removes the incompatibilities between two of the three major minicomputer lines that IBM sells. 
Hallmark Cards Inc., Kansas City, Mo., said it has petitioned the Supreme Court of the U.S. to overturn an appellate court decision that has temporarily enjoined the firm from selling greeting cards that resemble those of a small Colorado concern.Hallmark had been sued by Blue Mountain Arts Inc. of Boulder, Colo., for trademark violations, contending that Hallmark's Personal Touch line of cards was too similar to Blue Mountain Arts' products. 
ADVERTISING: Ingalls, Quinn & Johnson said it was designated by Gillette Co. to handle the advertising and promotional support for the test marketing of a new line of skin care products called Myoko. 
Mr. Kelly's compensation and share of the profit is more than $16 million, according to Beatrice documents.Little remains of Beatrice except its lines of Hunt tomato products, Wesson cooking oils and Swift meats. 
A spokesman for the judge said Friday that she had approved the transaction.The lines and the factories where they are produced are being sold to Hasbro Inc. and SLM Action Sports Inc. 
The Reagan administration, however, isn't completely satisfied with such disclaimers.U.S. officials are checking to see whether some Japanese producers are quietly stashing away chips for new computer lines and not reporting these inventories to the MITI. 
In the past two years, Textron has set up a new management team for Gorham, consolidated some of its operations and eliminated some of its unprofitable items, such as stuffed teddy bears and coffee cups, which it sold for several manufacturers.Textron said the trimmed-down line now concentrates solely on the production and sale of silver spoons, fine dinnerware, lead crystal and silverplated holloware, for which it is best known. 
Mitsubishi Motor Sales of America raised by as much as 3.4% the base prices of its Galant and Mirage car lines. 
The price on the Galant four-door automatic-transmission model rose 3.4% to $11,819 from $11,429.The company also said it raised prices on its Mirage line by 3% across the board, including a $350 price increase to $11,969 on its most expensive Mirage, the turbo-charged hatchback model. 
Personal computer industry executives are expecting International Business Machines Corp. to bring out soon a new microcomputer with a design similar to the one IBM superseded with much fanfare last year.The move would be a surprise because IBM has been noisily touting the new design, which it calls the Micro Channel, inside its 16-month-old PS/2 line of personal computers. 
But he said he never indicated that had to happen at the same time a low-end machine got the 80286 central processor, to improve upon the less powerful 8086 processor these machines now use.The 80286 is currently used in the middle of the PS/2 line and in the past was used in making the IBM PC-AT. 
IBM has already prepared the market for a new, low-end personal computer.It said earlier this year it intended to bring out a low-cost PS/2 built around Intel Corp.'s 80286 chip, which is currently at the heart of the machines in the middle of the PS/2 line. 
The distribution chains are long, the prices are high and supermarkets are reluctant to handle highly perishable items."In the U.S., there really isn't a well-organized refrigerated trucking and warehouse system -- how will they find the distribution capability to support their Kings stores with the St. Michael line?" asks Willard Bishop, a supermarket consultant. 
He adds: "People would be doing much more of this if they could figure out how to bring it to market broadly."Indeed, Campbell last year withdrew its Fresh Chef line of refrigerated sauces, soups and salads from national distribution after incurring substantial losses, while General Food's Culinova line of upscale entrees is barely hanging on. 
Although Mr. Sculley may be reinventing Apple, it isn't clear whether his organizational changes and newfound vision will result in new breakthrough products.So far, the company has been making the most of the Macintosh and Apple II lines, both offspring of the Jobs years. 
Katy Industries Inc. said that it completed the previously announced sale of its Missouri-Kansas-Texas Railroad unit to Union Pacific Corp. and that it plans to record a gain of about $81 million, or $12.93 a share, on the sale in the third quarter.Selling the 3,000-mile system, commonly known as the Katy line, will enable Katy to focus on its consumer products and industrial machinery operations. 
A TRW Inc. unit told Paccar to suspend delivery of Paccar's Peterbilt and Kenworth trucks because of potential defects in TRW's power-steering mechanism.The two truck lines represent about 80% of Paccar's sales. 
In some of their current operations, they've focused on auto repair and maintenance products, realizing consumers are keeping their cars longer.They are likely to sell Interco's apparel manufacturing and general retailing operations, including such lines as London Fog rain gear and Converse and Florsheim shoes. 
Turbine Services parts made from the drawings, valued by GE at about $6 million, must be locked up in a bonded warehouse for five years.And Turbine Services is prohibited from dealing in parts for several lines of gas turbines for five to 10 years. 
For example, the lowest priced 1989 Pontiac Grand Prix will cost $13,899, up 10.8%, or $1,360, from the 1988 base model price of $12,539.The Grand Prix, the best-selling of GM's new line of midsized cars, will now have air conditioning as standard equipment. 
In addition, it has notified dealers not to sell Paccar trucks produced since April.Paccar declined to estimate how much the recall would affect its profitability, but the two truck lines account for about 80% of the company's sales. 
Under the pact, Fujitsu estimates it will sell between 25,000 and 30,000 Sun workstations, with about 90% of the sales in Japan.The pact also allows Fujitsu, Japan's largest computer supplier, to enhance its existing lines of microcomputers, minicomputers, workstations and mainframes with products from Sun's Sun-3 and Sun-4 workstation families. 
Atari Corp. reported strong second-quarter profits from its computer and video lines, but they were partly offset by unexpectedly high losses from its Federated Group unit, which it acquired last year. 
Sales for the period jumped to $164.6 million from $70.7 million a year ago.The company said its computer and video lines performed strongly, as expected, but that its results were hurt by its Federated Group operations, a string of consumer electronics stores it acquired last October. 
Nord Resources Corp., Dayton, Ohio, said it will spend $30 million to expand its Jeffersonville, Ga., plant to make several new products for its line of paper filling and coating clays. 
Even with the U.S. action, though, industry officials say shortages of the chips are likely to continue because current production capacity is insufficient to meet an unanticipated surge in U.S. demand for the advanced chips.On the supply side, the shortages are caused mainly by quality-control problems encountered by Japan's NEC Corp. on its new DRAM lines and Hitachi Ltd.'s slow recovery from an earthquake in Japan that damaged one of its chip plants. 
Executives at K mart Corp. were surprised last year when Martha Stewart, an author of books on lavish cooking and entertaining, showed them she could set an elegant table from items sold at the company's discount stores."We couldn't believe it was our merchandise," recalls Michael Wellman, the company's vice president of marketing, who is now working with Mrs. Stewart to develop an exclusive line of household goods for K mart. 
Mr. Antonini says the company suffered from a "malaise" because it had expanded so much that its "growth opportunities might appear to be limited."Mr. Antonini, who revitalized the company's apparel operations by introducing the Jaclyn Smith line in 1985, is trying to change that, partly by enlarging K mart stores and playing catch-up in computerization. 
"That's the customer we felt we were not serving properly before," says Mr. Wellman, the marketing vice president.Aiming at that market, K mart plans early next year to start selling an exclusive line of stylish kitchen, bedroom and bath items bearing Mrs. Stewart's name. 
The plan to test as many as 40 McKids specialty stores in shopping malls over the next two years is part of a broader effort by Sears to revitalize its sagging retailing operations.The McKids stores will carry national brands as well as an exclusive line of McKids clothing and toys. 
Prices will be in the "moderate" to "upper moderate" range, the spokesman said.The McKids store concept is an outgrowth of Sears's successful arrangement with Oak Brook, Ill.-based McDonald's to license a McKids clothing line now sold in 750 of its 821 Sears stores.The line, which was introduced in 1987, is expected to generate sales of $175 million this year. 
It also is trying to improve logistics and make production more efficient to compete better with German counterparts.It's setting up manufacturing in local markets with local designers, including some lower-priced lines, instead of concentrating mainly on making clothes in Italy for export. 
And it's looking to new markets, such as the Soviet Union and China, where potential is huge but initial investment can be small.Founded in 1868 as a maker of ready-to-wear clothing, GFT by 1987 made 60 different lines of clothes, including some of its own design, which it distributes in 70 countries. 
McCormick & Co. is repackaging its entire line of spices and seasonings, tossing out its familiar red and white tins for fancy-labeled plastic bottles. 
Still, McCormick expects to rake in $15 million to $20 million in business from new grocery-store accounts this year.Robert Wunderle, a spokesman for Woodbridge, N.J.-based Supermarkets General Corp., calls the line "much improved." 
Prime Motor Inns dropped 1 3/8 to 34 3/8.Montgomery Securities lowered its estimate of the company's 1989 net income to $2.50 a share from $2.65 on a fully diluted basis, citing an expected drop in interest income as a result of the company's plans for funding the development of a new line of hotels. 
The group said sales of software for personal computers made by International Business Machines Corp. and compatible makers, rose 44% to $1.39 billion, accounting for 76% of the market.Sales of software for Apple Computer Inc.'s Macintosh line rose 130% to $192.3 million or 10.6% of the industry. 
But can GE?Critics say the fallout from Mr. Welch's swap last year of GE's consumer-electronics business for the medical-equipment lines of Paris-based Thomson illustrates the price GE pays for his style. 
LTV also took a $30 million special charge on its exit from the medium and heavy military truck business.LTV announced last month that its AM General division would discontinue those lines so it could concentrate on its U.S. Army contract for the Hummer high mobility vehicle, which will be opened for a rebid next year. 
A consumer-health group accused an RJR Nabisco Inc. unit of misleading consumers about the contents of a popular line of fruit drinks. 
A consumer-health group accused an RJR Nabisco Inc. unit of misleading consumers about the contents of a popular line of fruit drinks.The Center for Science in the Public Interest said it asked the Food and Drug Administration to order the Del Monte Foods unit to change the name of its Fruit Blends line. 
It features many of the New York area's leading politicians and media figures, but mixes up their jobs and genealogies to such an extent that part of the fun is figuring out exactly who is who."Family Politics" tells the story of the surviving remnant of the Daley family, the makers of a notable line of cars whose business has fallen into disrepair and whose members are falling into the kind of financial condition that only the wealthy could consider poverty-stricken. 
IBM raised prices on such products as operating-system software, which controls the basic operations of a computer, and on big disk drives, which store data for mainframes and big minicomputers.The Armonk, N.Y., company also raised prices on its 9370 line of minicomputers, even though they have gotten off to a slow start, and on maintenance, even though competition for maintenance contracts has been particularly fierce. 
Still, there were some notable absences from IBM's list of price increases.Prices weren't changed for IBM's new mainframe models, its new AS/400 minicomputer line or most personal computers. 
A USG spokesman said the businesses to be sold "don't fit in with {USG's} core businesses" and don't meet "minimum margin requirements."USG considers its gypsum, ceiling-tile and DAP repair and remodeling lines as well as its wallboard distribution business as core operations, the spokesman said. 
Amdahl Corp., playing tit for tat with arch-rival International Business Machines Corp., said it lopped off 10% to 14% from the price of its mainframe computers.As previously reported, last week, Armonk, N.Y.-based IBM unveiled a new line of aggressively priced mainframe machines in a bid to undersell feisty Amdahl. 
Using other data on her coloring and age, the computer produces printouts with color recommendations for "casual," "polished" and "evening" looks.Noxell Corp., which already has computers, recently started an ad campaign for its Clarion cosmetics line that touts the machines' ability to make the "right" choice. 
No one, however, is predicting a resurgence in generic foods -- the plain-labeled, cut-rate products that took over aisles of space in some supermarkets during the inflation-ridden 1970s.While such lines will continue to be offered in relatively small sections of most stores, consultants expect that consumers will instead be looking to an increased number of low-priced name brands and house brands -- products that are cheaper than heavily advertised top brands but seem to offer comparable quality. 
Beyond scoring points in that public-image battle, IBM's new line, the 3090 Model S, is intended to give customers the improvements in price and performance they expect every couple of years.The Armonk, N.Y., company last overhauled its mainframe line in January 1987. 
IBM unveiled a line of mainframe computers in a bid to win back marketing ground lost to rival Amdahl. 
The 1988 Taurus and Sable models aren't affected because their gas tanks are of a different design, the spokesman said.This is the latest in a series of quality embarrassments to hit the Taurus-Sable line, launched in the 1986 model year. 
Last summer, the Taurus and Sable models were included in a recall of 4.3 million Ford vehicles to correct fuel-line defects linked to 230 engine fires.Ford has conducted five other safety-related recalls affecting smaller numbers of the Taurus and Sable line, as well as four recalls to fix problems not related to safety, a company spokesman said. 
Retailers thought the change -- to bolder colors, busier patterns and higher prices -- too much for the Arrow man.For the most part, they rejected the new sport shirt line, forcing Cluett to unload much of it to discounters at fire-sale prices. 
That lowered West Point's net income from continuing operations to $7.5 million, or 25 cents a share, from $11.6 million, or 38 cents a share, in the year-earlier quarter.Cluett had transformed much of its normally classic, plain-vanilla, mid-priced line of sport shirts into threads it hoped would draw a younger, more affluent buyer.Normally safe shades of blues, browns and grays became more vibrant, and the spring line of Arrow sport shirts included a mix of bolder primary colors, busy stripes and multi-colored madras. 
Moreover, in the confusion following the takeover, the designers became isolated not only from Arrow customers but also from the company's own sales staff.Last spring and summer, as they were creating the bolder spring line, the designers failed to notice that both retailers and consumers were becoming more conservative. 
That shift intensified after last October's stock market crash.Cluett "seemed to have had the line misstriped and miscolored," says an executive at a rival, who credits Cluett's mistake for a 15% to 20% rise in his own sales. 
Moreover, say Cluett executives, the designers skimped on quality.For one thing, the higher-priced shirts in the line didn't look much different from their less-expensive counterparts, says Harold Streitman, Cluett's new design director for sportswear. 
And managers are on the lookout for niche markets.An example: Cluett is talking about developing for the first time a line of shirts to be sold only in California and Florida. 
But many doubt it can beat out four Japanese rivals, who control the market.Moreover, since Mr. McGovern took over, the company has cranked out hundreds of new products and line extensions to cut its reliance on soup, which provides 30% of sales.But some like Fresh Chef, a line of refrigerated products, have been costly flops. 
Tandy Corp., Fort Worth, Texas, introduced four computers that beef up its personal computer line. 
The new 4000 LX uses a faster version of the chip and will sell for $3,999, the company said.Tandy also added a new computer using the 80286 microchip to its line. 
Toto, however, is going to give it a try.The company doesn't have much to show for its 20-year presence in the U.S., so it thinks a product that sets its line off from the run-of-the-mill porcelain fixture might be the key to success. 
Sales, which plummeted to $8 million last year from nearly $35 million in 1984, are expected to hit $12 million this year and more than $20 million in 1989.Less than a year ago, Mr. Kramer was importing about 60% of his line to survive and bracing for the end. 
The Indianapolis company was formed last fall after Ransburg Corp. decided to pull the plug on its loss-ridden industrial robot business.Two entrepreneurs acquired a line of Ransburg's welding robots. 
MiniScribe Corp. said it reached an agreement calling for ComputerLand Corp. to carry a line of MiniScribe's hard disk drives in its retail stores. 
Sales rose to $135.8 million from $63.2 million.AST cited its growing personal-computer lines. 
The company cited higher unit sales growth in most product lines, particularly in international markets; a weaker dollar, and inclusion of the results of Alkaril Chemicals Ltd., which GAF acquired in the fourth quarter of 1987.Earnings from building-materials lines fell 13% to $9.1 million, though sales rose 17% to $119.5 million. 
Development of sophisticated computer data bases is fueling telemarketing's growth, says the Conference Board's Earl Bailey.BRIEFS: A line of shoes for pregnant women from Thorpe Shoe is called "O.B. 
The company bought back 21 million common shares in a "Dutch auction," and had 239.1 million shares outstanding as of June 30, compared with 250.9 million a year ago.Operating profit in RJR's food business climbed 14%, to $271 million from $238 million, sparked by strong volume gains in the Nabisco Brands cookie and cracker lines and in some of the specialty products of its grocery business. 
American Brands Inc., Old Greenwich, Conn., reported second-quarter earnings rose 44% as sales advanced 27%, citing the strength in its core tobacco and distilled-spirits lines. 
Pfizer, New York, said sales rose 8.9% to $1.34 billion from $1.23 billion, reflecting gains in all five of its business segments.Sales rose 9% for health-care lines, 13% for agriculture, 12% for consumer products, 8% for materials science and 4% for specialty chemicals. 
Last year, the nation's second-largest retailer hired Martha Stewart, an author of books on lavish cooking and entertaining, as a celebrity spokeswoman.It is now developing an exclusive line of household merchandise that bears her name. 
It is now developing an exclusive line of household merchandise that bears her name.Chicago-based Sears, Roebuck & Co., meanwhile, is selling a line of McKids clothing under a licensing arrangement with McDonald's Corp. and is developing other children's products under a similar agreement with Walt Disney Co. 
A North Carolina auto dealer plans to use the Japanese-style "house call" method to sell Toyota Motor Corp.'s new line of luxury cars in the U.S. 
A North Carolina auto dealer plans to use the Japanese-style "house call" method to sell Toyota Motor Corp.'s new line of luxury cars in the U.S.Rick Hendrick III, who runs one of the nation's largest multifranchise "megadealerships" out of Charlotte, N.C., said he plans to sell Toyota's new Lexus line of upscale cars by using the sales technique in some North and South Carolina markets. 
Warner-Lambert Co., Morris Plains, N.J., said second-quarter net income grew 13%, reflecting continued strength in its lines of prescription and over-the-counter pharmaceuticals, gums and mints. 
Storage Technology Corp. said it unveiled a new line of impact printers capable of printing between 2,100 and 5,000 lines a minute. 
Mr. Kobayashi says he hasn't had a vacation in 20 years.The major companies contract out their less-profitable and specialty lines to such "pappa-mamma" factories, which contitute more than half the industry. 
Hitachi says it already loses money making appliances, and the whole industry "is very exposed," says Yutaka Sugiyama, a Nomura Research analyst.Battling the imports invasion, Japanese companies are moving quickly into high-tech, high-value-added lines. 
Home Shopping Network Inc. said its HSN Health Care Services Inc. unit has signed an agreement with Spiegel Inc. to jointly market a line of vitamins, minerals and other health-care products. 
Industrial chemical profit rose 6% to $14.2 million from $13.3 million, while agricultural chemical profit more than doubled to $9.4 million from $4.5 million.Plastics profit remained flat because of the sale of the Kydex rigid-sheet plastics line last year. 
Now the makers of Beretta, the gun, are suing the maker of Beretta, the hot-selling car, for $250 million in damages in a trademark infringement suit filed yesterday in federal court in Manhattan.Fabbrica d'Armi P. Beretta S.p.A. said yesterday that GM's use of the Beretta name on a line of compact cars "is an affront not only to the Beretta corporation, but also to the Beretta family." 
Analysts said the tests appear to be the most rigorous competitive tests yet run.However, they noted that IBM has recently introduced a line of midrange computers, the AS/400, for which Digital extrapolated performance instead of measuring actual machines. 
BOC Group PLC agreed to buy the Vacuum Products division of Varian Associates Inc. for $65.8 million.The Windlesham, England, maker of industrial gases and health-care products said it will integrate Varian's Vacuum Products line into BOC's Edwards High Vacuum International unit, based in London. 
General Motors Corp. said it will lay off indefinitely 800 employees at its Doraville, Ga., assembly plant -- a further indication of slow sales of an important line of new mid-size cars. 
However, the case has been clouded recently because Kodak is seeking to stay the infringement ruling on the ground that the judge had a potential financial interest in the outcome.Polaroid's entry into the conventional-film business will put it into competition with Kodak in a major photography market for the first time since Kodak dropped its instant camera line as a result of the patent decision. 
Daniel Bricklin, who as the co-author of the VisiCalc software program helped launch the personal computer, said he is selling off his latest software line rather than building another company. 
The payoffs from this level of investment were obvious last year with Attack -- an "enzymatic," concentrated laundry detergent that took Japan by storm, coming out of nowhere to give Kao a 40.5% share of Japan's detergent market, up 7.1 percentage points from the year before.The focus on R&D is similarly trumpeted with Kao's Biore line of skin ceams and its Sofina cosmetics, both of which are expected to be broadly marketed in the U.S. eventually. 
Whether or not Kao's products actually represent scientific breakthroughs, the company has been able to successfully market them in Japan by sheer weight of advertising dollars.According to Tokyo-based Dentsu Inc., the world's biggest ad agency, Kao spent 35.4 billion yen on advertising in its last fiscal year, putting it ahead of Toyota Motor Corp., Nissan Motor Co., Honda Motor Co. and Lion Corp., Kao's major competitor in some lines. 
Byte magazine posed that question to 5,000 attendees of a recent trade show.The top vote-getter, with 32%: OS/2, the system inside International Business Machines Corp.'s new line of personal computers.But DOS, the system inside IBM's previous line, trailed close behind with 30%, suggesting a big chunk of the industry is still resisting IBM's push for OS/2. 
Such a reaction would be avoided, however, if only the donor's stem cells were transplanted.The stem cells wouldn't attack the recipient's tissues but, instead, would migrate to various parts of the recipient's body and churn out a complete line of progeny blood cells that would be compatible with the recipient's body. 
The range of specialized services now includes rack-and-pinon steering system maintenance, truck and van wheel alignment, fuel injection cleaning and suspension system repairs.To supplement its inexpensive, private-label line of Cornell tires and to attract upscale customers, the company now stocks such brands as Bridgestone, Goodyear and Goodrich.In addition, Pep Boys is carrying Raybestos, a more expensive brand of brakes, and a line of lifetime-warranty parts called True Blue. 
Nissan Motor Corp. U.S.A. chose Hill, Holliday, Connors, Cosmopulos Inc. Friday to create advertising for its new Infiniti line of luxury cars that are scheduled for introduction in 1989. 
The agency also "picked the brains" of several journalists who write about cars, and conducted focus groups in four different markets to explore consumer feelings about the import market, the spokesman said.Nissan's Infiniti line will be another entrant in the increasingly crowded luxury-car market. 
Carter-Wallace's share amounts to over 50% of the total market.When Carter-Wallace, a maker of pharmaceuticals, toiletries and cosmetics, acquired the Trojan line from Youngs Drug Products Corp. back in 1985, condom sales were in the doldrums. 
Britain's plan to eliminate all glass containers from retail stores by 1989 is spurring demand for European plastic beverage containers, a market in which Lawson Mardon has a 42% share.Mr. Tapp said the rigid plastics group should continue to benefit from growing demand for its PET line of plastic containers, made from polyethylene terephthalate, which had sales of C$49 million last year. 
In 1987, the group had operating income of C$20.7 million on sales of C$224 million.Mr. Tapp said the group is emphasizing specialized products, such as its Cardene line of folding cartons, which combine plastic and cardboard materials. 
Eight of the Farm Credit System's 12 regional banks for cooperatives voted to merge into a single national bank with $9.3 billion in assets.The new consolidated bank, which will begin operations Jan. 1 in Denver, will be authorized to provide a full line of financial services to agricultural cooperatives and rural utilities anywhere in the U.S. 
The company said the shortage hasn't interrupted shipments of existing products.As previously reported, however, Hewlett-Packard has delayed since March introduction of a new model of its Vectra line of office personal computers, "solely because we knew we wouldn't be able to get sufficient chips to produce it." 
Buick has offered option-package discounts on the third GM-10 model, the Regal, for the past four months.The incentives to spur sales of those new midsized cars, considered crucial to GM's turnaround in sales, come as the No. 1 auto maker is fine-tuning incentives across its model line to balance expected demand with production plans for the rest of the model year. 
Apparently, the only other rebate that matches Yugo's in scale is Audi of America Inc.'s $4,000 rebate on its $22,180 Audi 5000 models.That is an acknowledged fire-sale for a model scarred by allegations of unintended acceleration, and the company, a unit of Volkswagen AG, is discontinuing that line. 
"We're so broadly based across the economy that we just reflect what's happening," Mr. Frankel said.Aceto's line of chemicals used in dyes and pigments have done "particularly well this year," Mr. Frankel said, because of the strong demand for color inks used in magazines and newspapers. 
He said the move was made possible by technological changes that allow for more automation of manufacturing and caused a shrinkage in the size of the products being manufactured.As part of the consolidation, IBM will phase out its personal-computer manufacturing operations in Boca Raton, Fla., over the next 12 months and move them to Raleigh, N.C., where the low-end models of IBM's line are now produced. 
Hill Holliday will be propelled even further up in the ranks of U.S. ad agencies if it wins the $60 million account of Los Angeles-based Nissan Motor Corp. U.S.A.'s Infiniti division.Winning would also take the sting from the agency's failure in May to capture General Motors Corp.'s $100 million account for its new Saturn line. 
Mr. Naples said he expects "pockets of strengths and weaknesses" to continue in the business during the remaining six months.He said the growth rate in budget furniture has slowed since last year, while this year's growth rate in the X-Acto line is stronger. 
He said the company is "very interested" in adding Apple Macintosh computer products to its lineup eventually, but no talks with the manufacturer about such an arrangement are currently under way.In addition, offering a line of copier machines and facsimile equipment "would make sense," he said. 
Its consumer foods group reported a 5.8% sales gain, to $3.56 billion, and pre-charge earnings of $280.5 million, a 6% increase.But for the fourth quarter, operating profit declined 2% to $51.2 million, largely because of continued weakness in frozen pizza and seafood and hefty introductory costs for a line of Green Giant frozen vegetable products. 
"I'm not sure you want to freshen your breath with the same stuff you use to freshen your refrigerator."But Church & Dwight believes line extensions like the toothpaste are critical to Arm & Hammer's growth. 
Church & Dwight executives disagree with Mr. Trout's assessment.In fact, the company plans more personal-care products that, like the dental-care line, will carry the Arm & Hammer name. 
In a number of them, says Ms. Bluhm, "the writing isn't very good, the color isn't good, the pictures are low budget, they have a poor plot -- a formula kind of thing."Still, parents buy some 30 million copies of the classic Little Golden line every year. 
The suits were filed in Los Angeles by Sable Communications of California Inc., a unit of Carlin Communications Inc., and in New York by a group named the Consenting Adults Telephone Rights Association.MARKETING: Eastman Kodak Co.'s Verbatim Corp. introduced a line of color computer diskettes, double-sided and double-density, to help organize files. 
Mr. Ross says manufacturers haven't changed their rule of thumb of holding defective garments to less than 1% of the total produced, and he says they are still largely meeting that goal.Complaining about a decline in quality has long been a favorite consumer pastime, but customers are becoming particularly vocal these days about poor workmanship in higher-priced lines, says Paul D. Campbell, a market researcher in Minneapolis who tracks consumers' attitudes for retailers. 
World-wide manufacturing compounds the problem.Clothing from the same line often is produced in several countries, making it difficult for apparel companies to offer goods of consistent quality. 
DMI Furniture Inc. said it reopened an assembly facility in Huntingburg, Ind., that had been idle since 1980.The 17,000-square-foot plant, which began production June 1, will assemble and finish wooden chairs for the company's residential desk line. 
IBM introduced a line of midrange computers in a high-stakes effort to regain its dominance in that market. 
But he says analysts and others "tend to overlook the fact" that more exercise-conscious older people are beginning to buy sportswear.For Champion, the challenge was convincing retailers that its sportswear line could compete with the likes of Ocean Pacific, Nike and Adidas. 
Mr. Holland expects the momentum to continue.The company has added a line of athletic shoes. 
International Business Machines Corp. introduced a new line of midrange computers in a high-stakes bid to regain the dominance it once held in that market. 
International Data Corp., a market research firm in Framingham, Mass., says IBM's share of the $16 billion market fell to 27.6% world-wide in 1987 from 29% in 1983, while the share captured by archrival Digital Equipment Corp.'s Vaxes rose to 21.6% from 13.5%.And IBM's 9370 minicomputer line, its initial attempt to regain dominance, has failed to become the "Vax killer" that IBM proclaimed at its introduction more than 1 1/2 years ago. 
And IBM's 9370 minicomputer line, its initial attempt to regain dominance, has failed to become the "Vax killer" that IBM proclaimed at its introduction more than 1 1/2 years ago.Because of the stakes, IBM's introduction is the biggest the computer industry has seen in the 14 months since IBM brought out its PS/2 personal-computer line -- and some say it's the biggest announcement since IBM introduced its original PC in 1981. 
IBM underscored the significance by bringing together 170,000 people yesterday to hear the news at more than 200 locations around the world.The new IBM line (code-named Silverlake in recent months but now called the Application System/400) merges the IBM System 36 and System 38 machines.Doing so removes the incompatibilities between two of the three major minicomputer lines that IBM sells and gives IBM some relief from Digital's relentless focus on its own freedom from compatibility problems. 
The operation was in place in case IBM ended up being forced to sell off part of its business.The System 38, in particular, was orphaned by IBM, drawing little support from the company even though its design was thought to be so sophisticated that IBM once considered using it to build a line of mainframes that would supersede those now on the market. 
A definitive pact and closing of the transaction are scheduled for June 30.Mt. Vernon, with annual sales of about $20 million, offers a line of more than 700 products that includes injection-molded plastic overcaps for canned coffee, margarine tubs, canned nuts and tennis ball cans. 
By 1985, however, all but two American chip makers had to abandon the DRAM market.Large, vertically integrated Japanese firms, able to subsidize memory-chip sales with profits from other lucrative lines, made it impossible for most American companies to survive in this business. 
He said the Dow Jones industrials are likely to reach the 2400 level during the summer months as the market receives a boost from second-quarter earnings reports, which he expects to be strong.International Business Machines, which jumped 3 1/8 points Tuesday after its introduction of the Silverlake line of mid-range computers, surged another 2 3/4 to 123. 
Honeywell said its second-quarter earnings will be below the $53 million, or $1.21 a share, of a year ago because of a $23 million charge for cost overruns and writedowns in its military avionics group.Hewlett-Packard told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report that it couldn't explain the drop, but analysts said it may have reflected concerns that the Silverlake computers will cut into sales of the company's Spectrum line. 
Texaco rose 1 5/8 to 48 1/2 and topped the Big Board's list of most active issues on composite volume of about four million shares.International Business Machines, which introduced its Silverlake line of mid-range computers as expected, jumped 3 1/8 to 120 1/4 and was among a number of technology issues that paced the market's advance. 
Federal regulations require that so-called passive restraints -- air bags or automatic seat belts -- be standard for the driver side in all cars by 1990.Chrysler Corp. already offers six car lines with standard driver-side air bags and Yugo America Inc. has said it has chosen to make driver-side air bags standard on its 1990 models. 
Compaq Computer Corp. officials said the company plans to unveil today a group of machines it hopes will give a big boost to the most advanced generation of personal computers by bringing their price down.As expected, the three models in the computer company's new 386S line use a microchip that Intel Corp. introduced just last week. 
Expert Westerners say Russian refrigerators use too much power, weigh too much and make too much noise.Consumers clamor for them, as they do for the extensive Soviet line of fully unautomatic cameras. 
MARKETING: Bausch & Lomb Inc., Rochester, N.Y., signed a letter of intent with Donna Karan Studio under which the eyeware products company will make, market and distribute a line of sunglasses by the New York designer. 
Pennwalt's pharmaceutical unit makes such over-the-counter brands as Desenex athlete's foot medication and Allerest allergy medicine.Its prescription drugs include Microx, a rapidly growing anti-hypertensive, and a line of cough remedies. 
In a memo dated May 2, Joseph Tate, Audi's general sales manager, told the company's dealers that the program "is designed to present attractive purchase alternatives" to coupon holders "who discover that the new 80 and 90 series vehicles may be a better solution to their driving needs."He further elaborated on the program's aims in the May issue of the company's newsletter: "Hopefully we can send some of the excess (Audi) 5000 customers toward the 80 and 90 line. 
Audi blames the reversal on the negative publicity surrounding the series 5000's alleged problems with sudden acceleration.It affected not only that car, but every other car in the company's line. 
Kodak asked that Judge Zobel now withdraw from the case and that all of her orders since 1981 be vacated.Judge Zobel ruled in 1985 that Kodak's since-discontinued line of cameras infringed on seven Polaroid patents, and Kodak's appeals failed. 
Lee Thompson, Beech-Nut's vice president, human resources, said the company has spent at least $10 million since 1983 to improve quality control.He also said it has changed the baby food line and "upgraded all procedures." 
The 386SX models, observers think, may start at about $3,000, but it couldn't be determined what Compaq's pricing will be on its machines.Stewart Alsop, publisher of PC Letter, an industry newsletter, said the advanced-software and technical advantages of the 386SX machines would ultimately make 286 computers, such as the IBM PC AT and the Model 50 in IBM's new PS/2 line, "pretty much obsolete." 
"Today, because the competition is so tough, you don't simply say: 'Hey I got a new car' and immediately get all kinds of people in the showroom," says Lloyd E. Reuss, GM's executive vice president for North American automotive operations.Indeed, Chrysler Corp. also has had problems with new products, most notably its new Eagle Premier line inherited from American Motors Corp. Slow sales will force it to close for two weeks in June the Bramalea, Ontario, plant that makes those cars. 
Other players include Revlon Inc., Johnson & Johnson, Alberto-Culver Co., Gillette Co. and Dow Chemical Co.'s Lamaur unit."They did a pretty good job of holding share last year," Ms. Temple said of the Finesse lines. 
"If they hold their share (this year), I will be pleased."The Finesse promotion follows last year's successful introduction of the company's Helene Curtis Salon Selectives lines, with an advertising and promotional budget of about $40 million. 
Hyponex Corp. said it agreed to be acquired by a unit controlled by O.M. Scott & Sons Co. for $14 a share, or a total of about $72.8 million.Both companies are lawn-care products concerns, but Hyponex would give Scott, of Marysville, Ohio, more of a presence in gardening lines. 
No more big workforce cutbacks are planned, he said.Cincinnati Bell hopes to stimulate revenue growth for telephone operations by offering more services and introducing a new line of leased telephone equipment, Mr. Hibbard said in an interview. 
Most frequently mentioned are electronics giants Samsung of South Korea, N.V. Philips of the Netherlands, and Thomson S.A. of France.Thomson last year acquired the consumer-electronics business of General Electric Co., including its RCA lines, leaving Zenith as the U.S.-based maker of televisions. 
Thomas J. Lipton Inc., an Englewood Cliffs, N.J.-based unit of the Anglo-Dutch Unilever Group, agreed to acquire McCormick & Co.'s Tio Sancho line of Mexican food. 
Neither company could be reached to provide sales figures for Tio Sancho.McCormick said in May it abandoned a proposal to acquire the Spice Islands line of spices, herbs and vinegars from United Biscuits PLC. 
The chip shortage has also caused delays in computer shipments and production.A spokesman for Palo Alto, Calif.-based Hewlett-Packard Co. said the company has delayed since March the introduction of one of its Vectra line of office personal computers "solely because we knew we wouldn't be able to get sufficient chips to produce it." 
While the Palo Alto, Calif.-based company had expected the supply to be looser by now, Mr. Young said, it hasn't, and the company can't predict when the situation might improve.He noted that the shortage, had pushed back introduction of a new model in its Vectra personal computer line to at least July from the March unveiling originally planned. 
American Brands Inc. will sell E-II Holding Inc. to closely held Riklis Family Corp., in a transaction that enables the company to shed most of E-II's businesses and all of E-II's $1.5 billion in high-yield debt.American Brands' move -- a complex agreement which will sell E-II's Samsonite luggage and Culligan water treatment lines, among others -- was praised by Wall Street analysts. 
What's more, cosmetics industry executives say ad spending for men's colognes rose 36% last year to $97 million and should grow further in 1988."We see the competition continuing to intensify with more new products and extensions of existing fragrance lines later this year," says Byron Donics, president of the Aramis division of Estee Lauder Inc. 
The fanfare will be big because Silverlake's market is potentially huge.The machine will be a new model in IBM's unglamorous but sturdy 3X line, with 275,000 current customers making the line one of the best-selling computer families ever outside the PC world. 
Keystone Camera Products Corp. said it granted to Mitsubishi International Corp. the rights to distribute Keystone's 35mm cameras in Japan.Mitsubishi International, a unit of Tokyo-based Mitsubishi Corp., will sell the full line of Keystone cameras, including the Le Clic and Regency models. 
High-performance tires, which provide better handling than standard tires, have been increasing their market penetration in recent years.Goodyear, with its Eagle line, has a commanding lead in the high-performance market. 
Nynex agreed to buy professional services and software lines from AGS Computers for about $275 million. 
The Cricket commercial, which CARU cited as being misleading, is typical of the group's targets.In another case, a series of independent-TV ads for Sylvanian Families, a line of small animal figures made by Coleco Industries Inc./Tomy Corp., used stop-action animation to make the figures walk, jump and pick up furniture. 
Jim Perkins was named senior vice president of the Lexus division of this unit of Toyota Motor Corp. of Japan.In the newly created position, Mr. Perkins will be responsible for all activities in the Lexus division, which is scheduled to begin selling a new line of luxury cars in the U.S. next fall. 
International Business Machines Corp. said its Personal System/2 line of personal computers appears to be selling the best in Europe. 
International Business Machines Corp. said its Personal System/2 line of personal computers appears to be selling the best in Europe.John Akers, chairman of the giant maker of office machines, said at a news conference here that Europe now is "probably the strongest market" for the PS/2 line.He noted that the U.S. market has been constrained by supply problems, but said the outlook for the PS/2 line "is shaping up very well" this year. 
According to analysts, sales of PS/2 got off to a rocky start but have risen lately -- especially in Europe.IBM wants to establish the line as the new standard in personal computing in Europe.It introduced the line in April 1987 and has said it shipped nearly two million units by its first anniversary. 
It is also necessary to evaluate the major sales incentives that have become so prevalent in the marketplace.For example, substantial discounts are available on many GM car lines when options are purchased in a pre-specified "package," which is designed to include the items most people would order separately. 
On a 1988 Chevrolet Cavalier, a package of popular options costing the customer $1,477 when purchased separately is discounted by $675 when ordered as a complete package.In addition, the competitive marketplace has frequently required the use of cash rebates or low-interest-rate financing on many car lines. 
The lines last year generated sales of $77 million, and the divisions purchased by SLM accounted for about $35 million of that total.Coleco's tricycle lines are among the products not included in the purchase, SLM said. 
Closely held SLM is controlled by Canadian interests.William Fedyski, president, said the lines acquired from Coleco would complement SLM's current line of plastic outdoor seasonal products. 
Of course, the couture collections presented at splashy Seventh Avenue shows in New York do originate from famous designers' sketchpads.But most designers also have second-string and third-string lines designed mainly by assistants or licensees and often are no more fashionable and no better in quality than ordinary brands. 
Limited's own Forenza brand is now the second-best-selling women's label in the U.S., after Liz Claiborne.But many retailers that long sold store brands primarily as the bottom end of their clothing lines now are offering a much broader range of private-label apparel. 
Dallas-based Neiman-Marcus is increasing its use of private-label goods, partly to replace apparel by Liz Claiborne and Evan Picone, whose brands were dropped last year because the chain felt they were overexposed.One of Neiman-Marcus's best sellers last winter was a line of private-label cashmere sweaters priced from $150 to $250. 
Coleco didn't say how much extended financing it had received.The toy company also said it has received offers for the sale of its outdoor products line, which includes children's pools and tricycles. 
These include slow U.S. sales and huge inventory backlogs partially attributed to a product that hasn't changed in two years and an expensive advertising campaign.To boost sales, the company plans to introduce new models this fall and a new line of cars, called Infinity, in September 1989. 
The roster of decorators who have signed licensing contracts with furniture makers reads like the table of contents from Architectural Digest: Mark Hampton, Mario Buatta, Jay Spectre and Juan Montoya, as well as fashion designer Ralph Lauren, whose clothing ads feature upper-crust Victorian interiors.Furniture makers are hoping that decorator lines will give a kick to what is essentially a stagnant market. 
Typically, industry executives say, most people wait seven to 10 years to replace a sofa, and they hang onto a bedroom set for at least 16 years.The designer lines, of course, have no single look, but rather reflect the styles of the decorators, ranging from 18th and 19th century reproductions to sleek, modern furnishings. 
The designer lines, of course, have no single look, but rather reflect the styles of the decorators, ranging from 18th and 19th century reproductions to sleek, modern furnishings.Century Furniture Co. is typical of the traditional furniture makers that have introduced decorator lines. 
He declined to provide more-specific figures.Mr. Hopkins says the Lauren line gives Frederick Edwards, based in Morgantown, N.C., a firm footing in the high end of the furniture market. 
"It was a questionable marriage from the start because Kroehler did lower-end goods and lacked credibility in the upper end," says Jerry Epperson, an analyst with Wheat First Securities in Richmond, Va.And a line of chairs by the ubiquitous French fashion designer Pierre Cardin was, according to one big department store, "plain horrible, a mistake that didn't sell at all." 
He acknowledged that some shortages of memory chips could persist into the third quarter if demand outstrips IBM's expectations but added that, "We feel extremely confident about the fourth quarter."That advantage will be especially useful to IBM because high-end machines require extra memory, and demand has been weaker for IBM's high-end machines than for others in the line. 
In composite New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, IBM shares closed at $112.625, off 50 cents.As expected, IBM also announced yesterday several products that fill in its personal-computer line. 
Avon Products Inc. expects to report about flat second-quarter operating earnings, and it maintains its estimate of $2.30 a share from continuing lines for the full year. 
FCB/Leber is a unit of Foote, Cone & Belding Communications Inc.LICENSING: Colonia Inc. received a world-wide licensing agreement from Knoll International Holdings Inc., parent of the 21 Club, to produce a line of men's fragrances named after the New York restaurant.The line, to be introduced in the U.S. in 1989, marks the first time the restaurant has licensed the use of its name. 
His willingness to try different approaches has proved both a strength and weakness for Unocal.While Mr. Hartley's interest in underground steam formations put the company into a profitable line, his unshakable belief that synthetic oil extraction from shale would one day prove a moneymaker has led the company to write off hundreds of millions of dollars and to operate a plant that is producing well below its designed capacity. 
Yugos, subcompact cars imported from Yugoslavia, carry a base sticker price of $4,299 -- the lowest sticker price of any car in the U.S.Chrysler Corp. announced last month that it started putting driver-side air bags as standard equipment in six of its car lines, making it the first Big Three auto maker to do so. 
The industry executives said the Armonk, N.Y., computer giant will introduce three versions of what it will call the Personal System/2 Model 70, a high-end machine that will use the Intel Corp. 80386 central processor.The versions resemble the Model 80, currently the high end of the IBM line, except that they will sit on the desktop rather than on the floor in what is known as a tower configuration. 
In addition, IBM will introduce a version of its Model 50 that will have a faster hard disk.The Model 50, in the middle of IBM's line, had drawn considerable criticism in the trade press for the slowness with which it retrieved information from the hard disk. 
The executives also said IBM will cut prices on some existing models to make room for the new ones, though they weren't sure just how large the cuts would be or which models they would cover.Tim Bajarin, a consultant with Creative Strategies Research International, Santa Clara, Calif., speculated that they would cover at least the Models 25 and 30, at the low end of the line, and the Model 60, in the middle of the line. 
At the same time, IBM seems to have postponed the announcement of some products it was planning to bring out today.In particular, IBM had been widely expected to bring out laptops using the muscular 80386 chip and the less powerful 80286, which is used in the middle of IBM's PS/2 line. 
The progenitor of the breed was Nike Inc.'s Air Revolution shoe, introduced last year with television ads set to the Beatles' "Revolution" and print ads promising improved performance.Several rivals have been introduced recently, or will be soon, including the Energy Wave shoe from Converse Inc., a unit of Interco Inc.; the World Trainer shoe, with an "Energy Return System," from Reebok; and a line of shoes from Etonic Inc. using a "Dynamic Reaction Plate." 
Oleg Cassini was awarded $16 million by a federal court jury in a legal squabble over a contract with perfume maker Jovan Inc.The 75-year-old fashion designer claimed that Jovan breached a 1978 contract for a fragrance line marketed under the designer's name. 
Walter M. Doyle, 50 years old, resigned as chairman, president and chief executive officer, and Norman Jennings, 40, quit as a director and senior vice president of Laser, and general manager of Analect Instrument Division, the unit.Donald Sypek, 51, resigned as a director and senior vice president of the parent, but will remain with Laser Precision as manager of its Radiometric Products line. 
Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Co. is introducing a line of fancy private-label foodstuffs in a far-reaching attempt to capitalize on growing demand for gourmet products. 
Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Co. is introducing a line of fancy private-label foodstuffs in a far-reaching attempt to capitalize on growing demand for gourmet products.The line, called Master Choice, also represents an effort to fill what A&P, of Montvale, N.J., perceives as a void between mass-market national brands and elitist brands. 
Within the next six months, shoppers will find the Master Choice name on teas, pastas, sauces and salad dressings.A&P, which had $9.6 billion in sales last year, envisions ultimately a line of more than 100 products in about two dozen categories, Mr. Rourke says. 
Competitors speculate that the nation's fourth-largest supermarket concern will have to spend a substantial amount to develop premium products that then will end up selling in relatively low volumes.Moreover, the extensive line could hog valuable shelf space that would otherwise be devoted to more-popular items. 
As part of a turnaround strategy in the early 1980s, A&P slashed its dependence on private label to 18% of its dry-grocery product mix from a peak of 35%.The company now wants to use Master Choice to bolster its private-label line back up to 25%, a typical level for chains nowadays. 
Bloom, a unit of Bloom Companies Inc., will create advertising for Baby Fresh and Wash A-Bye Baby wet wipes; Sofkins, a flushable cleansing wipe; Cottonelle Toilet Paper, and Helping Hand and Job Squad paper towels.Weightman, a unit of Weightman Group, will create ads for ScotTowels; ScotTissues; Scotties, another tissue; Scott Family Napkins, and Viva designer collections, a line of tabletop items including paper napkins and placemats. 
A few years ago, the laptop was simply called Z171.The latest models, introduced with a "Road Warriors" theme in April, are in a line dubbed SupersPort. 
"My ambition for Japan is that we should sell about 25,000 Volvo cars in the middle of the 1990s," he said.Fuji President Toshihiro Tajima said, "Volvo cars will enable us to meet today's broad customer needs by adding a new model line in the upper segment where we currently do not offer any products." 
South Africans are loosening or terminating their U.S. business connections far faster than the legal environment warrants.Two years ago, the idea of "countersanctions" -- predatory and discriminatory pricing against American buyers in lines where South African producers combined could exert some monopolistic power -- was dismissed out of hand by the South African business elite. 
Chips & Technologies Inc. said International Business Machines Corp. agreed not to require the microcomputer chip maker to take out licenses of IBM patents and technology for its chip sets used in clones of IBM's line of personal computers. 
Disney, a theme-park, movie and TV concern, bought Childcraft from Hachette S.A., a French publisher that earlier acquired Childcraft's parent, Grolier Inc. Childcraft, Edison, N.J., sells educational toys, play equipment and classroom furniture by mail.ADVERTISING: Pepsi-Cola Co., a unit of Purchase, N.Y.-based PepsiCo Inc., selected Lois Pitts Gershon/Pon/GGk, New York, to create advertising for its Mug Root Beer line, acquired two years ago. 
Al Vlietstra, director of sales for the Coca-Cola Foods Canada Inc. unit of Coca Cola Co., said he welcomes the competition that Tropicana will bring because its presence will probably develop the refrigerated juice market in Canada, where per capita consumption is substantially below the U.S. level.Coca-Cola's Minute Maid began marketing a refrigerated orange juice made from concentrate in Canada in 1985, in addition to its frozen line of orange juice. 
The case involves 83 of an estimated 14,000 designs made by Hallmark, the industry giant.Two years ago, Blue Mountain Arts Inc. of Boulder, Colo., sued Hallmark for trademark violations, contending that Hallmark's Personal Touch line of cards was too similar to its products. 
Public ownership is an issue now in part because dealerships have changed so much in recent years.In the 1950s, when the number of dealerships nationally was twice what it is today, dealers tied their fortunes to single franchises, pitching Chevys, Fords or Plymouths to the exclusion of other car lines. 
On Friday, the company noted that its restructuring efforts over the past couple of years have strengthened its operating results.Amax has sharply pared its long-term obligations and has focused its business on gold, aluminum and coal after shedding lines in silver, copper, nickel, iron ore and agricultural chemicals. 
McCormick & Co. said it would abandon its proposed $56 million acquisition of the Spice Islands line of spices, herbs and vinegars from a unit of United Biscuits PLC after the Federal Trade Commission authorized its staff to seek a preliminary injunction blocking the transaction. 
In fact, despite the sharp price drop in Hewlett-Packard shares, on volume of about 2.3 million shares, most analysts said they don't expect to adjust their projections for the company's performance in future quarters.Hewlett-Packard, which late in the quarter introduced nine new models of its Spectrum business computer line, said orders for those machines should pick up in coming quarters. 
Chrysler Corp. has started putting driver-side air bags as standard equipment in six of its car lines, making it the first Big Three auto maker to do so. 
Sales plunged 41% to $73.7 million, from $124.5 million a year earlier.The loss left the West Hartford, Conn., toy maker -- riding high just three years ago on the success of its Cabbage Patch Kids line -- with a negative net worth -- the difference between assets and liabilities -- of $130.7 million. 
In its earnings announcement, which came after the stock market closed, Coleco said it will seek a buyer for several plastic outdoor product lines that are manufactured at its New York state facilities, including pools, snow products, children's furniture and tricycles.These lines, which are among Coleco's older products, generated sales of $77 million last year, Coleco said. 
Morton Handel, the new chairman and chief executive, said earlier this month the company might sell some assets to raise cash.Analysts have said that the sale of lines could help the company pay off some of its debt. 
BRIEFS: The U.S. Chess Hall of Fame and Museum opens tomorrow in New Windsor, N.Y. . . .A new line of inflatable stereo speakers from Hyman Products Inc., St. Louis, comes shaped like palm trees, guitars and juke boxes. 
In 1986, Hasbro earned $99.2 million, or $1.70 a share, on revenue of $1.34 billion.Mr. Hassenfeld said the Milton Bradley Games division and its Playskool line of toys will perform particularly well this year. 
The move has shocked the clone makers, which had assumed that IBM's lack of objection had assured them of clear sailing, and could squeeze the more marginal clone companies.The decision could also delay introduction of some clones of IBM's year-old PS/2 line of personal computers.In addition, the move reintroduces the prospect of messy litigation in the personal-computer market at a time when IBM's decision to license the patents for its PS/2 line had been quieting that talk. 
The success of those small stores prompted big mass merchandisers to also carry more licensed sports goods.And the development of "authentics" -- licensed duplicates of gear used by the pros -- resulted in an upscale line of licensed products appealing to affluent baby boomers. 
Basketball junkies can slam dunk their dirty clothes through a hoop into an NBA hamper.The NFL is considering a line of high-fashion evening wear. 
IBM is demanding retroactive payments from clone makers for patents it says were used in the IBM-compatible personal computers.The decision shocked clone makers and could delay some clones of IBM's PS/2 line. 
Slow sales are forcing Chrysler Corp. to cut output of its Premier sedan, the flagship of its new Eagle car line. 
A spokesman said the company was "very pleased" with the results.In addition to continuing strong sales of the company's current line of dBASE database management software and MultiMate word-processing products, he cited an "important contribution" from the FullWrite Professional word-processing package. 
FullWrite, designed for Apple Computer Inc.'s Macintosh machines, was introduced late in the first quarter.Michele Preston, an analyst with Salomon Brothers, called the latest period "a pretty good quarter for the company," considering it has indicated it plans to begin shipping this summer dBASE IV, a revamped version of the dBASE line. 
Murjani International is teaming up with former president Warren Hirsch to relaunch Gloria Vanderbilt jeans, a now faded brand that was one of the big hits of the designer jeans craze of the late 1970s.Hong Kong-based Murjani, a closely held apparel maker that markets Coca-Cola brand clothes and Tommy Hilfiger menswear, said the revamped line will be made by a joint venture run by Mr. Hirsch. 
Murjani licensed the Vanderbilt trademark to another women's apparel firm, Jones Apparel Group in 1985, but took the brand back last March.Murjani said Jones Apparel diluted the trademark by introducing an extensive line of women's sportswear and de-emphasizing jeans. 
Actors dressed in raisin costumes marched in the Macy's Thanksgiving Day parade in New York, and a raisin conga line danced at the White House Christmas tree lighting ceremony, even upstaging a certain former actor.There are 55 licensees for products based on the raisin characters (for which Mr. Vinton does not hold the rights), and kiddies from coast to coast are gobbling up various items of raisin-decorated garb, as well as collecting a line of plastic raisin figurines -- each raisin bearing a name to make it more personable, lovable, buyable. 
International Business Machines Corp. said it revamped its Wheelwriter line of typewriters, with the addition of five new machine models and the modification of three others. 
International Business Machines Corp. said it revamped its Wheelwriter line of typewriters, with the addition of five new machine models and the modification of three others.IBM said the new machines, which are made in Lexington, Ky., replace and expand existing lines. 
Rebates on Buick Electras, Le Sabres and Centuries all dropped to $500 from $750.Sales were strong across virtually all manufacturers' lines. 
Techknits Inc. said it signed an exclusive licensing agreement with Denton Mills Inc., New Albany, Miss., to make and market the Dr. Denton line of sweaters for infants, toddlers and children. 
Mr. Wallace said the printer won't work with Apple Computer Inc.'s popular Macintosh computers, but will be tuned to do so sometime in the future.Apple offers its own line of laser printers priced from about $3,000 to $7,000, but offers nothing technologically comparable to the DeskJet. 
CRS Sirrine Inc., an architectural and engineering concern, said it was chosen by General Motors Corp. as one of three companies that will design dealership facilities for GM's new Saturn Corp. car line. 
Try a .25-caliber Beretta, strapped around the thigh in a black-lace garter holster.The holster is part of a new line of wardrobe accessories created by designers who think packing a pistol ought to be done in style. 
"Shooting is for all," says Lenny Handler, owner of the Fort Lauderdale, Fla., Bang Bang Boutique, among the largest gun-fashion retailers.The store offers a wide line of color-coordinated holsters. 
She added her own touch -- a special holster allowing the gun to be fired without removing it from the purse -- and has since sold hundreds.Still, the new fashion line doesn't appeal to everyone. 
C. Olivetti & Co. Mr. Cassoni's last official act as AT&T's computer chief was to give a speech promoting AT&T's Unix operating system at an industry conference here.Because AT&T has acknowledged that software and services will command higher profit margins in the future than manufactured hardware, a number of analysts have speculated that AT&T may contract out the manufacture of its next line of minicomputers. 
Mr. Kavner said a number of customers have been concerned about AT&T ending manufacture of computers, a move that analysts believe would cause AT&T to take another writedown.Jack Grubman, an analyst at PaineWebber Inc., said however that because most of AT&T's minicomputer sales are to the Bell operating companies, outsourcing manufacture of AT&T's next line of minicomputers wouldn't result in a write-down. 
Mr. Kavner said the companies are most interested in sharing product-development efforts as well as helping each other in their respective markets.Olivetti, which a few months ago appeared to be interested in adopting the Sun Sparc chip for a new line of computers, hasn't yet decided to do so, said Richard McGinn, vice president, product management, for AT&T's Data Systems Group. 
Ford Motor Co. followed General Motors Corp. and Chrysler Corp. in reducing factory rebates, and effectively raising the prices of many American-made cars and trucks.The Dearborn, Mich.-based auto maker said yesterday that while it will extend rebate offers on many of its models until July 12, effective today it will cut or eliminate the cash offers on some of its most popular lines. 
For example, the rebate on Ford's midsized Taurus and Sable models will drop 20% to $600 from $750.Still, Ford's midsized car rebate is $100 more generous than the $500 GM is offering on its competitive midsized Oldsmobile Cutlass Ciera, Pontiac 6000 and Chevrolet Celebrity lines. 
It is liquidating its CWT Inc. transportation subsidiary and is selling its Atlanta Novelty Inc. plush-toy unit and its Cornucopia Farms Inc. fruit-farm business.Gerber retained Salomon Brothers Inc. to seek a buyer for the furniture group, which makes a broad line of juvenile furniture under the Century, Century Originals and Nod-A-Way brand names. 
But many concerns trying to crack the general market say they faced formidable barriers because of perceptions that black companies were unreliable or their products low-quality.Consider Johnson Products Co.'s experience when, in the late 1970s, it launched "Black Tie," a line of men's toiletries that was heavily advertised using mostly white actors and models. 
The initial pact called for a merger of Henkel's and New York-based Colgate's production facilities, but would have kept their marketing separate.Instead, Henkel will sell Cotelle's soap and bleach lines, which have annual turnover of about 550 million French francs, to Colgate for 925 million francs. 
More than 300 cash machines throughout the city and its suburbs stopped functioning."The machines can still talk to you, but the transaction won't go anyplace without the computer line," said Steven Cole, president of Cash Station Inc., which operates some 900 cash machines in the Chicago area. 
FCB/Leber Katz, a division of Chicago-based Foote, Cone & Belding Communications Inc., is also already a big RJR agency with industry estimates of about $110 million in RJR billings.In recent years, it had handled the comeback, through line extensions, of Shredded Wheat. 
The company's American heyday is long since past and in recent months it has been jolted by new setbacks.At least nine dealers have dropped its upscale Audi line since the year began, and company officials fear more defections are coming. 
Funds from the sales had been earmarked to help pay down the company's heavy debt load, a substantial amount of which is in short-term obligations.The optometric lines were expected to garner about $300 million. 
The net figure included a $9 million charge from the sale of operations, partially offset by a $3.1 million tax credit.Besides its optometric and medical diagnostic operations, Cooper has a line of surgical products. 
Fiscal 1988 revenue will be about $45 million, he predicted.Mr. Morino, in an interview, attributed the performance to high demand for its integrated line of software products, which allow customers to manage all aspects of their data processing systems. 
Morino Associates will pursue further growth through acquisitions and expansion of its international operations, the chairman said.For example, products purchased recently from other companies will be combined with Morino Associate's in-house development to introduce a new line of software that applies traditional inventory-control concepts to data processing systems. 
Mitsubishi Motor Sales of America Inc. said it raised the prices of its 1988 Mirage car line an average of 1.9%, or about $170. 
The acquisition, subject to a tender offer garnering 50.1% of Ingredient shares, would add Ingredient's flavors, sweeteners and spices business to the dyes, flavors, food additives and artificial-coloring lines of Crompton & Knowles, a Stamford, Conn., concern. 
Priced at $2.5 million to $14 million, the machines incorporate the same Motorola Inc. 2,500-macrocell silicon-based array chip used in the Y series.Initially the EA line will offer as much as twice the memory of the Y-MP. 
Under the current exchange plan, Coleco would dilute its shares by about 50%.Analysts, who asked not to be quoted, said that Coleco has many assets that would be attractive to other toy companies, including the Cabbage Patch doll line, the Alf doll based on the television character, plastic ride-on toys and wading pools and such games as Scrabble and Trivial Pursuit. 
While such power is of interest only to the largest customers, the 100-MIPS mark is "a milestone -- both for the industry and for Amdahl," according to Robert Djurdjevic, president of Annex Research, a Phoenix, Ariz.-based computer industry consulting firm.Mr. Djurdjevic said Amdahl's new machine "may force IBM to provide enhancements to its 3090 line sooner than they had intended." 
Today, the company has a market value of about $48 million, based on the stock's closing price yesterday of $2.375.While its physical assets, including its toy lines, are worth perhaps $250 million, according to analysts, the company's debt is far higher. 
But a sale of some assets to raise cash is possible.Mr. Handel said, "A wide variety of parties have expressed interest in buying one or more of the company's toy lines." 
He said Coleco wasn't interested previously, but he declined to discuss its current position.Ironically, the Cabbage Patch Kids line could draw some bidders, even though its decline in recent years has contributed to Coleco's problems.While Cabbage Patch sales last year were $125 million, down from $600 million in 1985, the toy line remains one the nation's best selling. 
Among other allegations, the Treasury said Heublein obtained an agreement from a large restaurant chain with outlets in California, Arizona and Washington state requiring that Heublein's Inglenook brand be used exclusively as the house wine.Retail dealers in Connecticut, Illinois, Texas, California and other states were provided freezers as an incentive to purchase a new Heublein line of distilled spirits, and the company installed keg wine equipment to induce retailers in New Jersey to purchase its brand of keg wine, the Treasury said. 
"But with Pfizer, all you've got is complaints."For the past year, analysts have complained that Pfizer isn't working for its holders: The company refuses to divest its non-drug lines, as others in the industry have done, and Pfizer generally eschews stock buy-backs. 
That would lift per-share earnings to between $4.48 and $4.68; analyst estimates lean toward the lower end of that range.At the May 17 meeting, Pfizer is expected to expound on a number of new products, notably an advanced formula of its fast-selling heart drug Procardia and a new line of antibiotics. 
Revenue rose 18% to $190.1 million from $161.6 million.Ogilvy, which also has interests in public relations and other marketing lines, said its operating profit margin rose to 4.5% from 2.9% a year earlier. 
Amdahl added 1 7/8 to 42 1/4.The company introduced a line of mainframe computers that it said are faster than any other mainframes on the market. 
THE ERGON line of office chairs is indisputably a success. 
As the name implies, the chair, designed by William Stumpf & Associates for Herman Miller Inc., addresses comfort for a wide range of users and tasks.Three million have been sold since the line was introduced 12 years ago. 
Despite much anticipatory hoopla, Round Two won't be a battle on the same epic scale.Many industry officials, dealers, and customers say clones of IBM's year-old second line of PCs, the PS/2, will put far less pressure on the company than did the previous generation. 
Clones underpriced IBM by 25% to 40% the first time around because they had lower overhead than IBM and access to the same suppliers' parts at the same prices.But IBM makes 70% to 90% of its own parts for the PS/2, up from some 20% for the previous line. 
Separately, Grace purchased for cash the graphic-arts division of Uniroyal Plastics Co., a subsidiary of Jesup Group Inc. Grace's new units make printer's gum and photopolymer printing plates, which are used in making plates for flexographic printing of several packaging materials.Grace said the acquisition expands the company's line of consumable supplies for the graphic arts industry. 
In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Schering fell 75 cents to close at $48.75, and Cooper closed at $12.375, down 62.5.Separately, Schering said it agreed with LaSalle Laboratories to develop and market a line of gynecological sex-hormone products in the U.S. and Canada. 
Toy companies dreamed up a dozen new toy-based cartoons last year.But this year, only one company -- Hasbro, for its Cops and Crooks line of toys -- has a tie-in cartoon on the drawing boards. 
The craze began in 1983, when Mattel put up $7 million to help fund the production of 65 half-hour episodes of "He-Man."By year's end, sales of Masters of the Universe, the line that included the He-Man toy, had nearly tripled, making it one of 1983's hottest-selling toys. 
"Thundercats," about catlike humanoids from outer space, was a top-rated cartoon last year.Nonetheless, the toy of the same name, made by LJN, suffered from dismal sales; the company dropped it from its line. 
Tonka, for instance, is forgoing toy-based cartoons in favor of that old standby, the movie tie-in.It's developing a line of toys linked to "Willow," a Stephen Spielberg movie due this summer. 
Other companies, however, once again are going with the unknown.To push its Dyno-Riders line of toys, Tyco rejected the cartoon concept as "too big a chance," according to Michael Lyden, Tyco's vice president of business development. 
Strong performances in diapers, liquid detergents -- previously shunned by Europeans -- and from its Richardson-Vicks Inc. drug unit helped P&G abroad.Salomon Brothers Inc.'s Mr. Zurkhulen noted that the Pampers diaper line, which once had sluggish results outside the U.S., "has really turned around overseas." 
Polaroid said that its world-wide effective tax rate rose to 51% in the 1988 first quarter from 21% in the year-ago period.The Cambridge, Mass., company also said that it increased marketing promotions in the first quarter to reduce dealer inventories of an older-camera line in preparation for the introduction of its low-priced Impulse camera. 
It aims to keep up that growth by adding new businesses to mature ones.For instance, Nestle in recent years has built its ground-coffee lines through costly acquisitions and new products. 
And Nestle hopes the De Benedetti interests, which include Buitoni pasta and Perugina chocolates, will generate similar ideas and improvements for other markets.Rowntree's chocolate business would strengthen Nestle by adding snack products to its well-known line of chocolate bars. 
The Federal Trade Commission asked the federal district court here to block McCormick & Co.'s proposed $56 million acquisition of the Spice Island line of spices, herbs and vinegars from a subsidiary of United Biscuits PLC. 
IBM-Brasil, established 71 years ago, is among the 20 largest private companies in Brazil.It is the market leader in large computers but has been unable to sell its line of personal computers because of Brazil's controversial policy of reserving this market for national manufacturers. 
"You can't provide a consistent, consumer-preferred product."Tropicana is also about to unveil a new line of non-refrigerated orange-based drinks called Twisters. 
As of March 31, the company had 6,950,000 shares outstanding, down from 7,150,000 a year earlier because of a buy-back after the October stock market plunge.American Health licenses Diet Center franchises, and sells related lines of diet foods and nutritional supplements for weight loss. 
After the split, the Santa Clara, Calif., company will have 2.2 million shares outstanding.After the expected sale in May of its medical lasers line, Cooper Life Sciences will be based in Menlo Park, Calif., and plans to develop, acquire and invest in health-care products and businesses. 
Mr. Perrin said he is confident the talks will reach a conclusion in the next year or so.He said Cartier is also talking with two other closely held European luxury-goods companies about expanding its market shares in other lines. 
But those gains were offset greatly by "significant" drops in its lumber operations and mortgage banking and residential development activities.Weyerhaeuser said operating earnings for forest products lines, exclusive of pulp and paper, fell 35%.A year earlier, the lines had a $25 million capital gain from dispositions of some land and timber. 
IBM is promising the new software products as much as six months earlier than expected.The operating system will finally let customers tap the potential of IBM's line of mainframes, giving them a reason to stop using older hardware. 
"In this business, that's all-important."IBM will continue to make its three lines of copiers, which Kodak expects to market under its own name by the end of the year. 
"If Kodak can pick up the IBM segment and convert it to Kodak, it will be a real boom to Kodak," said Alex B. Henderson, an analyst with Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.Allen J. Krowe, IBM executive vice president, said the company determined that Kodak, with its broader line of copiers, could better support the substantial marketing and selling costs. 
The partnership also said that it might sell the holdings.In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Haddad said its affiliates hold licenses to distribute the Hush Puppies line of clothing and therefore have a business relationship with Wolverine, which makes those products. 
Mr. Dell also maintained that his models would outperform IBM's.Dell said it is negotiating with IBM to license any patents IBM has on the PS/2 line. 
Motorola Inc. unveiled its latest microprocessor chip family, the 88000 line, boasting the new chips provide fivetimes more processing power than leading-edge competitors. 
"We are confident of being supported by the banks," a Daimler spokesman said, adding that he couldn't confirm recurrent speculation that Daimler-Benz has amassed more than its recorded 56% stake in open-market acquisitions.By taking full control of AEG, Daimler can step up implementation of its strategy of integrating AEG's electronics business into its automotive and technology lines and reducing AEG's former emphasis in consumer appliances. 
The retailer said it will upgrade stores in Norfolk, Hampton and Virginia Beach for a total cost of $12 million.At these stores, furniture and certain other lines will be discontinued; that space will be devoted to apparel. 
AT&T has been dissatisfied, moreover, with Olivetti sales of its 3B2 minicomputers and System 75 phone switchboard lines in Europe.Olivetti also ruffled some AT&T feathers last November when it came out with a line of minicomputers that some analysts say compete with the AT&T machines Olivetti is supposed to sell. 
An unusual clause will permit Asea Brown to take over the second venture in 1990 if either Westinghouse insists or if Asea Brown decides to do so.While the paperwork may be complicated, the transaction otherwise fits neatly into a line of major corporate moves Mr. Barnevik has initiated since 1980, when he became president of Asea. 
The new software -- dubbed MVS/ESA -- won't become available until August, but it could already be giving Sierra sales a lift.Gartner's research shows that prices for used mainframes from the IBM line that preceded Sierra have fallen about 60% over the last six months, after holding firm for a year. 
Fiscal 1987 results were sharply lower than prior years because of a slumping market for add-on computer circuit boards -- which then was AST's principal line of business.The climb in this year's revenue, the company said, is due to the popularity of AST's line of personal computers, which in the last year and a half has changed the company into one of the largest makers of personal computers. 
Profitability has been aided by manufacturing efficiencies.AST also plans to expand its computer line, adding less-expensive models for small businesses and more powerful ones for computer-aided design and desk-top publishing. 
In terms of speed, the new computers are expected to process from 2.7 million instructions per second, or MIPS, to more than 10 MIPS, depending on how many microprocessors are inside.In performance, they will overlap several IBM computers, including parts of the IBM 9370 line and the 4381 line. 
International Business Machines Corp., seeking to raise the return on its massive research and development investments, said it will start charging more money to license its 32,000 patents around the world.In announcing the change, IBM also said that it's willing to license patents for its PS/2 line of personal computers. 
Digital Equipment is expected to unveil a series of computers to replace the middle of its VAX line. 
The judge is expected to clarify his ruling this week.Lord Geller has handled both corporate and product advertising for IBM, and is perhaps best known for the Charlie Chaplin campaign it created for IBM's personal computer line. 
In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Compaq stock surged $2 a share to close at $54.75.The first-quarter results indicate that Compaq's Deskpro 386 Model 20 is continuing to sell well despite a challenge from International Business Machines Corp.'s newest personal computer line. 
The three -- Peter Gold, chairman and chief executive officer; David Rousso, chief financial officer; and Sydney Irmas, a director -- own 67% of the Price Pfister shares outstanding.Emhart, a maker of industrial, consumer and electronic goods, said Price Pfister's residential plumbing line would complement Emhart's construction and do-it-yourself products. 
Moreover, Sears has tried unsuccessfully in the past to pump up its women's business.In the early 1980s, it introduced Cheryl Tiegs and Stefanie Powers lines of private-label clothing. 
"They're in never-never land."The new clothing lines may not be different enough to give Sears an edge. 
Holders love to tell stories about the company's marketing acumen.Like the story about the time Neutrogena introduced its premium-priced shampoo line to a less-than-thrilled reception. 
The race to clone International Business Machines Corp.'s PS/2 line of personal computers has turned into a contest between two Texas-based companies, with tiny Dell Computer Co. apparently trying to upstage giant Tandy Corp. 
While Mr. Cassoni trimmed last year's loss by 70% from a year earlier through bookkeeping changes and some cost-cutting, revenue from outside customers dropped 4% in a banner year for the rest of the industry.Industry sources say unit sales of AT&T's personal computers fell about 16% last year to approximately 120,000, while sales of the 3B minicomputer line to outside customers fell about 20% to 7,600. 
AT&T and Sun are expected to announce soon a plan for a software program to make Unix easier to use.The minicomputers replacing AT&T's 3B line are scheduled to be launched in the second half of 1989. 
IBM said it has shipped nearly two million units of its Personal System/2 line of personal computers since its introduction a year ago. 
There isn't much mahogany at the flagship Marks & Spencer, on London's Oxford Street near Marble Arch.The self-service store is one of the busiest stores on earth, selling clothing and food with a recently added line of home furnishings in an annex across the street. 
But long-term health required basic changes in Mattel's marketing strategies."We've decided to concentrate on those areas where we've historically been strong, while slowly building in other areas," such as preschool, where the firm has signed a long-term licensing agreement to use Disney characters on its entire line, Mr. Amerman says. 
In its personal-care division, Mr. Reitman said, sales of children's diapers continue to show considerable growth despite competition.He said the division plans to introduce an adult diaper line in the second quarter, and expects that product to break even this fiscal year. 
International Business Machines Corp. said it has shipped nearly two million units of its Personal System/2 line of personal computers, as it passed the first anniversary of the product's introduction. 
But he said it isn't seeking to bring in an executive "to head up the firm."Lord Geller has handled both corporate and product advertising for IBM, and is perhaps best-known for the Charlie Chaplin campaign it created for IBM's personal computer line. 
"That's a broad range, but we believe enough people buy with that as a prompting preference" for the company to reformulate the way it makes its products.Lately, numerous companies have introduced products that are low in saturated fats and cholesterol, "but this is the first company I've heard of that has reformulated its entire line -- certainly the first bakery company," said Lynn Dornblaser, managing editor of the trade publication, Gorman's New Product News. 
Other segments have matured or are saturated.Marriott's entry into the economy line has its risks. 
Kinney Shoe Corp. is polishing up its dull image.Known as a marketer of budget-priced family shoes, the 94-year-old Kinney, a subsidiary of F.W. Woolworth Co., will soon begin sharply increasing its reliance on more expensive, all-leather shoes in its women's line. 
In the year-ago period, the company reported a net loss of $4.9 million on sales of $23.1 million.Mr. Schwartz said the company faced a "cash crunch" earlier in the year because of advertising costs associated with its frozen food line. 
Chevrolet will market renamed versions of its Nova, Sprint and Spectrum under the new badge, hoping to sharpen the identity of what is now a muddled array of subcompacts.The division also plans to include a new imported Jeep-like sport-utility vehicle in the line, according to dealers and company sources. 
A Mattel spokesman said the company is "disappointed" by the downgrade."We're encouraged by the positive customer response to our 1988 toy line and are realizing cost savings from our restructuring program," he added. 
MAGAZINES: McGraw-Hill Inc.'s Electronics magazine was acquired by Verenigde Nederlandse Uitgeversbedrijven, the Netherlands' largest publishing group, for an undisclosed price.VNU said Electronics, a controlled circulation trade journal that distributes 135,000 copies bimonthly, fits well with its growing line of specialist publications . . . 
Some of these awards have been reduced on appeal.Mr. Estridge was one of IBM's most visible executives after starting and overseeing the early development of the IBM PC and building the line into a $4.5 billion annual business in only four years. 
Mr. Batogowski recently negotiated a licensing agreement with Walt Disney Co. to produce merchandise using Disney characters.He also negotiated a similar agreement with McDonald's Corp., resulting in the successful McKids clothing line.Both ventures are expected to rejuvenate some of Sears's youthful lines. 
SEAGRAM CO.'S recent $1.2 billion bid for the Tropicana orange juice line put its diversification strategy in the spotlight. 
In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, American Standard closed at $75.50, up 37.5 cents, while Black & Decker rose 12.5 cents to close at $18.50.Black & Decker, a Towson, Md.-based maker of power tools and home appliances, launched its unsolicited tender offer in late January, and has said that American Standard's air conditioning and plumbing lines are a logical extension of its business. 
GE acknowledged when it made its offer for Roper that it was the first time the company had put out an unsolicited bid for an acquisition target.GE had attempted last November to interest Roper in a voluntary merger to obtain the Georgia company's kitchen-range line, but was rebuffed by the company's management. 
Peugeot Motors of America Inc. is expanding its rebate offer of $3,000 on its line of 1988-model Peugeot 505 sedans and five-passenger station wagons. 
The maker of electronic communications equipment said the purchase price represents $8 million over the book value of the products, which are the company's lines of scanners and marine radios.Together the lines accounted for 24% of Regency's $75 million in sales last year. 
Mr. Montgomery scoffs at such concerns.He says he "doesn't foresee" the need for any acquisitions, except for limited additions to the diagnostics line, in the next few years. 
A computer-marketing pact between International Business Machines Corp. and Britain's Ferranti International PLC heralds a major IBM campaign to boost European sales of its new line of personal computers. 
On March 4, IBM responded to the disclosure of such discussions to The Wall Street Journal by one of its executives by labeling his comments as "premature" in a statement.The OEM moves signal a stepped-up drive by IBM to establish its year-old PS/2 line as the new standard in personal computing in Europe.The current standard remains the one set by IBM's older PC line, which rival manufacturers world-wide quickly "cloned." 
A number are testing lighter weight paper and smaller catalogs.Others plan to cut out entire lines of low-margin merchandise that they can no longer afford to sell by mail. 
NCR unveiled a minicomputer line for linking networks of personal computers or terminals in offices. 
Terms of the revised transaction weren't disclosed.The institutional soap products line has annual sales of about $13 million.The original agreement was to acquire just the consumer soap lines. 
Greyhound, a diversified concern whose Dial Corp. unit markets brands such as Dial and Purex and makes both consumer and institutional soap products, said the acquisition now would cover Borax products with annual sales totaling about $43 million.The additional products in the agreement consist of a line of hand soaps and soap dispensers sold under the Boraxo and Luron names for the medical market, and a hand cleaner line for the automotive market, Greyhound said. 
The group has shelved plans to become a European TV and radio power.Hachette also recently explored and dropped the idea of launching a national daily newspaper in France, to go with its line of 60 provincial weekly newspapers and magazines. 
AT&T and Sun signed a technology-sharing agreement last fall calling for AT&T to license Mountain View, Calif.-based Sun's design for a new microprocessor chip and for Sun to assist AT&T in devising a standardized version of its Unix operating system.Separately, Unisys confirmed it plans to announce Tuesday a long-awaited mid-range computer to bolster one of its aging lines. 
Unisys said it probably wouldn't start shipping its new Unix machines until the middle of next year.Unisys' new mid-range computer to be unveiled next week will be a version of its 1100 line long sold by Sperry Corp., according to Mr. Blumenthal. 
Veterans of New Age publishing scoff at the ever-widening definition of the category.Bantam Books Inc., a unit of Bertelsmann AG of West Germany, started its Bantam New Age Books line eight years ago. 
In turn, Stora is a big customer of forestry chemicals from Swedish Match and the two firms already collaborate on development of new pulp bleaching products.In recent years, Swedish Match has grown aggressively by adding home-improvement and packaging acquisitions to its original line of matches and other consumer products. 
IBM's computer-marketing accord with Ferranti heralds a major IBM campaign to boost European sales of its new personal-computer line. 
The Wang and Digital announcements appear to indicate that the midrange computer market in the U.S. is weaker than many observers forecast at the beginning of the year.Among other midrange makers, Armonk, N.Y.-based International Business Machines Corp., which makes computers of almost every size, has been reporting disappointing sales of its midrange lines. 
Some Japanese-made microwave ovens that used to cost about $235 now go for a little over $130.Sanyo Electric Co. replaced a line of $700 small refrigerators with a new one starting around $470. 
Worlds of Wonder attributed the loss to plummeting sales and delays in getting its toys to market during the Christmas season.The quarter's loss included a charge of $63.6 million for reserves to cover price reductions, estimated losses for the liquidation of a Hong Kong unit and disposal of excess materials related to discontinued or slow-moving lines. 
Mr. Whitwam hinted that GE is making its bid to fend off possible increased competition in the appliance market from Whirlpool.He said Whirlpool plans on expanding Roper's current lines of home appliances to compete directly with such lines as GE's Hotpoint. 
Even devoted players finally grew bored as the latest games stopped offering anything new.Nowadays, marketers are working to prevent a glut by pulling older lines off the shelf as more games are introduced. 
In composite New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Tandy shares closed at $40.25, off 50 cents.IBM introduced its PS/2 line last April, partially in a bid to regain market share lost to lower-cost clones. 
Officials said it will expand use of the new operating system to other VAX computers in the next few months.Although the new four-processor VAX 8840 is Digital's most powerful computer ever, the line was introduced by Digital's vice president of mid-range systems, William Demmer, which drew questions from analysts. 
C. Olivetti & Co. of Italy, plus others he declined to identify.If a pact is reached, Siemens and Olivetti would either license or buy from IBM the crucial parts of IBM's PS/2 line of computers and incorporate them into Siemens and Olivetti computers. 
Xerox secretary Margie Filter said Crum & Forster has helped results in the past two years, and that Xerox aims to boost its business products and systems sales through an emphasis on document processing.Ms. Filter noted that Xerox has absorbed punishing price competition from Japanese manufacturers and "re-established itself with a premier copier line." 
Since then, it has been widely assumed that Mr. Kelly would find some new way to get back into the acquisition game.Spinning off Swift-Eckrich, whose lines include the Butterball turkey brand, would leave Mr. Kelly in control of the core business he knows best.Many of the meat lines were part of Esmark Inc., a conglomerate that Mr. Kelly built in the 1970s. 
The final quarter, which ended Jan. 2, should carry more than half of the expected 1987 earnings of about $6.4 million, or 90 cents a share.Full-year sales -- not including the Kaepa shoe line that the company sold last year -- should total $313 million, down slightly from $319 million. 
Wolverine World Wide had posted a 1986 loss of $12.6 million, largely attributable to a $9 million charge caused by the restructuring.The consolidation, which Mr. Gleason credits for the company's turnaround, also led to the closing of five Midwest and New England shoe factories, the sale of the Kaepa athletic shoe line to a management group, the sale of retail linen stores and a management restructuring. 
"Since we felt the pinch in the early 1980s, we've become much more consumer-oriented," says James Preston, president of Avon's beauty group.To its distress, Avon learned a few years ago that many women considered its makeup line "stodgy," its gift products overpriced and its jewelry unfashionable. 
So Avon increased the number of gift items priced under $15 and created "more contemporary" jewelry.Last month it revamped its lipstick and nail-polish line. 
Scott Paper Co. is looking for a new advertising agency to take over all but one of its U.S. consumer products lines now handled by J. Walter Thompson USA Inc. and BBDO Worldwide Inc. 
Scott Paper Co. is looking for a new advertising agency to take over all but one of its U.S. consumer products lines now handled by J. Walter Thompson USA Inc. and BBDO Worldwide Inc.The one exception is the Viva paper towel line, which will remain with BBDO. 
Time is also developing a children's version of its highly successful Sports Illustrated that Mr. Brack said is aimed at encouraging literacy while expanding the magazine's reach.He also said the magazine is developing a line of travel and vacation publications on such subjects as how to play golf, to be distributed by resort operators. 
The 288-page book is based on Time magazine's Man of the Year issue featuring the Soviet leader.With the disbanding of the formal development operations, "one of the main goals of every publisher and managing editor is to examine potential expansions or line extensions of their properties," Mr. Brack said. 
Quaker Fabric Corp. said it signed a definitive agreement to sell its tufted-velvet and flock-upholstery fabric lines to Culp Inc. for $5.6 million, subject to various adjustments. 
But depending on the outcome, the episode could soil the squeaky-clean image of one of the nation's most successful industrial companies, and of its highly regarded chairman and chief executive officer, Charles F. Knight.A U.S. management hero of sorts, Mr. Knight, operating in fiercely competitive global markets for a broad line of industrial, consumer and defense products, has extended to 30 years Emerson's unbroken streak of increased profits. 
But it took Bridgestone four years to make up its mind, and it did so only after considerable strengthening of the yen against the dollar.Sources say that Beatrice has had such premium food lines as Hunt tomato products and Swift meats on the block in Europe for a year, with no takers. 
Another group is negotiating to license a line of clothing created by a team of 20 American and Soviet designers.The line, "Design for Peace," will make its debut at the Dallas Apparel Mart next month. 
The cumbersome outfits "weren't made with hopping on buses and getting in and out of taxis in mind.""Their attitude is, the more gizmos you can stick on a garment, the better," says Laura Kligh, one of the 10 Americans who spent three weeks in the Georgian resort town of Tbilisi in September crafting part of the "Design for Peace" line. 
Lintas, which has had Noxell as a client for 41 years, will continue to create ads for the Hunt Valley, Md., company's Cover Girl makeup and Noxema skin cream lines.Those lines bill an estimated $60 million in advertising annually. 
But ad industry executives, cosmetics marketers and cosmetics analysts said that while Clarion's sales have been strong, they have met neither the company's nor analysts' expectations since the product was launched with much hoopla in September 1986.Clarion is a moderately priced line meant to appeal to women over 30 years old who have sensitive skin. 
"We are going to stay with the line because Noxell has historically been a good vendor for us," he added.In its first three months on the market, sales of the Clarion line totaled an estimated $25 million. 
Mr. Mottus added that Noxell may have been "spoiled by" the success of its Cover Girl line.Founded in 1961, Cover Girl has grown to become one of the two largest cosmetics lines sold in the U.S. 
Warner-Lambert Co. said it definitively agreed to acquire certain candy lines from RJR Nabisco Inc. and added that it expects first-quarter per-share earnings to rise 20%. 
The candy brands, which include Junior Mints, Charleston Chew, Sugar Daddy and others, will become part of Warner-Lambert's American Chicle Group subsidiary.They broaden the company's confectionery lines, giving Warner-Lambert its first chocolate candy. 
"This is nothing more than puffery, though I may be surprised tomorrow morning," he added.Richard Hanley, an independent analyst in New York, said that price discounts on the old Hoover line and other costs of the model changeover will depress first-quarter results. 
Black & Decker says it is pulling its Lite Years, introduced in January 1987, and Just For Me flashlights, introduced last month.The Towson, Md.-based appliance company also says it will delay shipping a line of smoke detectors that contained the Kodak Ultralife. 
Polaroid's requests and Kodak's responses, disclosed in federal court documents unsealed Friday in Boston, are part of a 12-year battle between the two companies.The court already has ruled that Kodak's line of instant cameras and film introduced in 1976 infringed on seven patents of Polaroid, the founder of instant photography and the only other company in the business in the U.S. 
With existing imprints in Canada, Australia and New Zealand, Doubleday hopes to coordinate publication of titles throughout the English-speaking world . . .WHO'S NEWS: Nan Talese, vice president and editor-in-chief of the adult trade division of Houghton Mifflin Co., will join Doubleday next month as senior vice president and editorial director of her own line of books . . . 
Mr. McGovern said several product lines showed "solid volume performance," helped by a 12% increase in marketing expenditures.Among the top performers were ready-to-serve dry soups, beverages, fresh produce, the Pepperidge Farm line of baked goods, Mrs. Paul's Kitchens fish products, Prego sauces and Swanson frozen entrees. 
But under the IRS notice, investment companies now are required to recognize any built-in gain that would have been realized if the company had liquidated before merging into the fund.As a result, some funds don't expect to be doing much in the merger line anymore. 
International Business Machines Corp. introduced some long-awaited software that will make its current line of mainframes run a bit faster and will open the way for far more sophisticated applications. 
In addition, IBM introduced two mainframes that fill in holes in the Sierra product line -- the 280E, which has two processors, and the 500E, which contains five.IBM also extended the range of its 4381 line of mid-range computers by announcing two high-end machines that run the new operating system software. 
While he wouldn't estimate the sale price, analysts have estimated that it would exceed $1 billion.Kraft also told analysts it plans to develop and test a line of refrigerated entrees and desserts, under the Chillery brand name. 
On Feb. 9, American Standard rebuffed an unsolicited $65-a-share, or $2.03 billion, takeover offer from Black & Decker, a Towson, Md., maker of power tools and household appliances.New York-based American Standard has plumbing and air-conditioning businesses, which Black & Decker believes would be a good fit with its own consumer tool and appliance lines. 
Champion Products Inc. said it reached an agreement with National Football League Properties Inc. to produce and market "replica" football jerseys bearing the identification of the 28 NFL teams.Champion Products, which makes and markets athletic, recreational and leisure wear, said the line of jerseys will be shipped in August. 
The price increases come at a time when Chrysler has alleged that Japanese auto makers are "dumping" vehicles in the U.S. market at prices below cost.Last week at the Chicago Auto Show, Gerald Greenwald, chairman of Chrysler's Chrysler Motors Corp. unit, defended the company against critics who said that Chrysler was also dumping its own import line in the U.S. market. 
The Bridgestone deal "might have been more attractive," Mr. Millis said, if Firestone had a proposed acquisition in sight for its cash from the joint venture rather than the prospect of a significant reduction in operations.Nonetheless, Mr. Millis applauded the move over an outright sale of the tire assets because the present arrangement ensures that Firestone's retail stores will continue to be supplied with Firestone-brand tires and that Firestone's network of about 3,500 independent dealers also could have a broader line of tires. 
The decline "was particularly significant" in the fourth quarter, the company said.Polaroid said it would be introducing camera systems for under $100 in the first half of 1988, and would be applying its newer Spectra instant-film technology to its 600 camera line, which has been on the market for about seven years. 
Honeywell Bull Inc. introduced three models of its DPS 7000 family of medium-scale computers, along with software for them.The Minneapolis-based company said the models 72, 82 and 92 extend the DPS 7000 line of mainframes introduced last April. 
The furniture maker said the closely held Berkshire and Allegheny operations have combined annual sales of $32 million.Berkshire sells a specialized line of beds and daybeds and Allegheny makes Berkshire's metal beds and supplies parts and semi-finished products to other home furnishings manufacturers. 
Black & Decker first approached American Standard in November to negotiate a friendly merger.Black & Decker believes American Standard's plumbing and air-conditioning businesses are a logical extension of its consumer tool and appliance lines. 
"People perceive Ryder as the yellow (rental) trucks," Mr. Burns says."While that's a valuable line, it's less than 15% of the company." 
Mr. Shea noted that in 1987 Spiegel dropped low-profit-margin merchandise such as lawn mowers, chain saws, most cameras and most toys, to concentrate on apparel.Discontinued lines accounted for $30 million in 1986 sales. 
The new system software will be able to handle far more complex programs and work much faster with huge data bases.It will finally take advantage of some advanced characteristics in IBM's 3090 line of mainframes that were introduced three years ago. 
The talks, first reported in Crain's Chicago Business, mark an apparent attempt by the two companies to expand joint marketing efforts.Last year, Chicago-based Sears launched its McKids line of children's clothing under an exclusive licensing agreement with Oak Brook, Ill.-based McDonald's.Sears officials consider the line successful, with annual sales now estimated to exceed $100 million. 
The rating agency said the downgrade resulted from Emhart's aggressive acquisition program."Emhart is likely to make a major acquisition in the next two years as it seeks to fulfill its strategic objective of repositioning the business mix towards products with more promising profit and growth prospects than its traditional capital equipment lines," the ratings agency said. 
"There are over 800 toy companies in America" and most in Galoob's revenue range who were concentrating on marketing toys "much above the $50 range were hurting in 1987," said Steven Eisenberg who follows the toy industry for Bear, Stearns & Co. Galoob, however, with practically no debt, isn't likely to be another WOW and should rebound to profitability in the "50 cents to 75 cents a share range" this year assuming an acceptable product mix, Mr. Eisenberg said.Toy companies in general are likely to be "heading back to basics" with lower-priced products making up most of their mix; Galoob, which will unveil its new line of toys to analysts this week, is likely to follow that pattern, according to Mr. Eisenberg. 
Compaq Computer Corp. reported its fourth-quarter net income more than tripled and sales more than doubled, despite the first full brunt of competition from International Business Machines Corp.'s newest personal computer line. 
The most powerful computers in that line, which challenge Compaq's microcomputers aimed at big businesses, weren't available in large quantities until the fourth quarter.When the Armonk, N.Y.-based computer giant debuted the PS/2 line last April 2, some industry watchers predicted that Compaq and many other computer makers might be badly hurt by the IBM machines, which incorporated changes to the computer design IBM had used since 1981 in its original PC line. 
Ms. Cools said she suspected Kodak might exit the business because it hadn't introduced an improved version of the disk since February 1986.Kodak's product announcement last month included everything but disk cameras -- two new 35mm camera lines, a new 110 camera and a new disposable camera. 
He said he doesn't expect Kodak will resume production of the disk.He expects the current disk manufacturing capacity to be shifted to produce a line of recently introduced 35mm cameras. 
Donald P. Kelly and Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. are in talks that could lead to another Beatrice Co. spinoff or to Mr. Kelly's buying one or more of Beatrice's huge food lines. 
Mr. Kelly and Kohlberg Kravis took Beatrice private in a leveraged buy-out two years ago.But Beatrice has individual food lines, including Swift meats and Hunt tomato products, that could easily be spun off. 
Partly because he was distracted by his E-II role, Mr. Kelly has had trouble peddling the whole company.The most likely spin-off candidates are the Swift meat lines and Tropicana juices, analysts said. 
Such a high-end product "is a checkoff item for scientific and engineering shops committing to one vendor," said John Logan, an analyst with Yankee Group in Boston.Those companies want to know that they could buy high-end graphics workstations that work with the rest of the line, he explained. 
It moved its personal computer division into the same group as its older typewriter division, a sign that those two markets are converging.It also moved a slow-selling line of midrange computers into the same group as IBM's core business: the large mainframe computers that run most big companies' and governments' finances. 
Other analysts said they believe Mr. Akers's assertion that the separation is a sign of IBM's high hopes for the 3X, which has more than 250,000 customers.One of IBM's biggest new products of 1988 will be the first major addition to the 3X line in years, a machine code-named "Silverlake." 
In a year-old dispute just made public, Marshall Field's has challenged the use of the Mrs. Fields Cookies' name.Chicago-based Marshall Field's said it learned last year that Mrs. Fields, a chain of stores known for its cookies, was interested in bringing out a line of clothing under the name Mrs. Fields. 
Qmax Technology Group Inc., Dayton, Ohio, said it is offering a new line of skin-treatment gels for use by cosmetic companies in their skin-care products.The line is related to a family of drugs similar to Retin-A, a vitamin A-related compound made by a unit of Johnson & Johnson, a New Brunswick, N.J.-based health-care products company. 
Most importantly, consultants say, as president of IBM's Communications Products Division last year, she was one of the few executives to exceed her 1987 budget projections and has become a protege of powerful IBM executive Terry Lautenbach.As the newly named general manager of IBM Communication Systems group, Mrs. Hancock, 44 years old, takes responsibility for about $4 billion to $5 billion in revenue from IBM's entire line of telecommunications products. 
To better tap this embryonic but traditionally hard-to-reach market, the nation's No. 3 aluminum maker said it was reorganizing its European operations under a new unit.Reynolds also said it was looking to beef up other consumer-products lines there, including aluminum foil and packaging. 
He said that Teradyne's problem began when Intel Corp. selected semiconductor testers from rival LTX Corp., Westwood, Mass., for its highly successful new microprocessors.Motorola Corp. is believed to be deciding between LTX and Teradyne testers for its microprocessor line. 
For the year ended Sept. 27, sales were $1.9 billion.American Standard has made restructuring moves, strengthening its position in the repair and remodeling markets and emphasizing lines with higher margins. 
Microcom makes computer communications equipment.Meridian markets the Carbon Copy line of software. 
NCR Corp., ballyhooing the increased flexibility of its popular Tower computer system, broadened the line for high-end and low-end users with four new models. 
Mr. Gray said the same software system -- namely the UNIX network, developed by American Telephone & Telegraph Co. -- can be used on each Tower model.In turn, that makes individual computer programs, be they as simple as a spreadsheets or as complex as controlling factory equipment, compatible with every part of the Tower line. 
But, with the introduction of the four NCR models, none seem quite as extensive."This line is a bit fuller," said Wendy Abramowitz, an analyst with Argus Research Corp., in New York. 
The 32/200 is scheduled to be available in April, with a suggested list price of $5,445.The 32/850, now the most powerful on the Tower supermicrocomputer line, can serve as many as 512 users. 
But Mr. Shapiro says the company may have a tougher sales job with Simplesse than it had with NutraSweet, since consumers had seen sugar-substitutes before.As a result, the company is considering bringing out its own line of food products containing Simplesse. 
Revenue rose 4% to $281.7 million from $270.8 million.Irving Gould, chairman and chief executive officer, said demand for all products "exceeded expectations" while the Amiga line "is being established solidly and currently represents 40% of total revenues." 
But designers are also offering women the shorter look with a bit more modesty.Donna Karan showed culottes in her spring line. 
He expects more pants in the fall collection.But designers say they haven't abandoned the longer skirt and plan to include it in their fall lines as one option. 
But Sterling Group Inc., a Houston investment-banking concern that specializes in leveraged buy-outs, confirmed it recently formed SGI to purchase ArtCarved.ArtCarved, which makes a line of diamond, wedding and class rings, had annual sales exceeding $100 million last year. 
Last September, Brown-Forman said it was considering the sale of the division to focus its operations on alcoholic beverages, china and luggage.In July 1986, Brown-Forman liquidated its unprofitable Keepsake jewelry line. 
The Oslo-based computer maker earlier this month slashed its estimate of 1987's pretax earnings to half the 475 million kroner ($74.8 million) posted for 1986.Norsk Data intends to widen the international market share of its successful line of integrated newspaper and publishing systems. 
Eastman Kodak Co., expanding both its high-end and low-end camera line, introduced four new cameras, including a 35mm version that will likely sell for less than $50. 
United's shares closed at $34.50, down 87.5 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.Quarterly sales grew in flight systems, which includes Sikorsky helicopters, and defense electronics and aircraft products lines; building systems, primarily Otis elevators and Carrier air-conditioning systems; and industrial products, such as automotive products, Essex wire and cable, and control systems. 
In addition, mainframe sales rose a bit even though they have been shipped in volume for three years and sales could normally be expected to slip at this stage of the product cycle.IBM said sales of the new line of personal computers were strong. 
Said H.P. Smith, an analyst with Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co., "The sale price is particularly disconcerting given the fact that the company had been indicating there were a large number of companies expressing interest in this business."Gould has been trying for 17 months to sell its defense businesses, and still has its large NavCom Systems unit and several smaller lines to sell. 
Sales rose to $243.4 million from $214.6 million.The grocery products concern, which also makes paints, stains and products for the food-service industry, said shipments were up in all its lines. 
Wine Group is a San Francisco-based limited partnership.Glenmore, a distilled beverages producer, said it may redeploy the cash in its existing lines. 
Last July, Scott Chairman Philip Lipincott set a sales target of $1 billion for Europe by 1990, constituting about a fourth of total company sales.Among Scott's European brands are Andrex, the leading bathroom tissue in Britain, and Le Trefle, a popular French line of sanitary paper goods.Scott also markets Cotonelle bathroom tissue in Italy and the Sancel line in Spain. 
Sony Corp. last year introduced its My First Sony line of audio products for children four and up.Fisher-Price Toys, a division of Quaker Oats Co., rolled out a $225 kids' camcorder this Christmas, a pricey departure from its mainstay line of preschool toys. 
One analyst said he thought increasing competition in the market for 286-based computers was also behind the price cut."Pricing pressure is really heating up in this area," said Jim Poyner, an analyst with Rauscher Pierce Refsnes Inc. Mr. Poyner predicted a few weeks ago in an investment report that Compaq would have to cut prices because of aggressive price cutting by IBM. Official prices of IBM's lastest line of computers haven't changed since the machines were introduced April 2, but Mr. Poyner believes IBM's important direct sales force, which sells computers to large corporations, is offering bigger discounts. 
Once known as a pretzel maker, J&J has broadened its product base by acquiring several companies in recent years.Among its newer lines are cookies, frozen juices and churros, a Hispanic specialty pastry. 
In 1987, the company acquired a controlling interest in ICEE-USA, a marketer of semi-frozen carbonated beverages, and Vernon, Calif.-based Southern Food Products, a maker of baked goods.J&J also acquired the Frostar line of frozen treats and Trotter Soft Pretzels. 
Deere & Co. said it plans to lay off indefinitely about 150 workers at its construction-equipment assembly plant here.The maker of farm, industrial, and lawn and garden equipment said the layoffs are due to completion of the introduction of a new line of crawler-bulldozers and what a spokesman called "minor reductions in production schedules." 
One of these, the Premier, is especially important.It is the first model in the new Eagle brand of cars that Chrysler plans to sell through the 1,400 dealers it added to its distribution network when it picked up American Motors. (The Eagle line isn't to be confused with the Eagle model formerly sold by AMC.) 
That company's popular and profitable Jeep models were a major reason Chrysler made the acquisition.But Chrysler figures it can get the most bang for its buck by creating a new line of cars that appeals to Jeep owners -- typically young and upscale types who now buy, say, a Saab to go along with their Jeep. 
But consumers aren't easily swayed."The tough part is how long will it take" to get a good car line for Eagle, says Mr. Iacocca. 
Analysts said the software should help Ashton-Tate remove some of the considerable concern over whether it can update the venerable dBASE product to keep up with the new generation of computer hardware and operating-system software.For Microsoft, analysts said the agreement will ensure that it can offer the general public the sort of products that International Business Machines Corp. has promised its customers with its newest line of personal computers. 
But Emhart isn't abandoning its past as a consumer and industrial products company either, as the Stanadyne bid shows.Emhart is primarily interested in Stanadyne's Moen brand of plumbing products, which Emhart says would make a natural fit with its consumer hardware and housewares lines. 
GM has scheduled overtime shifts tomorrow at its Baltimore truck plant and for postal vehicle production at its Moraine, Ohio, truck plant.GM's Pontiac, Mich., West plant, which builds Blazer and Jimmy sport utility trucks, will be closed until Jan. 18 for installation of a new engine line. 
Dow has indicated, however, that its appetite isn't yet filled.Last week, it offered to acquire A.H. Robins's over-the-counter drug line from Rorer Group for $950 million if Rorer should be the successful bidder for Robins. 
However, the decision to entertain buyers for Talbots and Eddie Bauer represents a turnabout for General Mills.At the September annual meeting, chairman H. Brewster Atwater Jr. outlined ambitious growth plans, including 15 to 20 new outlets and introduction of a children's line for Eddie Bauer, and a $190 million expansion for Talbot's retailing and direct-marketing operations. 
As previously reported, the Palo Alto-based company, once known as CooperVision Inc., last year unsuccessfully sought to be acquired.The company has sold its ophthalmic pharmaceuticals lines and current operations include medical diagnostics and ophthalmalogic surgical equipment and lenses. 
Marketing the Vidal Sassoon products to retailers and catalog showrooms accounts for about 80% of its business.Helen of Troy also sells its own line of professional hair-care appliances to salons, about 10% of its sales. 
The new agency is likely to be a much smaller one than Thompson, an industry source said.Thompson's recent account losses include Pillsbury Co.'s $200 million Burger King Corp. account, $100 million of Ford Motor Co. business in Europe and Latin America, the $30 million account for PepsiCo Inc.'s Slice soft drink line, and a dozen smaller accounts. 
The ad agencies competing for the Saturn account haven't been given many details about the cars Saturn will make.The Saturn line is expected to feature cars that are smaller and lighter than the current GM cars. 
Maytag Corp. said it plans to spend an additional $30 million to upgrade and expand its Galesburg, Ill., plant, which makes the Admiral line of appliances. 
"The complexity and uncertainty of a possible takeover" of Rorer "have to hurt its chances," said H. Arvid Johnson, Robins's senior vice president and general counsel.Moreover, Robins has reacted negatively to Rorer's recent proposal to finance a more generous bid by selling off some of Robins's prized consumer drug lines, such as Robitussin cough syrup, Chap Stick lip balm and Dimetapp cold remedies. 
DESIGNING a product for able-bodied people so it's also useful to the handicapped sometimes requires only imagination, not much money, as can be seen in a couple of recent innovations.Standard software for Apple Computer Inc.'s Macintosh line includes a file called "Easy Access" for people who can't type with both hands or have trouble manipulating the mouse. 
Paris-based Kaysersberg, with annual sales of about $725 million, operates six plants and employs 3,600 workers.It markets a broad line of towel and tissue, personal-care and health-care products in France, West Germany, Italy and the Benelux countries. 
Equally unfounded is Mr. Kelly's implication that the American Brands board of directors has not been aggressively seeking meaningfully to enhance shareholder value."American Brands' best-known lines are its cigarette brands, including Pall Mall, Tareyton and Lucky Strike. 
The company also owns such major liquor brands as Jim Beam, Old GrandDad and Old Crow.Other lines include Swingline office products, Case cutlery, Titleist and Foot-Joy golf items and Master Locks. 
In 1986, Mr. Kelly was named as Beatrice's chairman when it was acquired by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., a New York investment concern, in a $6.2 billion leveraged buy-out.In July, he took Beatrice's non-food businesses and some smaller specialty food lines public as E-II Holdings. 
Its previous offer was about 13.3 million shares.Rorer also told Robins that its revised acquisition proposal "contemplates" the sale of Robins's over-the-counter drug lines, such as Robitussin, Chap Stick and Dimetapp, to Merrell Dow Pharmaceuticals Inc. for $950 million.Rorer said it hadn't entered a formal agreement with Merrell Dow, a unit of Dow Chemical Co. Merrell Dow offered in May to buy those lines directly from Robins. 
The VMS 5.0 -- priced at up to $3,975 -- won't be found at record stores near you, however.The Digital program is the new operating system that controls the basic functions of the popular VAX line of computers. 
Officials of the Recording Industry Association of America, the group leading the opposition to digital tape recorders, couldn't be reached for comment.Separately, as expected, Tandy unveiled a personal computer, the Tandy 5000, compatible with IBM's Personal System/2 line. 
Hachette, which claims it is now the world's fourth-biggest media company, behind Bertelsmann, Capital Cities/ABC Inc., and Time Inc., is being driven abroad in part by challenges at home.Group de la Cite, a recent agglomeration of publishing companies, is in most of Hachette's lines and owns half of the world's biggest book club, which sells at great profit 26 million books a year to one Frenchman in every five. 
Containing Kodacolor "Gold," the boxes prominently display that word in gold-colored foil against a black background and a gold band running across the center of the box.The new print film and name will be marketed world-wide and will replace Kodak's highly successful line of VR-G films. 
The company doesn't disclose how much of its revenue -- $13.3 billion in 1987 -- is derived from film sales, but film is Kodak's cash cow.The VR-G line of 35mm color-print amateur film, introduced three years ago, is aimed at the fastest-growing market for film. 
"Microsoft has done a much better job in delivering new products to market than Lotus," Mr. Sherlund said."They seem to get more bang from their R&D line than Lotus." 
Spy, the bratty monthly magazine that tweaks New York's rich and powerful, will launch a new line of books with Dolphin/Doubleday this fall. 
He predicted continued strong sales of such recent products as the cordless screwdriver, Air Station air pump, Handy Chopper food processor and Spacemaker popcorn popper.As part of the new strategy, the company has been developing innovations in its line of power-tool accessories, including Piranha saw blades and Bullet Pilot Point drill bits. 
Parker Hannifin Corp. said it completed the previously announced acquisitions of Pullman Co.'s Bruning Hydraulics and Waterman Hydraulics divisions for $24.5 million.The acquisitions broaden Parker's hydraulics parts products line. 
Grow Group, which makes household products and specialty chemical coatings and paints, also said it expects to report a loss from continuing operations for the third quarter ended March 31 of about $1 million.In the year-earlier period, earnings from continuing lines were $773,000. 
In the chemical group, increased sales of mining reagents, water-treatment chemicals and engineered materials contributed to the gains.Meanwhile, the company's consumer-products business, the Shulton group, had higher sales of such household lines as Pine-Sol liquid cleaner and Combat pest-control products. 
Dell Computer Corp., as expected, became the first company to announce copies of International Business Machines Corp.'s year-old Personal System/2 computer line, but Dell's models won't be available until the fourth quarter. 
A Warhol calendar is in the works, but Mr. Schlaifer also envisions Warhol posters, note cards, bathmats, shopping bags, ties, handbags and scarfs.There are talks with Bloomingdale's about a housewares line. 
It didn't break out product-line results, but a spokesman said its world-wide mainframe shipments rose from the year-earlier quarter and that the company saw "continuing strength" from mainframes.The biggest shot in the arm for IBM may have been the February announcement of an unglamorous but pivotally important product: a new piece of software to control the basic workings of IBM's three-year-old Sierra line of mainframes. 
The biggest shot in the arm for IBM may have been the February announcement of an unglamorous but pivotally important product: a new piece of software to control the basic workings of IBM's three-year-old Sierra line of mainframes.Some analysts believe the thousands of corporations and governments that run their finances on million-dollar IBM mainframes hadn't previously had a compelling reason to trade up to the Sierra line. 
The current quarter should go a long way to clarify IBM's long-term outlook by resolving some crucial questions outside the mainframe marketplace.IBM's year-old PS/2 personal computer line will see its first clones enter the market, beginning with some announcements next week. 
Speculation in the industry is that IBM will pull the wraps off Silverlake on June 21.It has huge potential for IBM because it will be pitched as a replacement for a line with more than 275,000 current customers, the 3X. 
As for AT&T's view of the bargain, its managers say that while Olivetti's machines fit well with AT&T's U.S. product line, it wouldn't be difficult for AT&T to find another source.AT&T has been dissatisfied, moreover, with Olivetti sales of its 3B2 minicomputers and System 75 phone switchboard lines in Europe. 
Polaroid Corp., as expected, unveiled a new low-priced line of instant cameras called Impulse. 
He disclosed how vulnerable anyone who covers the White House is to the anonymous aides who dispense quotes every day.I think anonymous quotes are often useful, even important, but everyone knows they can also be a tool to push a source's latest line. 
"The market still seems to be strong, the traffic is good.We anticipate selling out (to dealers) earlier this year than in past years on virtually all car and truck lines." 
But, he adds, "not all the products and merchandising have been changed yet to be consistent with that focus."GM dug a hole for itself, as company officials see it, by blurring the distinction between Buick and Oldsmobile, and between those cars and other GM lines. 
For a half-century, the company's divisions formed a progression: A customer started with a Chevrolet, switched to a Pontiac if he was flashy, progressed to a more conservative Oldsmobile and then a more opulent Buick, and finally, if he made it big, landed a Cadillac.Then came the look-alike era of the early 1980s, when GM downsized its model lines and cut costs by sharing many basic parts across divisions. 
Executives of AT&T's Data Systems Group have said last year's fourth-quarter sales of personal computers were hurt by slow deliveries from Olivetti.AT&T also has been unhappy with Olivetti's launching a minicomputer line in Europe that competes with AT&T's 3B line, instead of trying harder to sell AT&T's products. 
AT&T's Olivetti machines run on International Business Machines Corp. operating systems, and the president of AT&T's Data Systems Group, Vittorio Cassoni, who came from Olivetti in 1986, said AT&T doesn't have any plans to emphasize Unix on the desktop.AT&T has said it plans to use Unix running on Sun's powerful Sparc microprocessor for its new line of minicomputers due out next year. 
Digital Equipment Corp. is expected to introduce shortly a series of new computers to replace the middle of its popular VAX line. 
In performance, they will overlap several IBM computers, including parts of the IBM 9370 line and the 4381 line.Analysts speculated that Digital is anxious to announce Calypso before IBM introduces the Silverlake line. 
We are neither seeking or soliciting offers."Mr. Smilow said the company will go ahead with previously disclosed plans to sell its Jhirmack Inc. hair-care line. 
Mr. Teets says that "we've been restructuring for four years and basically we've just finished up" with a way to shed the loss-producing Verex mortgage insurance business.Last fall, the former food-service executive bought the Dobbs House airport restaurants and other food-services lines from Carson Pirie Scott for $326 million, boosting debt to about 50% of total capital. 
Just now, though, the two industries are more apart than together.Some analysts contend, moreover, that AT&T can do better computerizing its phone network than creating its own line of computers. 
A spokesman said the new labels don't address quality or pricing, but instead attempt to organize Sears's current offerings according to lifestyles of customers it is targeting.The Apostrophe line, for example, extends and brings together under a single contemporary label the Cheryl Tiegs casual clothes and Stefanie Powers career clothes already sold in Sears stores. 
IBM never challenged the rights of many clone-makers to replicate its earlier machines.IBM has indicated that it expects legal clones of its PS/2 line to appear, but didn't expect them to arrive quite so fast, and has said it certainly wouldn't do anything to make life easier for the clone makers. 
Nearly every cosmetic is sold under the pretended imprimatur of one or both of these oracles.The sales force for Estee Lauder's Clinique line, for instance, dresses in white lab coats to hustle its hospital-green bottles and tubes. 
Sun Microsystems will unveil today a line of general-purpose computer workstations built around Intel's popular 80386 microprocessor. 
"We own the Roper brand name.We attained that objective and we have full intentions to proceed with our plans to introduce a full line of Roper home appliances," Mr. Whitwam said. 
And he flunked his first screen test; the studio rejected his Cockney accent, his "bowlegs" and his "thick neck."Yet he still became the flagship of Hollywood's dreamboat line. 
Some, such as Monsanto Co., have shed nearly all their commodity chemicals.Others, such as Dow Chemical Co., are retaining certain basic products and building complementary specialty lines. 
General Time produces watches and clocks sold under the Westclox, Big Ben and Baby Ben and Seth Thomas names.Talley has been restructuring its operations to emphasize businesses, including its automotive air bag line, that have higher growth rates. 
Campbell Soup Co. said it will introduce several frozen-breakfast products, significantly expanding its efforts in one of the food industry's fastest growing segments.In May, the Camden, N.J.-based soup maker will roll out a new line of 99-cent frozen budget breakfasts, as well as a microwaveable Belgian waffle that required a tricky technological feat to make it palatable. 
Following the announcement yesterday morning, Price Pfister's shares soared $7 to close at $17.50 in national over-the-counter trading.Emhart, a maker of industrial, consumer and electronic goods, said Price Pfister's residential-plumbing line would complement Emhart's construction and do-it-yourself products. 
In addition, the product relies on special packaging, frequently used in other microwave products like pizza, to help keep it crispy on the outside.Campbell, which already has a $1.29 to $1.69 line of frozen breakfasts called Swanson's Great Starts, isn't alone in pursuing breakfast-eaters. 
So Edwin Lopez, who is trying to claim some space on those shelves for new products from Campbell Soup Co., has his work cut out.Mr. Lopez is working Hispanic neighborhoods trying to break down the fierce loyalty to Goya products and make inroads for Campbell's new Casera line of more than 50 food products aimed at Hispanics of Caribbean origin. 
Benihana National Corp., Miami, plans to close its unprofitable Big Splash-Seafood Emporium restaurant line as part of its drive to "get back to basics" and focus on Japanese cooking, Joel Schwartz, president, said in an interview. 
It fell 3 1/8 to 82 1/2 after it said will cease production of chlorofluorocarbons, a family of chemicals that have been found to damage the atmospheric ozone layer.Du Pont is the nation's largest producer of the chemicals, though the line is a relatively small part of its business. 
The emphasis on headgear is expected to last at least through the fall.Christian Lacroix's fall line, for example, includes velvets and flowers worn close to the head. 
Intel Corp., which fled the computer memory-chip business in 1985, took a tentative step toward re-entering it by agreeing to market memory chips made by Micron Technology Inc., one of only two U.S. concerns that still make them.Santa Clara, Calif.-based Intel -- which makes a broad line of semiconductor products -- along with most other big U.S. chip makers, quit making so-called DRAM, or dynamic random access memory, chips after Japanese chip makers flooded the U.S. with cheap memory chips earlier in the decade. 
In fact, some lawyers say, the Apple suit itself could well turn on a 1986 decision involving stuffed dinosaurs.In that case, decided in 1986 by Robert P. Aguilar, the same San Jose, Calif., federal judge assigned to hear the Apple suit, a pair of toy designers sued a company for infringing their copyrights on a line of dinosaur dolls. 
It isn't clear whether the vehicles will retain the Chevrolet name or just carry the Chevy "bow tie" emblem.In any event, Chevrolet hopes to launch Geo this fall, almost two years before the debut of GM's Saturn car line, another new nameplate that, unlike Geo, will also be a separate franchise. 
H.J. Heinz Co. said its Star-Kist Foods Inc. unit entered a definitive agreement to buy the pet-foods operations of California Home Brands Holdings Inc. Terms weren't disclosed.California Home Brands' line consists primarily of canned dog and cat foods, including the Skippy Premium, Vets, Sturdy, Petuna and Glamour Puss labels. 
That kind of world is an increasing headache for IBM.Its first line of PCs, born in 1981, was overrun by clones that had all the features of a Big Blue computer for less money. 
It bought the chip at the heart of the machine from Intel Corp. and the program that guided the machine's basic functions from then-fledgling Microsoft Corp.That made it easier for other companies to flank the IBM line with software and accessories. 
Regency Electronics Inc. said it agreed to sell its consumer products line to Uniden Corp. of America, also of Indianapolis, for $12 million. 
Regency Electronics Inc. said it agreed to sell its consumer products line to Uniden Corp. of America, also of Indianapolis, for $12 million.The maker of electronic communications equipment said the purchase price represents $8 million over the book value of the products, which are the company's lines of scanners and marine radios. 
Henley said it plans a public offering of $1 billion of subordinated debentures to refinance $980 million of bank debt now outstanding under a $2.3 billion line of credit.The company said it also expects to replace its existing line with a new facility totaling more than $2.5 billion. 
But Alf didn't make up for the declining Cabbage Patch sales, and industry analysts and buyers expect Alf to slow considerably this year.One problem, says a former executive who asks not to be identified, is that Coleco has devoted too much research-and-development effort to expanding its Cabbage Patch line, to little avail. 
But his most important move was to take Ward away from its traditional approach of being, like Sears, a private-label mass merchandiser.He transformed Ward into a low-priced specialty chain focused around such lines as consumer electronics and home furnishings. 
"We believe that if the FTC conducts the thorough review warranted here, it will agree with our position," Mr. Whitwam said.Whirlpool has said it plans to expand Roper's line of kitchen ranges into a broader selection of household appliances.The company has also charged that GE entered the bidding for Roper because the Fairfield, Conn.-based company feared competition from a Whirlpool-Roper combination, especially against its Hotpoint appliance line. 
Often, debt is ballooned by well-intentioned efforts to reshape a company's business.Allegheny International Inc., once primarily a steel producer, set out a decade ago to strengthen its consumer-products lines, mainly through acquisitions. 
A computer-marketing pact between International Business Machines Corp. and Britain's Ferranti International PLC heralds a major IBM campaign to boost European sales of its new line of personal computers.Under the agreement announced last week, the medium-sized British electronics company will relabel and sell IBM's new PS/2 line of personal computers along with its computer products. 
Mrs. Tompkins feels that Esprit moved too fast at a time when it needed to pause and reorient its image."Expansion put a lot of pressure on the {product} line," she says. 
Despite such extravagance, he adds, at least some Esprit stores are profitable.Similar excesses got Esprit into trouble with some department stores selling its line. 
Officials of the company said it will use the new chip as the heart of new models of its 4300 series of workstations, which are capable of producing three-dimensional, full-color graphic images used in computer-aided engineering and design.An earlier generation of microprocessors made by Motorola powers Tektronix's existing line of technical workstations. 
NCR Corp. introduced a new line of minicomputers for linking networks of personal computers or terminals in offices. 
The additional products in the agreement consist of a line of hand soaps and soap dispensers sold under the Boraxo and Luron names for the medical market, and a hand cleaner line for the automotive market, Greyhound said.A spokeswoman for Greyhound said the negotiations to buy the consumer and industrial lines of the U.S. Borax 20 Mule Team division were handled separately, but that the purchases are expected to close at the same time. 
Not surprisingly, the market's strong sales are attracting big food processors.Carnation Co., for example, is racing to build a national presence with its Contadina Fresh Pasta & Cheese line. 
General Foods Corp. is testing its Culinova gourmet entrees and Ronzoni refrigerated pasta and sauces.And Kraft Inc. recently began testing its Chillery line of refrigerated salads as well as pizza kits and pasta-and-sauce dinners. 
Talley also said it may pay additional stock and cash if McMullen achieves certain earnings over the next five years.Talley said the purchase is part of its previously announced restructuring plan to focus on government contracting, electronic parts and technical services, and sell its slow-growing consumer lines. 
Welbilt Corp. said it agreed to distribute home appliances in the U.S. for Bimak S.p.A., a Florence, Italy-based maker of consumer appliances.Welbilt said it will distribute a line of small appliances including cappuccino machines, irons, ice-cream machines and food processors under the Ariete label. 
A few stores are betting heavily on higher hemlines.Henri Bendel, New York, says 90% of its line will be short for the spring. 
Compensation soared to otherworldly levels as young wizards jumped from firm to firm in pursuit of an ever-faster fortune.Securities firms expanded headlong, throwing people and money at lines that showed even a glint of promise. 
The credit line, to be used for working capital, extends through March 31, 1990, and replaces a $60 million bank credit line that expired Jan. 31.As previously reported, International Technology said last month that it needed to negotiate additional credit, because cash from operations and existing bank credit wouldn't be enough to fund operations until the company receives proceeds from the sale of certain discontinued lines. 
Digital Equipment lost 4 to close at 120 3/8.The company introduced a new line of powerful computers called VAX 8800. 
Ms. Preston said she expects the Tandy model will use a chip set from Intel Corp., Santa Clara, Calif., that mimics the basic operations of the IBM computer.However, a former Tandy employee, who asked not to be identified, said the key chip set would be made by Chips & Technologies Inc., a Milpitas, Calif., company that makes chips used by a variety of clone makers to copy IBM's first generation personal computer line. 
IBM introduced its PS/2 line last April, partially in a bid to regain market share lost to lower-cost clones.IBM freely allowed other makers to copy the models in its PC line, started in 1981, to help establish its design in the face of competition from Apple Computer Inc.But inexpensive copies ate into IBM's sales, and with the PS/2 line IBM indicated it would guard its inventions more closely. 
The Canadian concern, as expected, also sought to block payment of so-called breakup fees to Macy from Federated.Macy's SEC filing confirmed its previously reported plans to sell Federated's discount-stores lines and its Ralphs' supermarkets unit, as well as unspecified department stores. 
Canada's Elizabeth Manley, who unexpectedly won a silver medal in figure skating, is being considered by three U.S. companies for ads that would run in Canada and parts of the U.S., says her agent, Michael A. Rosenberg of Beverly Hills.Another of his clients, U.S. figure-skater Jill Trenary, didn't even win a medal but is still being considered by a hair-care line, he says. 
Such arrangements would dilute the company's control over sales of its technology, and could step on the toes of IBM's sales representatives and dealers by creating competition for them.The fact that the Armonk, N.Y., computer giant is willing to consider such arrangements largely reflects its attempt to establish its PS/2 line as a standard. 
Some competitors, such as Compaq Computer Corp., have profited since the PS/2 introduction last April by selling to customers who didn't want to make the sometimes awkward transition to the new IBM hardware.IBM itself continues to sell in Europe part of its old line of computers, and Mr. Lowe said sales of those products have remained stronger than he expected. 
Olivetti also is responsible for all personal-computer and workstation development for American Telephone & Telegraph Co., a relationship that could complicate Olivetti's talks with IBM.In addition, clones of IBM's PS/2 line are expected to be marketed in the U.S. soon. 
International Business Machines Corp. labeled as premature a company executive's statement that IBM is discussing cooperating with European rivals in its new PS/2 line of personal computers. 
Reagan thus becomes the nation's sixth-largest outdoor advertising company, with about 10,000 signs. . . .Trimming fat, Wilson Foods Corp. says it will follow its recent introduction of a 96% fat-free ham product with a new Deli Lite line of low-cholesterol and low-fat deli meats. 
The stronger sales, in fact, encouraged GM to reduce the rebate on the models this week, to $500 from $600.But GM yesterday slapped its first-ever incentive on the new Buick Regal, the first in a new line of midsize cars the company is counting on to boost market share, because of less-than-robust sales. 
First Boston has been trying to sell Beatrice's remaining food businesses, including Swift-Eckrich, since last September.But sources said Mr. Kelly has asked Wasserstein, Perella & Co. -- the new investment banking firm formed by former First Boston merger chiefs Bruce Wasserstein and Joseph Perella -- to peddle Beatrice's Tropicana juice lines. 
But sources said Mr. Kelly has asked Wasserstein, Perella & Co. -- the new investment banking firm formed by former First Boston merger chiefs Bruce Wasserstein and Joseph Perella -- to peddle Beatrice's Tropicana juice lines.Sources said it is believed Salomon Inc.'s Salomon Brothers Inc. unit has been asked to sell two other Beatrice lines, Hunt tomato products and Wesson cooking oil. 
The chip is the piece of silicon that actually performs computations.The Lisp chip is now available only in Texas Instruments' Explorer II line, which was introduced last summer. 
But the company further boosted its shoe-line development staff by 50%, and plans to upgrade its remaining 15 U.S. factories.Mr. Gleason said a number of Wolverine lines, including Hush Puppies casual shoes, Brooks athletic shoes and Wolverine brand work shoes, began using new designs or entered new areas in the past year. 
While Microsoft would be prevented from selling its older program in Brazil, the Redmond, Wash., company would be assured of a possibly larger market for subsequent programs, they said.Meanwhile, Brasilia also appears to be retreating from a reported plan to allow a Brazilian company to manufacture an imitation of a widely used line of personal computers designed by Apple Computer Inc. U.S. trade officials earlier said that Brazil's disregard for the patent rights of U.S. computer makers was another reason for the threatened sanctions. 
SPARKLING WATER brands aSante and Saratoga are being sold by Anheuser Busch Cos., along with the Zeltzer Seltzer natural soda line. 
Convex Computer Corp. today is expected to introduce a new line of mini-supercomputers that it hopes will broaden the appeal of the powerful machines beyond the universities and research institutes that have been their mainstay. 
AT&T's last development agreement with a computer concern, Sun Microsystems Inc., eventually led to AT&T taking a stake in that company.AT&T forged the Sun agreement to improve its own computer line. 
Canadian Jeep/Eagle dealers said sales have also suffered in Canada because customers appear somewhat confused over the market niche that Premier is attempting to fill.Though the Premier is aimed directly at Ford Motor Co.'s Taurus and Sable line, some Canadian dealers said buyers expected a less expensive car in a price range similar to the low-price subcompact models AMC formerly built. 
Then came talk that a French concern wanted to acquire U.S. consumer products companies such as Chicago Pacific or the Sunbeam unit of Allegheny International, which filed for Chapter 11 protection from creditors last weekend.There is also the new "Elite" line of Hoover vacuums, due to be unveiled March 16 at a Plaza Hotel gala in New York. 
Control Data Corp. enhanced its general-purpose mainframe computer line with four top-end machines featuring larger memories and more computing capacity. 
Greyhound Corp. said it agreed to purchase the Borateem, Boraxo and 20 Mule Team household products lines and assets from the U.S. Borax & Chemical Corp. unit of London-based RTZ Corp. 
Kodak also disclosed flaws that lower the supposed 10-year life of its Ultralife nine-volt batteries.Black & Decker, one of Kodak's largest battery customers, is pulling thousands of flashlights from stores and stopping shipment of a new line of smoke detectors that carried the battery. 
Intertorg Inc., a Sacramento, Calif., importer, plans to set up a separate company to introduce Soviet fashions to the U.S., particularly the creations of Mr. Zaitsev -- designer to Raisa Gorbachev and the Bolshoi Ballet.Another group is negotiating to license a line of clothing created by a team of 20 American and Soviet designers. 
The Soviets' couture has gotten quite haute of late, their fashion spokesmen insist.Designers there haven't any intention of flooding the U.S. with Siberia-made, scratchy woolen socks or a line of apres-bowling wear. 
But the company is finding synergy between beer and the snack-food business a tougher nut to crack.Anheuser expects its Eagle Brand snack line to lose at least $10 million this year, and Mr. Ritter wouldn't estimate for analysts when the line might become profitable. 
That's bad news for Black & Decker Corp., one of its large customers.Black & Decker said it is pulling thousands of flashlights from store shelves and stopping shipment on a new line of smoke detectors that carried Kodak's so-called Ultralife nine-volt battery. 
However, the batteries didn't reach the mass market until the next year because of problems gearing up production.Kodak also markets a line of Japanese-made alkaline batteries. 
Noxell Corp. is about to give its Clarion cosmetics line a new advertising look. 
The account is expected to bill about $20 million this year, making it one of the largest cosmetics accounts in the U.S.Lintas, which has had Noxell as a client for 41 years, will continue to create ads for the Hunt Valley, Md., company's Cover Girl makeup and Noxema skin cream lines. 
The spokesman said that Noxell has told the company that the Clarion products will be repackaged and further promoted."We are going to stay with the line because Noxell has historically been a good vendor for us," he added. 
The Noxell spokeswoman said that the company doesn't break out sales of its individual product lines, but that Clarion sales are "right on target" with the company's expectations.Marketed mostly in drug stores, the Clarion line uses computers to help customers choose their makeup shades. 
Mr. Mottus said Noxell will probably have to focus on one or the other in its advertising.Mr. Mottus added that Noxell may have been "spoiled by" the success of its Cover Girl line. 
Polaroid Corp. disclosed Friday it is seeking $5.7 billion in damages from Kodak as a result of its successful patent infringement suit.And Black & Decker Corp. last week said it was pulling two lines of flashlights off the shelves because of flaws in the Kodak Ultralife nine-volt lithium batteries that power them. 
Warner-Lambert Co. said it definitively agreed to acquire certain candy lines from RJR Nabisco Inc. and added that it expects first-quarter per-share earnings to rise 20%.Terms of the candy lines transaction weren't disclosed. 
But those shortages should ease as the year progresses.In addition, IBM, which has been heavily discounting parts of its latest PC line, has indicated it will put very low prices on some products it will bring out this year.IBM said last week, for instance, that by roughly year end, it will have a product at the price of its entry-level Model 25 but that contains the central processor used in its Models 50 and 60, which are the middle of its line and cost far more than the Model 25. 
Computer Automation Inc. is an obscure, thinly traded California company that has been plunged into a patent controversy in the fractious personal computer market.At issue is a Computer Automation design that International Business Machines Corp. quietly arranged to use inside its new line of personal computers, the PS/2. 
Rumors circulated about the patent last year, but information was scarce until Computer Automation last month made a second announcement.It said the patent covered a memory process used inside the top models of the PS/2 line, and said IBM would pay the firm an undisclosed royalty on sales of those models. 
Mr. Richman said Glenview, Ill.-based Kraft expects profit increases for the year, but didn't specify how much.Earnings also are expected to benefit from a lower tax rate, a productivity-improvement campaign that could reduce expenses $25 million and the divestiture of Kraft's Duracell battery unit, Celestial Seasonings tea line, citrus business and Avoset, a contract packer, the company said. 
Anticipated shelf life of the products would range from two to four weeks.Last year Kraft test-marketed a line of chilled chocolates and salads. 
Allegis rose 7/8 to 72 on volume of 473,600 shares.Ashton-Tate unveiled a new line of dBASE IV data base management software designed for OS-2 and MS-DOS-based personal computers. 
Gerald Greenwald, chairman of Chrysler's Chrysler Motors unit, said that Mitsubishi Motors Corp. will produce the car in Japan until a new Chrysler-Mitsubishi joint-venture plant in Normal, Ill., is completed in 1989.The Summit will be the third car in the Eagle line of Chrysler's new Jeep/Eagle division. 
In Miami, the wealthiest Latin enclave in the U.S., American Express Co. plans to feature prominent Hispanics in a Spanish-language version of its Portraits campaign.And Campbell, aside from promoting its soup, is making a major push into the Hispanic market with a line of Caribbean-type foods. 
Mr. Canion also said Compaq, which has traditionally tried to outpace IBM in hardware enhancements, was following IBM in announcing the availability of OS/2 because the operating system "is an area where you don't want two companies fighting over which version is right."IBM maintains that OS/2 will run faster and with clearer graphics on its Personal System/2 line of computers than on comparable Compaq computers. 
The Japanese, meanwhile, are emphasizing luxury cars with hot engines and prices under $30,000.Nissan Motor Co. and Toyota Motor Co. plan to unveil new luxury lines in 1989. 
However, only $18.1 million, or 39 cents a share, was attributable to ongoing activities, with earnings of $80.3 million coming from the Greyhound Capital Corp. operation that was sold in October 1986.In the latest quarter, profit attributable to continuing lines was $18.5 million, or 49 cents a share. 
International Business Machines Corp. disclosed that its computer hardware profit margins rose at the end of 1987, surprising industry analysts and suggesting that its long spell of eroding profitability may finally be over.Separately, industry sources said IBM will make a major mainframe announcement next Tuesday, and speculated that it will include long-awaited software enhancements that would serve as a midlife kicker for IBM's tiring mainframe line. 
Isoetec Communications Inc. of Darien, Conn., and Vodavi Technology Corp., Scottsdale, Ariz., said they completed their planned purchase of the Executone division of Contel Corp. for $61 million.Each company purchased a 50% stake in Executone, which markets and services a line of business telephone systems. 
Analysts read the results, which were in line with most estimates, as indicating that Compaq is still successfully beating back competition from IBM's new PS/2 line.The most powerful computers in that line, which challenge Compaq's microcomputers aimed at big businesses, weren't available in large quantities until the fourth quarter. 
H.J. Heinz Co., whose Star-Kist line is a major producer of tuna and pet foods, said it agreed to acquire closely held Bumble Bee Seafoods Inc. of San Diego. 
The latest quarter includes a gain of $2.5 million, or one cent a share, from discontinued operations.Year-earlier results include a $2.5 million loss from discontinued lines. 
Analysts estimate IBM shipped only 3,000 to 4,000 units.The Postal Service contract alone could produce purchases of as many as 904 IBM minicomputers -- either the various models of the 9370 line or a model of the more powerful 4300 line. 
Qmax Technology Group Inc., Dayton, Ohio, said it is offering a new line of skin-treatment gels for use by cosmetic companies in their skin-care products. 
E-II was named as Esmark's reincarnation.Since April 1986, he has sold or taken public eight major parts of Beatrice, including its International Playtex Inc. personal products lines and Avis rental car chain, for about $6.1 billion.Kohlberg Kravis and its investors are about even on their investment, and Beatrice's most valuable food lines are still unsold. 
Donald Kelly is holding talks with Kohlberg Kravis that could lead to another Beatrice Co. spinoff, or to Mr. Kelly buying one or more of Beatrice's huge food lines. 
Nashua Corp. said it agreed to buy low-priced copiers and related supplies from Mita Industrial Co. of Japan for distribution outside the U.S.Nashua said the Mita line will complement the midrange Ricoh Co. copiers and expensive International Business Machines Corp. copiers it distributes outside the U.S. 
Operating profit, excluding a sharp rise in interest expense, more than quadrupled to $43.6 million, mainly because of a rebound in the filmed entertainment unit, which had $24.5 million in pretax earnings, compared with a year-earlier operating loss of $49.4 million.But MCA said its toy products had a pretax loss of $21.6 million, compared with year-earlier profit of $10 million, because of disappointing sales and shipment delays in the Gotcha! toy line. 
Weyerhaeuser Co. said earnings in its fourth quarter ended Dec. 27 jumped 35% on a 23% sales increase, as the dollar's decline strengthened markets for many lines. 
During Mr. Gray's tenure at United Technologies, the company bet billions of dollars on two new engines that, so far at least, aren't paying off.Mr. Gray canceled a third engine project, leaving a gaping hole in Pratt & Whitney's line that fancy engineering footwork permitted GE to fill. 
Chanel also plans to run ads in The Wall Street Journal.Consultants to the beauty-products business believe Estee Lauder Inc. and Cosmair Inc.'s Lancome line are likely to follow archrival Chanel's lead in testing new media. 
Moreover, Mr. Gray said, Towers are so-called "open-architecture" computers, meaning they are easily adaptable to equipment made by other companies.Analysts said a few other lines -- notably Digital Equipment Corp.'s MicroVAX II and a series made by San Jose, Calif.-based Altos Computer Systems Inc. -- are equally tractable. 
He will be responsible for a reorganized marketing organization, and will continue to oversee sales, service and parts operations."This realignment puts cars and trucks under one organization," Mr. Iacocca said in a statement yesterday, "and will allow us to place increased concentration on domestic product-development activities for all car and truck lines." 
Sequent makes computers that harness as many as 30 so-called parallel microprocessors to provide the power of a conventional mainframe computer for a much lower cost.In the fourth quarter, Sequent shipped 80 computer systems, 37 of which represented the initial shipments of its new Symmetry line of computers that use Intel Corp.'s state-of-the-art 80386 microprocessors. 
The long-awaited clones of International Business Machines Corp.'s new PS/2 line of personal computers could be on dealers' shelves as soon as May -- and even if customers aren't that eager for them, Big Blue's lawyers are. 
First, IBM will be taking steps to improve the position of its 9370 minicomputer, by far the company's worst product disappointment of 1987.In addition, one of IBM's biggest new products of the year will be a potentially lucrative addition to its midrange line. 
Terms weren't disclosed.Motorola, a maker of semiconductors and electronic equipment, said the division, which has annual sales of about $35 million, will complement its existing line of radio frequency semiconductors, which are used in mobile communications, cable television distribution, avionics, and other consumer and industrial applications. 
Such criticism, particularly on the need for new products, "is an easy answer but I'm not sure it's the right answer," counters Mr. Ferri."Our traditional competitors don't have a much broader line, but they do better financially than we do. 
Marketers' new interest in children reaches far beyond toy counters, however.Sony Corp. last year introduced its My First Sony line of audio products for children four and up. 
Thus, even companies that don't sell to children have come to recognize the need, as Texas A&M's Mr. McNeal puts it, "to start growing their customers early."Black & Decker Corp. has licensed its name to a line of toys that are miniature versions of its small appliances. 
In addition, the company is demanding that dealers assign special showroom space, sales personnel and service technicians to the Yugo cars.Without this commitment, Mr. Prior worries that dealers will pay more attention to their main car line and "orphan" the Yugo, just as sales for all auto makers are heading into a slump. 
Quarterly sales grew in flight systems, which includes Sikorsky helicopters, and defense electronics and aircraft products lines; building systems, primarily Otis elevators and Carrier air-conditioning systems; and industrial products, such as automotive products, Essex wire and cable, and control systems.Sales slipped less than 1%, however, in the segment that includes the Pratt & Whitney engine lines. 
Analysts say P&G, which has been selling upgraded disposable diapers in Europe, recently has come back strongly there as a result of an international restructuring and is increasing its market share.P&G sells Ultra Pampers and Ultra Pampers Plus, a more absorbent diaper line that has improved fasteners, Mr. Freedman said. 
Revenue for the latest period jumped to $14 million from $8.7 million.Software's president and chief executive officer, Fred M. Gibbons, said: "The continued strength in sales growth is a direct result of our success in selling to corporate accounts," with the company's Harvard Graphics and First Choice software lines pacing the advance. 
The sale agreement is subject to the approval of both companies' boards and is expected to be completed by May 1.As part of the transaction, Avon will keep a minority interest in Foster's intravenous therapy line. 
Compaq Computer Corp. cut prices on its midlevel computers by 10%, citing a "substantial increase" in manufacturing capacity and a desire to maintain the models' competitive position.The company cut prices on its line of computers built around the Intel Corp. 80286 microchip, now the mainstay of medium-priced machines compatible with International Business Machines Corp. computers. 
The agency ultimately could force a recall of the cars.Whatever the case, the questions raised about the H-body cars aren't good news for GM, which already is suffering from sluggish sales of its broader line of vehicles. 
McCormick & Co., a maker of spices, flavorings and other food products, said it agreed in principle to acquire the Spice Islands line of spices, herbs and vinegars from Specialty Brands Inc., a subsidiary of United Biscuits PLC. 
Campbell Soup Co. said it agreed in principle to acquire the Marie's line of refrigerated salad dressings, the ripe olives business and an olive processing plant in Spain from the Specialty Brands Inc. unit of United Biscuits PLC. 
As previously reported, Apple is expected to use the same forum to announce tomorrow a formal agreement with Digital Equipment Corp. for joint development of products that link computers made by the two companies.Apple's new LaserWriter II family of printers, which will replace its previous line of laser printers, will be priced from $2,799 to $6,599. 
Mr. Blumenthal said initial results have been encouraging for products designed to win new customers.The A1, the low end of a strategic line of midrange computers, sold faster than Unisys could produce them in the fourth quarter, he said. 
Most were eventually sold.In July, Mr. Kelly took Beatrice's non-food and specialty lines public as E-II.American Brands' lines of cigarette, liquor and other consumer brands fit Mr. Kelly's expansion strategy. 
West Point-Pepperell Inc., West Point, Ga., posted a 4.7% rise in fiscal first-quarter profit from continuing operations.A 21% to 24% jump in sales of textiles wasn't matched by the company's apparel lines. 
B.A.T, a tobacco, retailing and financial services company with interests ranging from Kool cigarettes to Saks Fifth Avenue department stores, said it targeted Farmers last summer as a vehicle for its long-expected expansion into the U.S. financial services industry.In recent years, B.A.T has been diversifying into faster-growing businesses such as insurance and mortgage lending and away from its slower-growing tobacco lines. 
Revenue rose 16% to $20.7 million from $17.8 million.The San Diego-based distributor of women's sportswear said the loss resulted from losses of $580,000 from the sale of marketable securities following Black Monday, as well as development costs for new private-label lines. 
But billings for that account are understood to be smaller than those originally projected for the Revlon account.Separately, advertising agency executives confirmed that Hill, Holiday, Connors, Cosmopulos Inc. has been selected to develop advertising for Revlon's new Clean & Clear haircare products line. 
Godfather's has introduced a less expensive, thin-crusted pie used in its two-for-one specials.It developed the economy line because "we didn't want to cannibalize our premium-product sales," Mr. Henderson says. 
Burnt by early-1980s problems of excess capacity, a stagnant market and poor profit margins, chemical manufacturers shed plants and products drastically until about two years ago, when the restructuring began to show modest profits.Now companies have entered a holding pattern -- cautiously finding ways to increase output with minor adjustments, expanding specialty lines where they have little competition, and beginning to diversify into related products. 
Minstar said it will concentrate on boat manufacturing through its 82% ownership of Genmar Industries Inc.Minstar's sports lines include Ben Hogan golf clubs, Head tennis and ski equipment, and swimming gear. 
Whirlpool Corp. said it will discontinue its Whirlpool brand line of floor-care products by the second quarter of 1988. 
Whirlpool Corp. said it will discontinue its Whirlpool brand line of floor-care products by the second quarter of 1988.The Benton Harbor, Mich.-based maker of major home appliances said although the floor-care business is still attractive, the "premium niche" that its brand line targets has become increasingly competitive and less profitable since its entry into the market in 1985. 
Maytag acquired the plant in 1986 at the time of its acquisition of Magic Chef Co., Admiral's former parent.Maytag said the first phase of the Galesburg project, begun last year, is scheduled for completion next year and will enable it to produce its first line of refrigerators and freezers bearing the Maytag name. 
"Two or three years ago, that was unheard of."He said the decline also is due in part to fiercer competition from other Japanese and Korean auto makers that introduced new car lines in 1987. 
Bayer also declines comment.ICI, which has the Stuart line, including Mylanta, says it "wouldn't foreclose on any interest in expanding its pharmaceutical group." 
In 1985, the company shed a number of its non-food businesses.It spun off its toy businesses to create Kenner Parker Toys Inc. and its Izod and Ship 'n Shore fashion lines and Monet jewelry unit into Crystal Brands Inc. 
The division makes computer storage tapes for commercial customers.The company said the planned sale will permit it to concentrate on its more lucrative military lines of computer products. 
"But ours were up 50% in December over last year, and we think after-Christmas sales look strong too."Helen of Troy's chief business stems from being North American licensee for the Vidal Sassoon trademark on its line of appliances and accessories. 
Analysts have speculated that Bell & Howell might sell its mail-handling equipment business or its international operations after the merger is finalized.A spokesman for Bell & Howell, a publishing and information services company based in Skokie, Ill., wouldn't say which lines might be sold. 
National Medical, a closely held concern, provides kidney dialysis products and services.Grace said it raised its stake as part of a strategy to build a medical technology business within Grace to complement certain existing specialty-chemical lines. 
American Home, which is much larger than Robins, would probably have absorbed Robins completely, according to analysts.Rorer said in its most recent bid last week that it would sell Robins's prized consumer drug lines after a merger. 
NCR Corp. unveiled two models of its Tower line of midrange computers and introduced advanced networking software to allow the Tower family to operate as a central hub in a network of computers. 
Mr. Achenbaum has counted among his clients some of the most visible blue-chip advertisers in the country, including Nissan, Toyota, Seagram and Backer Spielvogel clients Hyundai and J.P. Morgan.At Backer Spielvogel, he will work with clients and potential clients on marketing strategies; aside from agency compensation issues, he helped Nissan, for example, come up with its positioning and pricing for its new Infiniti line. 
In Detroit, a Chrysler Corp. official said the company currently has no rear-seat lap and shoulder belts in its light trucks, but plans to begin phasing them in by the end of the 1990 model year.He said Chrysler fully expects to have them installed across its light-truck line by the Sept. 1, 1991, deadline. 
The additional technology, personnel training and promotional effort can be expensive.Chemical Bank spent more than $50 million to introduce its ChemPlus line, several packages aimed at different segments, in 1986, according to Thomas Jacob, senior vice president of marketing. 
Reed International PLC said that net income for the six months ended Oct. 1 slipped 5% to #89.7 million ($141.9 million), or 16 pence a share, from #94.8 million ($149.9 million), or 17.3 pence a share.The British paper, packaging and publishing concern, said profit from continuing lines fell 10% to #118 million from #130.6 million. 
Dell Computer Corp. said it cut prices on several of its personal computer lines by 5% to 17%. 
"It's quite a bombshell," said one, adding that the offer could spark a period of industry consolidation.The two companies would appear to be a logical fit because of their complementary lines, and analysts described the offer, representing a 36% premium over Nekoosa's market price, as fair. 
In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Aetna closed at $60, down 50 cents.In the latest quarter, Aetna had a $23 million loss on its auto/homeowners line, compared with earnings of $33 million last year. 
Ultimate expects the 3 1/2-year agreement to generate $100 million in sales, but it wouldn't estimate profit.Under terms of the pact, Ultimate, a computer-systems concern, will market the full line of HP 9000 series 800 multipleuser minicomputers. 
Milton Roy recently fended off unsolicited overtures from Thermo Electron Corp., a Waltham, Mass., maker of biomedical products.Milton Roy disclosed in May that it was approached for a possible acquisition by Thermo Electron, which agreed to purchase Milton Roy's liquid-chromatography line for $22 million in February. 
Then Procter & Gamble Co. agreed to buy Noxell Corp. for $1.3 billion.That acquisition, to be completed by year end, will include the Cover Girl and Clarion makeup lines, making P&G the top marketer of cosmetics in mass-market outlets. 
As the trend continues, demand for mass-market items that are high quality but only mid-priced -- particularly skin-care products -- is expected to increase.This fall, for example, L'Oreal Group, ordinarily a high-end line, rolled out a drug-store line of skin-care products called Plenitude, which retail for $5 to $15. 
Accessories not only sell faster than whole bikes, they also offer profit margins nearly double the 25% to 30% or so on sales of complete cycles.To get a piece of the business, Nike Inc., Beaverton, Ore., introduced a line of mountain-bike shoes. 
General Motors Corp.'s Chevrolet division said it is offering $750 cash incentives on all 1990 models of its full-size Blazer and Suburban truck lines. 
Margeotes, whose clients include Godiva and Maccabee beer, has had a string of new business wins.It recently picked up the ad accounts for Haagen-Dazs, Newsday and for a number of jewelry lines from Crystal Brands. 
Sales rose 8% to $785.1 million from $725.6 million.Avon said sales in the direct-selling division dropped 2% as sales of new products, especially gift and jewelry lines, were below expectations. 
"It's the fourth quarter and what might linger beyond that."Last month, Avon executives indicated that the company would experience a $75 million to $90 million revenue shortage due to weakness in its gift and decorative lines. 
Kellogg's current share is believed to be slightly under 40% while General Mills' share is about 27%.Led by its oat-based Cheerios line, General Mills has gained an estimated 2% share so far this year, mostly at the expense of Kellogg. 
Kellogg is so anxious to turn around Corn Flakes sales that it soon will begin selling boxes for as little as 99 cents, trade sources say."Cheerios and Honey Nut Cheerios have eaten away sales normally going to Kellogg's corn-based lines simply because they are made of oats," says Merrill Lynch food analyst William Maguire. 
Bausch & Lomb Inc. said it plans to introduce next year a new line of sunglasses containing melanin, the pigment that protects against damage from ultraviolet rays. 
Cray Research Inc. forecast that 1990 will be a no-growth year for its supercomputer line. 
Adolph Coors Co. said its Coors Brewing Co. unit will test market a new line of bottled water in the West beginning early next year. 
Honda says the five-cylinder engine provides a compromise between the fuel-economy of a four-cylinder, and the power of a V-6.It is rumored to be bound for a new model in the luxury Acura line in the U.S., but Honda officials wouldn't comment. 
But those dollars at risk pale in comparison to the investment required to make and ship spring goods to Campeau stores."The few million dollars I could lose today is nothing against what I could lose on the spring line," says Mr. Levy, who estimates that Campeau stores will sell $25 million worth of his clothes this year. 
The hottest rivalry in the computer industry intensified sharply yesterday as Digital Equipment Corp. announced its first line of mainframe computers, targeting International Business Machines Corp.'s largest market. 
The hottest rivalry in the computer industry intensified sharply yesterday as Digital Equipment Corp. announced its first line of mainframe computers, targeting International Business Machines Corp.'s largest market.IBM fired back with new mainframes of its own, extending the long-dominant 3090 line with a 7% to 14% power boost. 
In addition to commercial markets, Digital's new line targets the low end of the engineering and scientific supercomputer market, when it's packaged with an optional supercharger, known as a vector processor.Digital's push into mainframes comes at a time when its mainstay minicomputer line is under growing pressure from smaller personal computers and workstations that operate on standard operating systems rather than on the proprietary systems that older minicomputers use. 
"We have a good strong backlog for the fourth quarter even without" the systems that were announced yesterday.But the 3090 line is nearly five years old -- which is getting up there in mainframe years -- and its growth is expected to slow in 1990. 
Barry Bryant, an analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., said Tandy also has suffered from lethargic sales of its computers aimed at the home and small-office market, which are less-advanced and cheaper than computers aimed at the corporate market.Tandy has added several new products to that line, including a laptop computer priced around $1,000, and is focusing its advertising on the easy-to-use software that is packaged with its machines. 
He says it's important for a new make to be as distinctive as possible while still retaining links to the parent company's quality image.He applauds Toyota and Nissan Motor Co. for creating separate divisions for their new luxury models, rather than simply adding more nameplates to their standard car lines. 
As a senior vice president, he has headed the company's designer lingerie division, Oscar de la Renta, since its inception in 1988.To maintain exclusivity of that designer line, it isn't labeled with the Maidenform name. 
GM's interest in Jaguar reflects a desire to help diversify the U.S. company's products in the growing luxury-car segment of the market.Its Opel line has a solid image and a recent string of highly successful new models, but it lacks Jaguar's cachet. 
Winnebago was hit especially hard in the latest downturn because unit sales in its bread-and-butter motor home business tumbled 25% industrywide in August, and 10.4% in the first eight months of the year.The company said it also suffered in the quarter from incentive programs, losses from discontinuing a motor home line and costs of developing a new commercial vehicle, among other things. 
MCA Inc. said its toy-making unit agreed to buy Buddy L Corp., producer of a line of toy vehicles and preschool products. 
Designer Sandra Garratt filed for Chapter 7 Bankruptcy Code protection, saying that her cash flow had been cut off.The designer, whose line of modular, one-size-fits-all clothing has spawned a host of clones, has been in a dispute with her latest licensee, Jerell Inc. for several months. 
The designer's attorney, Molly Bartholow, said that Ms. Garratt was forced to start bankruptcy-law proceedings because Jerell began withholding her royalty payments last month.Jerell paid Ms. Garratt royalties for the line known as Multiples by Sandra Garratt, which are sold primarily through department stores.Ms. Garratt sued the Dallas apparel maker earlier this year, charging that Jerell developed and marketed clothing lines fashioned after her designs, in violation of their contract. 
When fully operational, the Guadalajara factory will employ about 1,500 workers and have annual operating expenses of $5 million to $6 million.An AT&T representative said that the Guadalajara factory will make a full line of answering machines. 
Kurzweil, Waltham, Mass., makes digital electronic keyboard instruments used by professional recording musicians.It recently introduced a line for the home market. 
He said the toy company's "prospects for a strong fourth quarter" are also good.Mattel attributed the jump in quarter net to strong world-wide sales of its Barbie doll, Hot Wheels cars, Disney toys and other well-known toy lines. 
"They've got a lot of different balls in the air at the same time," observes Jim Poyner, a computer securities analyst with Dallas-based William K. Woodruff & Co. Mr. Dell, meanwhile, concedes the company was "definitely too optimistic" in its expectations.Product delays, however, have left Dell buffeted by harsher competition in its bread-and-butter line of desktop computers, as powerhouse competitors Compaq Computer Corp. and International Business Machines Corp. price their PCs more aggressively. 
Sluggish sales of the Beretta and Corsica spurred GM to offer $800 rebates on those cars.The Corsica and Beretta make up the highest-volume car line at Chevrolet, but sales of the cars are off 9.6% for the year, and fell a steep 34.2% early this month. 
He blames imports.But just down Seventh Avenue, where about 75% of U.S. fur garments are made, Larry Rosen has acquired two retail outlets, broadened his fur-making line and expanded into leather. 
Inspired by imports, Mr. Rosen now makes fur muffs, hats and flings.This year he produced a men's line and offers dyed furs in red, cherry red, violet, royal blue and forest green. 
"It's the missing link" in Olivetti's product line between small personal computers and higher-priced minicomputers, the Olivetti spokesman said.He added that Olivetti will continue making its LSX minicomputer line. 
A spokesman also said margins for the company's service business narrowed somewhat because of heavy investments made in that sector.The lack of a strong product at the high end of Digital's line was a significant drag on sales. 
He added gross margins and operating profit "eroded quite dramatically" from the prior quarter, along with sales of existing software product lines like Multimate and Framework."The success of a new product in the database line is needed. 
General Motors Corp.'s Chevrolet division, reacting to slow sales, said it will offer $800 rebates on its 1990 Beretta, the two-door version of its core compact-car line. 
Sluggish sales of the Beretta, and its four-door sister car, the Corsica, prompted GM to idle the two plants that build the automobiles for a total of three weeks this month.The Corsica and Beretta make up the highest-volume car line at Chevrolet, but sales of the vehicles are off 9.6% for the year, and fell a steep 34% during early October. 
New customers, the source of higher commissions for salespeople and the key to Wang's long-term viability, are even tougher.Rick Lynch, a former top salesman in Wang's Boston office, referring to Wang's mainstay computer line, says: "You can't sell a VS to a new customer." 
Renault and DAF Trucks NV announced a preliminary agreement to jointly manufacture a line of trucks in Britain and France. 
Digital Equipment Corp. is planning a big coming-out party on Tuesday for its first line of mainframe computers. 
The heightened competition will hit IBM at a difficult time.The computer giant's current mainframe line, which has sold well and has huge profit margins, is starting to show its age. 
Amdahl Corp., backed by Japan's Fujitsu Ltd., has a growing share of the market with its low-priced, IBM-compatible machines.And National Advanced Systems, a joint venture of Japan's Hitachi Ltd. and General Motors Corp.'s Electronic Data Systems, is expected to unveil a line of powerful IBM-compatible mainframes later this year. 
Aimed at commercial photographers, the film can be used in very low light without sacrificing quality, says Donald Franz of Photofinishing Newsletter.Also trying to snare a portion of the $2 billion-a-year industry is Agfa Corp., a unit of Bayer AG. Agfa recently signed Olympic gold medalist Florence Griffith-Joyner to endorse a new line of black-and-white paper that's geared to consumers and will compete directly with Kodak's papers. 
Automatic call processors will provide that system for virtually any telephone, Mr. Pierce said, not just phones produced by Elcotel.The company will also be producing a new line of convenience telephones, which don't accept coins, for use in hotel lobbies, office lobbies, hospitality lounges and similar settings. 
Maxtor said its results were boosted by $2 million in payments received from a supplier, for a certain line of products that Maxtor isn't going to sell anymore.Maxtor said effects from discontinuing the line may have a positive effect on future earnings and revenue. 
 NEW ACCOUNT: Procter & Gamble Co., Cincinnati, awarded the ad accounts for its line of Professional Crisco vegetable shortening and oil products to Northlich, Stolley, LaWarre, Cincinnati. 
Sony Corp. won a pretrial order blocking U.S. sales of Justin Products Inc.'s "My Own" line of portable audio players for children. 
Sony Corp. won a pretrial order blocking U.S. sales of Justin Products Inc.'s "My Own" line of portable audio players for children.Judge John E. Sprizzo issued the order in Manhattan federal court, where Sony has accused the tiny company of illegally knocking off the "My First Sony" line. 
The disk drives will doubtless sell well when they finally become available.But the AS/400, IBM's highly successful minicomputer line, is losing its momentum, and some analysts said sales could even decline in the fourth quarter. 
The latest evidence of that is the decision to idle the Fairfax, Kan., plant that makes the Grand Prix less than three weeks into the new model year.The Grand Prix is one of GM's newest lines of cars, the so-called GM-10 midsized cars. 
In the year-earlier period, Hasbro earned $18.1 million, or 31 cents a share, on $368.4 million in revenue.The Pawtucket, R.I., manufacturer is counting on Record Breakers, a new line of high-performance model race cars now being rushed to market. 
Mattel Inc., based in Hawthorne, Calif., is expected to report more bullish numbers than it did a year ago.Helped by booming sales in its Barbie doll line, Hot Wheels racing cars and Disney toys for preschoolers, Mattel's per-share earnings should jump by better than 50% to about 70 cents, estimates Mr. McGowan. 
At Pittsburgh's ASP Inc., which introduced its first anti-virus software in 1985, "We shipped out 80 copies (at $35 each) last week," says founder Fred Cohen, who presented the first computer virus to the research community in 1983.After adding Certus, a $189 anti-virus computer program, to its line of systems management software in early 1988, Foundation Ware Inc., Cleveland, has quadrupled sales every quarter, says founder Peter Tippett. 
Others undoubtedly will follow, but most analysts believe Compaq has at least a six-month lead on the competition.Toshiba's line of portables, for example, features the T-1000, which is in the same weight class but is much slower and has less memory, and the T-1600, which also uses a 286 microprocessor, but which weighs almost twice as much and is three times the size. 
Replied a Justin salesman: "Exactly."The Justin merchandise carried wholesale prices some 40% below those of Sony Corp. of Japan's "My First Sony" line. 
Now Sony, whose innovative, premium-priced products are among the most admired in consumer electronics, is bitterly complaining about a little U.S. firm with a cheap look-alike produced in China."The gist of this is that Justin knocked off the Sony line and Sony wants to stop it," says Lewis H. Eslinger, Sony's attorney, who previously guarded Rubik's Cube. (Sony itself declines to comment.) If Sony wins, Mr. Eslinger says, its little rival will have to try to sell the products overseas. 
Mr. Kaye denies the suit's charges and says his only mistake was taking on Sony in the marketplace."I made a similar line and I produced it cheaper," he says. 
The company has grown -- to about 40 employees, from four initially, Mr. Kaye says.Justin has been profitable since 1986, adds the official, who shares his office with numerous teddy bears, all samples from his line of plush toys. 
Justin has been profitable since 1986, adds the official, who shares his office with numerous teddy bears, all samples from his line of plush toys.Like many others, Mr. Kaye took notice in 1987 when Sony, in a classic example of market segmentation, changed the plastic skin and buttons on the famous Walkman line of portable audio equipment and created the My First Sony line for children.The brightly colored new products looked more like toys than the adult models. (In court papers, Sony says it has spent more than $3 million to promote the line, with resulting sales of over a million units.) 
But Intel later succumbed to the stock market's plunge, closing at $31.75, down $2.125.In August, Intel warned that third-quarter earnings might be "flat to down" from the previous period's because of slowing sales growth of its 80386 microprocessor, start-up costs associated with a line of computers and costs of preparing for mass shipments of the company's new 80486 chip in the current quarter. 
International Paper Co.'s third-quarter net income rose 6.5%, reflecting "solid performances" by pulp and paper businesses and contributions from specialty lines and acquisitions. 
Bull HN, 69%-owned by Groupe Bull, the big French computer maker, said the new product lines included the DPX/2, based on the industry standard Unix operating system, and the DPS 6000, based on a proprietary design.The 6000 significantly extends Bull's existing DPS line, which has sold 60,000 units world-wide. 
He fills one of two vacancies created last year when two of the company's co-founders, Thomas Ong, executive vice president, finance, and Mason Tarkeshian, executive vice president, operations, resigned.CMS makes and distributes a broad line of enhancement products for personal computers. 
Xylogics Inc., Burlington, Mass., said it reached an agreement under which Unisys Corp. will buy as much as $50 million of its computer systems over the next five years.Xylogics said Unisys will be buying its new Annex II terminal servers, a line it acquired from Encore Computer Corp. last December. 
The FiberWorld products are based on a new set of international standards for fiber-optic telecommunications equipment put in place last year.Northern Telecom is the first company to launch a complete line of switching and transmission products based on the new standards, known as synchronous optical networking, or Sonet. 
Northern Telecom says its products will roll out over 18 months beginning early next year and will begin contributing to revenue and earnings by early 1991.Burt Wolder, a spokesman for American Telephone & Telegraph Co., said his company is "developing a full line of Sonet products and expects to announce them very, very soon." 
Renault lacks an up-market label and an international presence.Volvo lacks a full line of auto products and a significant presence in the EC. 
With the industry on the brink of sweeping change, Volvo may be feeling vulnerable and ready to seek a partner to share product-development costs and make it more of an an EC insider."A Volvo-Renault combination would create a full line of auto products under one umbrella with total production of about two million units a year, or about 20% of the European market, analysts say. 
Nevertheless, WCRS might consider BDDP as a backup if its talks with Eurocom fall through, some industry executives suggested.WCRS initially announced last month that it was in talks to sell a portion of its ad business; it hopes to largely remove itself from the agency business in order to concentrate on its more profitable line, media-buying. 
General Housewares Corp. agreed to sell most of its Leyse cookware line and a related manufacturing plant in Wisconsin to Vollrath Co., Sheboygan, Wis. 
And Japan's big Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank recently agreed to invest as much as $100 million into a Clayton & Dubilier buy-out fund.Martin H. Dubilier, chairman and chief executive officer, said he values the new subsidiary and its Big A line of auto parts because of its wide distribution network. 
Now, encouraged by some recent growth, the toiletries companies are polishing their marketing strategies, and the business is beginning to show signs of life.Even Gillette Co., which has traditionally concentrated on mainstream products, says it's planning a "more upscale" line of men's toiletries, probably for sale through its traditional outlets, such as drugstores. 
It's a lesson that hasn't escaped Gruene's well-heeled competition.Aramis, which rolled out its Lab Series line of unscented men's grooming products three years ago, focuses on skin problems caused by shaving, such as razor burn. 
But mention the word wrinkles and they're likely to flee.To ease customers' embarrassment, companies are beginning to establish separate locations for their men's lines. 
In its five-year effort, Hershey has learned that transforming a traditional dish like pasta isn't easy.The company's experiences in developing its Perfection line illustrate the difficulties inherent in creating a new food item. 
Last year, Chrysler put about 60% of that budget into TV, and about 40% in magazines and newspapers.Major auto makers, both domestic and foreign, have usually supported their automobile lines with massive advertising budgets placed largely in television.The shift by Chrysler represents the largest proportion of an ad budget dedicated to print by a car line of a major U.S. auto manufacturer in at least two decades, according to Jim Guthrie, executive vice president of marketing development for the Magazine Publishers of America, an industry group. 
Auto makers are the largest category of advertisers in magazines, spending $800 million in 1988, an increase of 17% from 1987.The shift in spending is part of a stepped-up campaign by Chrysler to promote its high-end Chrysler brand, which includes the Imperial, New Yorker, Salon, LeBaron, and Town & Country lines. 
Nissan executives will unveil their spending plans for the 1990 model year at a car dealers show later this month.However, it's clear Nissan is using magazines heavily, as well as TV, to introduce its new Infiniti line of luxury cars. 
Other auto makers have showed a decided preference for TV.For example, Mr. Vitulli said Chrysler Corp.'s lower-priced Plymouth auto line will spend 10% of it media budget on print and 90% on broadcast TV and cable. 
"We are looking to target niches -- young women, older people and others," he said."We'll use core publications for the entire brand, along with magazines meant for specific lines." 
Now the battle is heading in the opposite direction.Bayerische Motoren Werke AG yesterday said it's freezing or cutting prices on its entire U.S. 1990 model line. 
It also froze the price of the 190E 2.6 with automatic transmission at $32,500, despite adding electrically adjustable front seats, which were a $950 option on the 1989 model.Prices on the remainder of Mercedes-Benz's U.S. line now will range from $39,950 for the 300E 2.6 with automatic transmission to $83,500 for the 500SL two-seat convertible, which is new this year. 
But previously, it had emphasized that it wouldn't need to sell them.Mr. Boksen says he expects to see more asset sales-of HBJ's insurance unit and perhaps of some of its publishing lines -- even if publishing rebounds. 
Still, Unisys has dug itself a deep hole and will have to work hard merely to regain its position of a year ago.Despite pent-up demand for a new line of mainframes, it has generally been losing ground in the mainframe and minicomputer markets. 
International Business Machines Corp. said it is offering a holiday promotion involving personal computers at the low end and in the middle of its PS/2 line. 
But while businessmen generally welcome this year's unexpected economic surge, they recognize that the underground economy is a double-edged sword.Executives of the food unit of giant Grupo Alfa are elated about this year's 100% sales increase in the company's most inexpensive line of cold meats, whose biggest buyers are underground mom-and-pop stores. 
Terms of the agreement weren't disclosed.The licensees are Modern Shirt International and Modern Shirt Industries Ltd. and KangaROOS U.S.A. Inc. Jeep officials said the shirt companies will produce and distribute a line of Jeep sportswear to be retailed through department stores, while KangaROOS will produce and distribute Jeep athletic and casual shoes that will be sold through independent shoe stores. 
Although IBM is expected to introduce slightly faster versions of its mainframes this year, the machines will be five years old next year -- long in the tooth by mainframe standards -- and competitors are expected to bring out new products.IBM's AS/400 line, which has done spectacularly well in the first 15 months of its life, is seeing growth slow. 
The IBM spokesman confirmed that IBM had made the retirement offer to many of the 23,000 employees at four manufacturing sites.They are in Manassas, Va., and Owego, N.Y., where IBM makes specialized equipment for defense contracts; in Endicott, N.Y., where it makes the 9370 minicomputer line; and in Lexington, Ky., where it produces typewriters and printers. 
And that should be much less of a problem next year when the comparisons become easier.But IBM also cited a delay in the introduction of a new line of high-end disk drives, the latest in a series of manufacturing and development glitches this year that analysts have said could be linked to the loss of skilled employees in these early-retirement programs. 
The car isn't all-American, however: Mazda, of which Ford owns 25%, did much of the engineering on the vehicle.The most widely publicized luxury cars of the new model year are clearly Nissan's Infiniti line, which goes on sale Nov. 8, and Toyota's Lexus cars, which have been available since August. 
 Four-Wheel Drive Mercedes-Benz adds four-wheel-drive cars to its U.S. line for the first time with the 300E 4Matic sedan and 300TE 4Matic station wagon. 
The layoffs come as Cray phases out production of its labor-intensive X-MP line-hand-wired machines -- in favor of a model that, because of factory automation, higher-density chips and other advances, can be made in one-third the time.Moreover, where a central processing unit in the old model had 30,000 parts, those in the new Y-MP line have 310. 
A Sears spokesman declined to comment.Vermont is a major supplier of parts for Sears's line of tools. 
Dan Benton, an analyst at Goldman, Sachs & Co., said he expected to cut his estimates to $9 a share for the year, well below the IBM range.The wild card in all this is the disk-drive line, whose problems could be cleared up soon or could persist for months. 
IBM, which gets some $6 billion of its $60 billion of revenue from such drives, is expected to decide soon on how to proceed.IBM needs to get the drives out soon because competitors have caught up with IBM's current line, and IBM must once again leapfrog them if it is to escape the price war that has developed. 
Europa Eyewear Corp. sells 22-karat gold frames for around $250, "good for clinching that Wall Street deal."Customers want "different glasses for boating than for skiing," says a marketer for Allegra Inc.'s Ziari line of sunglasses. 
In addition, the company said its sales and service personnel will target new markets for the system.Debugging the software for the two-year old I/A series was "far more complex than . . . with our earlier lines," but "is now in place and functioning." 
But he said he interceded with Japanese ministries and won "a liberal interpretation of the rules."Mr. Butler said he agreed to the purchase because it would give AVX access to a broad line of parts that it could sell in Europe, where AVX currently generates 25% of its $408 million of annual sales.Mr. Butler also cited Kyocera's technology; while AVX and Kyocera both make capacitors, Kyocera also makes a broad line of electronics, including printer heads, liquid crystal displays and personal computers. 
The quarterly earnings were better than the $1.15 a share that Mr. Berko had projected, and the analyst said he is now likely to increase his full-year earnings estimate of $3.20 a share.In addition to several positive devlopments at the company in recent weeks, including an agreement with singer Michael Jackson to design and market a line of fashion sneakers and other apparel, analysts have attributed at least a part of the recent stock increases to arbitragers covering their short positions. 
Mr. Urbanski believes Michelin will use its own name as well as the Goodrich T/A brand, popular among sporty car enthusiasts, to try to increase market share at Chrysler.The Goodrich T/A line is already original equipment on some Chrysler Jeep products. 
The fund closed at 16 1/4 on 1.2 million shares.International Business Machines, which introduced three new computer models for small businesses and a number of enhancements to its personal-computer line, added 1 1/4 to 117 1/2. 
Toyota Motor Corp., in an aggressive bid to boost U.S. market share, is raising 1990 base prices on its most popular car lines by 2.5% or less from 1989 levels. 
Executives here also said that AT&T is considering manufacturing its own facsimile machines and could someday make its own personal computers.AT&T recently agreed to have a new line of personal computers made by Intel Corp. 
Earlier this spring, the company launched cholesterol-free mayonnaise and Miracle Whip.Last week, it introduced Sealtest Free, which it bills as the first national brand of "nonfat" ice cream and began testing a line of fat-free salad dressings. 
---Toyota is raising prices on its most popular car lines for 1990 by 2.5% or less in an aggressive attempt to increase its U.S. market share. --- 
General Motors Corp.'s Pontiac division said it plans to boost its total vehicle sales by about 6% in the 1990 model year, mainly because of sales of a new plastic-bodied minivan.But Pontiac officials also conceded that they expect sales of their primary midsized car line, the Pontiac Grand Prix, won't be enough to assure that the GM plant exclusively dedicated to the model will work at full capacity in the 1990 model year. 
But Pontiac officials also conceded that they expect sales of their primary midsized car line, the Pontiac Grand Prix, won't be enough to assure that the GM plant exclusively dedicated to the model will work at full capacity in the 1990 model year.Pontiac's modest expectations for the Grand Prix, one of four lines GM designed as part of its $5 billion GM-10 midsized car program, is another sign that despite the recent announcement that the company will indefinitely idle a plant in Lakewood, Ga., GM has a long way to go to solve its costly overcapacity problem. 
Sales of the two-year-old Grand Prix coupe, however, will fall to 105,000 vehicles in 1990 from about 118,000 cars in the 1989 model year that ends Sept. 30, Pontiac officials predicted.But the modern Fairfax, Kan., plant that builds the Grand Prix line is capable of producing more than 250,000 cars a year. 
International Business Machines Corp. said it has asked computer-accessory makers to produce adaptor cards for its PS/2 line of computers that will enable them to transfer data two to four times faster than they currently do. 
International Business Machines Corp. said it has asked computer-accessory makers to produce adaptor cards for its PS/2 line of computers that will enable them to transfer data two to four times faster than they currently do.IBM said the cards will unlock capabilities already built into its PS/2 line, which features the so-called Micro Channel data pathway. 
It was the agency's first U.S. client.Its Cover Girl line, which Lintas suggested and helped develop, is now the largest-selling cosmetics line in the country. 
If Procter must choose another agency for Noxell -- either because it pulls the account or Unilever pressures Lintas into resigning the account -- it will find its choice extremely limited, as most major agencies not working for Procter are working for its competitors.Noxell uses a second major agency, Chicago-based Leo Burnett, for its Clarion line; Burnett is already a Procter agency and could be considered for future assignments. 
Noxell uses a second major agency, Chicago-based Leo Burnett, for its Clarion line; Burnett is already a Procter agency and could be considered for future assignments.Meanwhile, industry executives already have begun speculating that Lintas might take on another cosmetics line, such as Maybelline, a unit of Schering-Plough. 
Last fall, the cosmetics maker launched a marketing initiative dubbed "The Nines," designed to boost its visibility in tony department stores.Over the years, Revlon had acquired prestige cosmetics lines such as Charles of the Ritz and Princess Marcella Borghese, but had no comprehensive marketing strategy for them.Under the Nines program, the company gathered all nine of its upscale cosmetics lines -- encompassing some 3,000 items -- at a single cosmetics counter with a special Nines banner. 
Competitors say Revlon's sales staff was unable to master the vast array of products they were expected to push.And the attempt to sell customers more than one cosmetics line per visit undermined efforts to build brand loyalty."Consumers buy different pieces from different lines," said a marketing executive at one competitor. 
Adding to Revlon's difficulties, the company claims that 200 retailers nationwide grew impatient with the pace of the rollout and implemented their own version of the Nines.These independent-minded retailers lumped together all of Revlon's lines, without waiting for marketing support from headquarters or proper training for their sales help. 
Sales rose 27% to $199 million from $157.2 million.The company said its Salon Selectives line was one of the fastest growing brands in the industry in the quarter. 
N.V. Philips and its partners have granted a Japanese firm exclusive rights to promote and market equipment for suppliers of a new line of prerecorded audio/visual compact-disk products in Asia. 
Joseph Kozloff, an analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert, lowered his estimate to $8.30 a share from $8.50, but left 1991 at $9.75.Along with Noxema and Cover Girl, Noxell gives P&G the line of Clarion cosmetics, Lestoil cleaner and Wick Fowler Two Alarm Chili, a seasoning for chili. 
Union Carbide Corp. said it is expanding its line of substitutes for chlorofluorocarbons used in making foam cushioning. 
But this is its first venture into the $1.5 billion mass market cosmetic business.Noxell's Cover Girl and Clarion lines have a combined 25.4% share, followed by Maybelline, with 17.7% and Revlon, with 13.9%. 
Yesterday, IBM stock rose 12.5 cents to close at $116.125 a share, while Baxter International common closed unchanged at $22.25, both in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.Separately, IBM announced that it had authorized the opening of 41 new dealerships that will sell its PS/2 personal computer line, marking the end of a moratorium it declared four years ago. 
-- Set up a fur-production factory as early as next year.-- Diversify into other lines of Soviet business, including trading in textiles, syringes and condoms. 
Heredity, junk food and a couch-potato environment have combined to produce a generation of overweight youth.But At Last's partners think the numbers still aren't large enough to persuade traditional apparel firms to create a line of oversize clothes stocked in department stores and specialty outlets. 
Buoyed by a $16,000 investment from Ms. Runyon's husband, they measured dozens of overweight children, inquired about likes and dislikes, and produced their own sizing scheme, which ranges from 23-inch to 50-inch waists and weights from 55 pounds to 300 pounds.The entrepreneurs became convinced they were on the right track at an August 1986 display in a church basement: 70 parents of overweight children showed up to view At Last's line, which consisted of some fabric swatches stuck on a bulletin board and a handful of trouser samples. 
"It's something you should in good conscience do," he added.GM already has made front-seat headrests or high-backed seats standard equipment on eight of its 12 truck lines. 
The greeting card company attributed its improved performance to last year's cost-savings measures, including the sale or closing of several subsidiaries.The company also said its "Couples" card line, introduced in July, had brisk sales. 
At the office-furniture factory, an automated assembly line dunks desklegs into an electroplating bath.At the fashion warehouse, a manager checks designs for the kibbutz-made line of women's apparel. 
The 1990 Accord LX will start at $14,895, up 5% from the year-earlier price of $14,180.At the top of the Accord line, Honda essentially consolidated two models into one. 
In 1985, P&G posted its first annual earnings decline since 1952 -- a 29% drop to $635 million.Mainstay lines, such as toothpaste and diapers, were getting hammered by the competition: Crest's market share alone fell to 30.5% in 1985 from 40% in 1977; Pampers' share dropped around 40 points to 33% over roughly the same time. 
Yet, in the intervening years, P&G has boldly changed how and where it does business.Determined to take advantage of growing markets overseas, the company turned around its early debacle in Japan, where its diaper and detergent lines in particular were faltering. 
P&G sued the cookie makers for patent infringement and recently won a $125 million settlement from Nabisco, Keebler and Frito-Lay.But while copycat competitors certainly hurt, Mr. Tucker, the former P&G manager, also says the company was too slow developing a full line of cookies, with a variety of flavors. 
"If the disappointment is deep enough another hostile offer may be . . . forthcoming."Mr. Preston, responding to this criticism, said through a spokesman, "There was no way in May to forecast that the gift and jewelry lines would underperform in the fourth quarter. 
That's particularly startling when one considers that most cooks were willing to devote 30 minutes to meal preparation a scant 10 years ago and about an hour in the early '70s.Accordingly, Campbell Soup is testing a microwave soup line for all the people who find it too taxing to open a can and pour the contents into a pot. 
The Japanese threat to the Europeans is only getting worse.Last month Toyota Motor Corp. launched its luxury Lexus line in the U.S., and in November Nissan Motor Co. is unveiling its Infiniti models. 
The worst gas guzzler in the EPA's annual rating isn't for sale in the U.S. -- Chrysler Italian Imports' two-seat Italian-made Lamborghini Countach.A 1990 model of the $155,000 sports car was tested by the EPA and got 6 mpg in city driving and 10 mpg on the highway, but the manufacturer says a replacement line will be introduced in the U.S. this year. 
The Hawthorne, Calif., toy maker's sales for the quarter ended July 1 were $272.3 million, up 31% from last year's $207.1 million.John W. Amerman, chairman and chief executive officer, said retail and consumer demand has remained "very strong" for its core brands as well as a line of licensed Disney infant and preschool toys. 
---Boeing's profit jumped 20% in the quarter, but the aircraft maker said it still faces major challenges and risks in commercial and military lines. 
Despite the stock market's negative expectations, it appears that different segments of the personal-computer industry are experiencing sharply different growth trends.Generally, demand is strong for high-performance hardware, such as Apple's Macintosh, Compaq's 386 machines and International Business Machines Corp.'s PS/2 lines of computers. 
The unit, based in Fort Washington, Pa., has three manufacturing plants and about 1,100 employees.Ralston, based in St. Louis, said BeechNut fits into its array of other food lines, including such cereals for children as Cookie Crisp. 
PepsiCo Wines & Spirits International said it plans to introduce Priviet, a premium vodka from Russia, in the U.S. in October.Priviet, whose ad pitch will be "Serious vodka you don't have to take too seriously," will be priced around $10 a bottle, compared with the $13 generally charged for PepsiCo's Stolichnaya line of Russian vodkas. 
The company announced that R.K. Patel, one of Par's founders, took a voluntary leave of absence as senior vice president and director, and that Jeffrey M. Levine, executive vice president, and Barry S. Geller, vice president, regulatory affairs, took voluntary leaves of absence from the board.Par, which had fiscal 1988 sales of $99.6 million from a line of several hundred products, said it didn't believe there were any adverse health or safety implications involved. 
Pier 1 Imports Inc., Fort Worth, Texas, said net income was flat at $7.3 million in its second quarter ended Aug. 26.The specialty retailer said in July that it expected the results to be flat because of discounting in some lines, particularly cotton apparel. 
Chrysler was the loser among the Big Three with auto sales down 18.5% to 24,419.A bright spot for the No. 3 auto maker was its truck sales -- including the top-selling minivan and the Jeep line, which rose 4.1% to 30,377. 
Ford Motor Co. is betting that the tradition-minded buyers of its heftiest car will accept the "aero" styling that now characterizes most of the company's model line. 
Ford is building a stamping plant at Wayne and adding a second shift of workers at Hermosillo.The Mexican plant currently builds only the Tracer and will continue to build the Mercury subcompact after it gets the Escort line. 
WHO'S BAD?L.A. Gear Inc. said it has signed singer Michael Jackson to design and market world-wide a line of Michael Jackson fashion sneakers. 
But a new computer design scrambled that strategy, and Digital has fumbled for months in trying to project a coherent new theme, even as it brought out a blizzard of new products.In just a year, the company rebuilt its entire VAX minicomputer line. 
But the mess in sales isn't the only problem that slowed revenue growth into single digits in the latest quarter.In a costly gamble, Digital decided last year to cancel a major computer design, leaving big customers without a replacement at the high end of its line. 
Like many competitors, Digital was caught off guard by the clamor for standard software.Although its VAX line has been enormously popular, fueling Digital's explosive growth since 1985, more and more customers don't want to get hooked on computers based on proprietary software. 
And most standard software isn't yet suited for hard-core commercial computing, such as on-line transaction processing.Typical transaction-processing tasks, in which hundreds of terminals interact with a database, include airline reservations, on-line retail-sales tracking and bank teller networks, and such operations are a prime target for the VAX line, especially the 9000. 
Its new line, priced substantially below the VAX, runs on Unix operating software with chips from MIPS Computer Systems Inc.At first, Digital couldn't come up with a clear marketing theme for the two lines. 
IBM's competitors are expected to benefit from a delay of even a few months."Digital is going to have more than 200 software packages running on its workstations by the time IBM is shipping," said Marc G. Schulman, an analyst with UBS Securities Inc. Abundant software packages are critical to the success of a computer line. 
The focus of most of the attention today is in the market for machines based on the Unix software operating system.Mr. Schulman called Digital's DECstation line "the absolute leader in price performance" in that market. 
Ford declined to specify how much it will spend in the five years.But Kenneth F. Smith, Ford's heavy-truck operations manager, said the company will "have modernized or replaced every product in the Ford heavy-truck line." 
But Kenneth F. Smith, Ford's heavy-truck operations manager, said the company will "have modernized or replaced every product in the Ford heavy-truck line."Ford said it will move some production of its Cargo line of medium and heavy-duty trucks from Brazil to Ford's Kentucky Truck plant in Louisville, Ky. 
A Ford spokesman said it isn't clear whether the addition of the Cargo truck will require an expansion of the Kentucky Truck plant.Ford officials said production of the Cargo line is expected to begin in the fourth quarter of 1990. 
"Now it's Ford's turn to step forward with new products to keep pace."Ford's Mr. Smith said the company is working on a new gas engine with electronic port fuel injection, an expanded line of diesel engines with electronic controls, and new Class 8 heavy-duty truck tractors, among other projects. 
The cell-biology products are solutions used to grow cells.Hana has said that it was selling the lines because further development of them would have pulled the company away from its strategic focus -- cell-transplant research and development programs. 
As part of its direct sales restructuring, On-Line will halt direct sales of its Case-Pac product, which represents about 1% to 2% of sales.The company said it also refocused its Ramis information-products line to include a joint direct marketing/telemarketing effort.The Ramis line represents about 15% of total sales. 
In an interview, David F. Parkinson, chief financial officer, said Phoenix will book a restructuring charge for the current quarter.He said the company has tightened its revenue-recognition policies and will drop its effort to provide basic software to manufacturers of computers that are based on the Sparc microprocessor line from Sun Microsystems Inc. 
---Nissan Motor is cutting prices on a key compact car line in a bid to boost its U.S. market share at the expense of the Big Three and other rivals. 
Steyr will hold 20% in the new subsidiary, while MAN will have management control.The announcement of the transaction came after DAF N.V., an Anglo/Dutch auto maker, said it dropped its offer to take over Steyr's truck lines after MAN made a higher counteroffer. 
Wang Laboratories Inc. unveiled a new midrange minicomputer line, the VS 8000 series, to replace its VS 7000 line. 
The recalled drugs include several forms of darvon, methadone, two anti-infectives and an anti-inflammatory agent.Lilly's spokesman said the drugs were mostly "older line products" sold either under the Lilly or Dista labels. 
In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Lilly's shares fell 75 cents to close at $59.625.The investigation by the Food and Drug Administration did not include Lilly's largest drug lines such as its oral antibiotic, Ceclor, or Prozac, its anti-depressant drug. 
"It's what everyone is trying to do."The chip also gives the Santa Clara, Calif., company a broader line of high-end chips. 
The dairy operations, based in Johnson City, Tenn., produce milk, ice cream and cottage cheese in the Carolinas, Florida, Georgia, Tennessee, Virginia and parts of West Virginia.The company isn't discontinuing any dairy lines, Mr. Melsheimer said. 
The proposed dividend may help save Kohlberg Kravis from possible investor criticism that it overpaid for Beatrice.Two years ago, some Beatrice insiders boasted that by selling off the company's assets, including its lines of Wesson cooking oils and Hunt tomato products, investors would earn a pre-tax profit that could exceed $3 billion. 
Its sales are strongest in Scandinavian countries and France, although it has sales offices throughout Europe.The Micronic line primarily is used for gathering data in the field. 
The price of the cheapest 1990 Stanza model will be $11,450, or $749 less than that of its less powerful predecessor.Nissan's decision is the latest in a series of moves by foreign auto makers to cut prices on important car lines at a time when the Big Three U.S. auto makers are aggressively raising base prices on most of their 1990 models. 
Vitro's technological bent is a legacy of Adrian Sada Sr., an eminently practical engineer who remains the group's chairman.Once, at a product presentation for Vitro's refrigerator line, visitors were taken aback when the chairman rolled up his sleeves, opened a toolbox and repaired a faulty unit. 
One of the new models uses International Business Machines Corp.'s Micro Channel data bus design, marking NCR's first use of the technology.Separately, NCR unveiled a new member of its Tower 32 computer line, built around Motorola Inc.'s 68030 microprocessor. 
The partnership, controlled by money manager Martin Zweig and former Drexel marketing director Eugene Glaser, will rename the funds Zweig Series Trust, Zweig Cash Fund and Zweig Tax-Free Fund.The sale of its fund lines stemmed from Drexel's decision earlier this year to shed its brokerage-office operations. 
Honda is expected to unveil a redesigned Accord later this month, and dealers say they expect the car to be larger and more expensive than the current compact model.The Civic and CRX lines -- including some of Honda's cheapest cars -- account for about 30% of the company's total U.S. car sales. 
The price of Honda's least expensive model, the Civic DX hatchback with a four-speed manual transmission, will rise 3.9% to $6,635 from $6,385, the spokesman said.The most expensive holdover model in the Civic line, the four-wheel drive wagon with automatic transmission, will have a base price of $13,140, up 2.6% from $12,810 in 1989. 
Using text-searching software, the product will allow analysts and M&A specialists at banks, brokerages, and companies to quickly find and analyze potential deals by comparing them with past deals.The product is the sixth in Lotus's line of One Source CD-based information services. 
Duncan Hines's "flavor was never as good as it should've been," says Gordon Tucker, a former P&G brand manager who helped develop the cookies.While he asserts that P&G was hurt by competitors copying the technology, he adds that P&G simply got beat because Nabisco "moved very fast" and introduced a full line of cookies. 
"The bottom line here is that the fragrance business just doesn't fit with Avon's door-to-door selling business," said Andrew Shore, an analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. "Assuming the fragrance business is worth what Avon paid for it, the company is better off using the money to reduce debt.Mr. Shore, as well as several other analysts, speculated that Avon decided to investigate the possible sale of its fragrance lines following a private meeting Mr. Preston had late last month with Minneapolis investor Irwin Jacobs. 
Nissan Motor Co. and Toyota Motor Corp. are introducing luxury models in the U.S. this fall for $35,000 to $40,000 each.The prices for Nissan's Infiniti and Toyota's Lexus give the Japanese makers an edge over most European luxury cars, but still generally exceed the prices of Ford's Lincoln line and General Motors's Cadillac division. 
Nissan Motor Corp., in a bid to boost market share at the expense of Detroit's Big Three auto makers and other rivals in a sluggish sales environment, said it is cutting prices on an important compact car line. 
In what it describes as a major introduction, Nestle S.A.'s Stouffer Foods Corp. is rolling out a new line of low-cholesterol, low-fat, and low-sodium entrees called Right Course. 
Stouffer said Right Course's packages will tell consumers the exact amount of cholesterol, fat and sodium in a given entree and also provide the American Heart Association's recommendations for total average daily intake.Earlier this year, ConAgra Inc. introduced a similar line called Healthy Choice. 
But instead of melting the cookies over an open fire, they go into a microwave oven.Most of the other products are simply line extensions of existing best-sellers that don't represent much of an innovative gamble. 
 NEW ACCOUNT: National Football League Properties, New York, named Grey Advertising, New York, agency of record for its NFL merchandise line called Team NFL. Billings weren't disclosed. 
Commodore International Ltd.'s U.S. unit said it signed an agreement for Connecting Point of America Inc., a large chain, to carry its personal computers.Harry Copperman, president of the unit, said in an interview that the agreement is aimed primarily at West Chester, Pa.-based Commodore's Amiga line. 
You have to build an awfully big company to get a reasonable return."Such investments are risked more easily by large companies, such as International Business Machines Corp. and Apple, that can subsidize research and development out of profits from older lines. 
Other factors also aid existing companies.Although the computer market is much larger than it was 10 years ago, most customers now have settled on computer lines to use in obvious applications. 
The U.S. sales arm of Japan's Mazda Motor Corp. has set up a task force to study the feasibility of establishing a second dealer network in the U.S.Mazda currently sells a line of imported and U.S.-made cars and trucks through 844 dealers nationwide. 
---IBM plans to announce today some models of its AS/400 minicomputer line and a new release of its operating-system software, sources said. 
Cincinnati Milacron Inc. said it completed the purchase of Hayssen Manufacturing Co.'s line of extrusion blow-molding machines and will take over the business of manufacturing, selling and servicing this equipment. 
International Business Machines Corp. introduced two models of its AS/400 minicomputer line and a new release of the operating-system software. 
He makes an authoritative spokesman.A member of one of the handful of distinguished families that dominate the art, he belongs to the Kabuki acting line of Omodaka, which has flourished for six generations. 
International Business Machines Corp. will announce today some models of its AS/400 minicomputer line and a new release of its operating-system software, industry executives said. 
In Armonk, N.Y., an IBM spokesman said the company has scheduled a press briefing for today related to its midrange product lines but declined to elaborate.The industry executives said IBM will announce models in the middle of the AS/400 line to get customers to upgrade from the IBM System 36, the less powerful of the two lines that IBM combined into the AS/400. 
Mr. Cohen said that because of the weakness he has cut his forecast of AS/400 shipments this year to between 55,000 and 60,000 machines, down from his projections late last year of 70,000 to 75,000.He added, though, that he doesn't think that poses a problem for IBM this year, because it is exceeding its expectations at the high end of the AS/400 line.Users of IBM's System 38 -- the more powerful line that was merged into the AS/400 -- have bought lots of the high-end machines because many were desperate for more computing capacity and moving their software was easy. 
The Electrolux appliances, imported from Europe and the U.S., will begin appearing at Sharp outlets in October."It will be a fairly complete line of our most upscale products," Mr. Johansson explained. 
Previously, Ford hadn't offered cash rebates on these F-series trucks.Last year, the F-series trucks were the best-selling line of vehicles in the U.S. 
He said he also hopes to develop an area the company has just begun, home furnishings such as wallpaper.Sources say Balmain had sales last year of about 100 million French francs ($15 million) in its clothing lines, and, unlike many fashion concerns, high fashion is one of its biggest revenue earners, after license income. 
The stock has risen steadily from the $6.50 price at which it was initially offered last Thursday.New Image designs, assembles and markets a line of computer imaging systems and software. 
---Sharp agreed to market in its stores in Japan a line of appliances made by Sweden's Electrolux. 
The suit seeks to invalidate patents held by Autry Industries Inc. for transparent windows in the soles of sneakers.Canton, Mass.-based Reebok said the suit was filed in response to claims by Autry that certain Reebok products, including its new Visible ERS line of athletic footwear, infringe on patents held by Autry. 
Reebok also said it wanted to reassure its dealers that it will stand by the Visible products.Nike Inc., Beaverton, Ore., also offers a line of see-through shoes, called Nike Visible Air. 
The Weston unit, which employs about 200 workers at a plant near Newark, N.J., has annual sales of about $12 million.Ametek, a manufacturer of industrial products, said Weston makes a line of display gauges that complements the instrument line Ametek already supplies to the same aircraft builders. 
GM said the decision to delay adding a second production shift at Janesville "reflects a recent downturn in the total medium-duty truck business."The Janesville plant is building a new line of GM medium-duty trucks, to be sold as the GMC TopKick and the Chevrolet Kodiak. 
After the end of the year, all of GM's conventional medium-duty trucks will be built at the Janesville facility, the company said.GM said production of its old line of conventional medium-duty trucks at the Pontiac Central facility in Pontiac, Mich., will be cut to one shift from two, beginning Sept. 16. 
The two companies also left unanswered the question of which computer design will prevail -- always a touchy issue among proud engineers.Mr. Poduska told the analysts that the two lines will be fully compatible by early 1991. 
Industry heavyweights that previously ran upscale hotels and inns are moving into the budget sector, says Joseph Doyle, a lodging industry analyst at Smith Barney Harris Upham & Co.For example, Holiday Corp. launched its Hampton Inns line of budget motels in 1984, and Marriott Corp. started up the Fairfield Inns line in 1987. 
For example, Stafford Blaine Designs Ltd. of Minneapolis offers $14 white cotton shirts with renderings of Renoir's painting "Two Sisters on a Terrace" or Gaugin's "Tahitian Landscape."At the Philadelphia convention, hourlong fashion shows ran twice daily to help retailers appreciate the latest lines of imprintable clothing and graphic designs. 
While temporary plant closings have become common during this year of sluggish car sales, this shutdown is the first for the Lorain, Ohio, plant in several years.It's also the latest setback for the car line that started off 1989 winning Motor Trend magazine's "Car of the Year" award. 
Then in February, Ford resorted to diverting more than 10,000 of the cars to an amusement park lot near the Lorain factory until engineers could find the cause of and eliminate a mysterious rattle in some of the cars.To boost sales of the two models, Ford was forced on Aug. 1 to offer heavy $1,500 rebates on all but the supercharged versions of the Thunderbird and Cougar lines. 
In 1988, 45% of Transamerica's gross premium income came from its specialty insurance lines, with 20% from personal and 35% from commercial insurance business.Mr. Isom expects that specialty lines will provide as much as 55% of premium income in future years, with smaller shares from the other two areas.In 1983, none of the company's premium income came from specialty lines. 
Toyota said total vehicle production for the year was 4,006,796 units, representing a 3.9% increase over the year before.Full model changes in the Mark II, Chaser, Cresta and Hilux models were cited for the increase in units sold, as were new model additions for Toyota's Supra, Vista, Camry, Corolla, Sprinter, Town Ace and other existing lines. 
Deere & Co. reported a 21% rise in earnings for its fiscal third quarter despite an operating loss in its lawn and grounds-care line. 
Deere stock fell 87.5 cents, to close at $60.125 in heavy trading on the New York Stock Exchange.Karen Ubelhart, an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., said Wall Street had been expecting higher per-share earnings of around $1.40, and termed the loss in the lawn and grounds-care line a surprise. 
Retail demand for industrial equipment remains modestly higher than in 1988, Deere said, but called its overall sales mix "less favorable compared with last year."Deere introduced a new line of farm equipment last fall and increased prices from 3% to 5%, but Provident Bank analyst James Peirce said that while pricing is "much improved, it is still not where the industry would like to be." 
Mazda's aggressive pricing strategy runs counter to some other import brands that are minimizing their price rises to remain competitive in the U.S. market.Nissan Motor Co. already restructured its entry-level Sentra car line by eliminating some models and making standard equipment optional on other 1990 versions. 
"They're also going to be searching for the intangibles inherent in a premium quality brand."Mazda officials said they are studying the feasibility of adding a luxury car sales division in the U.S. similar to Toyota's Lexus and Nissan's Infiniti car lines. 
Average shares increased about 13%, to 19.3 million.Dell attributed the earnings decline in part to price reductions on computers using the Intel Corp. 80286 microprocessor, a line that is reaching maturity. 
"We continue to look for ways to improve our products by updating them, offering a more-modern look and introducing new products" said Mr. Kyle.For example, the company has begun promoting a new line of cakes and pies in flavors that change monthly.In addition, he said a line of honey-graham cookies called Tasty Bears, aimed at children aged six to 12, has been well received since its debut in May. 
"We prefer to invest in software companies with $2 million to $5 million in revenue instead of starting them from scratch," says Andrew Rachleff, a partner in Merrill, Pickard, Anderson & Eyre.The Palo Alto, Calif., venture firm recently led a $4 million financing to buy software lines for a newly formed company. 
Anacomp Inc. said its Xidex unit will manufacture a line of floppy-disk products for Hewlett-Packard Co. 
Just five months after its introduction, General Motors Corp. is raising the price of its 1990 Chevrolet Lumina sedan, the first of a new line of four-door sedans GM is counting on to boost its sagging car-market share. 
Some answers are surprisingly simple.With market-research assistance arranged by NETAAC, a paper company introduced a line of snazzy paper sold with instructions to write a resume. 
For a printing-equipment maker, NETAAC came up with a two-pronged solution.It is helping the company to simplify its products to reduce production and servicing costs, and to come up with a low-priced line to export to industrializing countries, Mr. McLaughlin says. 
Automatic Data Processing Inc. said fourth-quarter earnings rose 9% and predicted a more than 10% increase in per-share earnings for the new fiscal year.The computer-services company attributed the earnings growth to strength in its employer-services and dealer-services businesses, and said it expects both those lines to have double-digit growth in the year ending June 30. 
He was generally optimistic, despite acknowledging that the first half was "highly disappointing."He said the rollout of the 2200 line of mainframes -- whose delay caused some of the recent problems -- "went, if anything, better than we expected." 
After 18 months of adding new regional markets, the company has nearly completed the introduction of its Top-Shelf microwavable entrees, designed to remain fresh on grocery-store shelves without freezing.Its newer Chicken by George line is just getting under way. 
Mr. Marotta and Ms. Zain also have cloned the amyloid protein gene and have transplanted it into cells grown in a test tube.This line of cells is now producing excessive quantities of beta-amyloid protein, also known as A4 peptide. 
"The market is still very short of stock," one dealer said."Although private clients are sticking to the sidelines, most institutions are still on the lookout for a good, reasonably priced line of stock." 
Mr. McDonald maintains that Prime's $500-million-a-year computer service business generates enough cash to pay the interest.He said Prime's fast-growing computerized design business may get more R&D funding, and that the proprietary Series 50 minicomputer line will be able to cut costs. 
While imitation may be the sincerest form of flattery, Anthony Maglica would appreciate fewer kudos.Mr. Maglica, president and owner of Mag Instrument Inc., designed a line of high-priced, high-quality flashlights, known as the Mag-Lite and Mini Maglite. 
Part of Geo's problem has been that its product offerings are as muddled as a hockey team in the middle of a flying line change.All Chevy dealers selling the line had the Metro minicar, but they didn't begin receiving the restyled Geo Prizm, previously the Chevrolet Nova, until earlier this year. 
However, Par disclosed in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that the FDA's inspection of the company, including Quad, continues.In its filing, Par said sales and gross margins of Quad's injectable line "may also be adversely affected, although to a lesser extent." 
Many customers seem to have been won over, and IBM unveiled some products last week that consultants said should confirm that view.Some of the products were enhancements for IBM's so-called private branch exchanges that make the telephone switches mesh better with the Siemens line. 
Lockheed has outpaced the Standard & Poor's aerospace index in the past decade, and appears certain to survive the defense industry's shake-out.It does face some short-term negatives, such as this year's winding down of the C-5B transport and P3 anti-submarine aircraft programs; completion of the F-117A Stealth fighter line in 1990; and a high level of deferred income taxes. 
Despite previous flops within this niche, Campbell Soup Co., Kraft General Foods and Nestle Enterprises Inc. all are test-marketing prepackaged, refrigerated fresh foods that need only be toted home and heated or lightly cooked.And Nestle S.A.'s Carnation Co. already sells a limited line of chilled fare nationwide and says it may expand. 
Last year, the company said it hoped to introduce American shoppers to its chilled fare through Kings Supermarkets Inc., a small chain of upscale New Jersey grocers that it had just acquired.Except to say that a coming launch of new food lines would be "significant," a spokeswoman last week wouldn't elaborate on the company's plans. 
Such a complex system is difficult to match in the U.S., where distribution chains are long.Indeed, James H. Moran, public-relations director for Campbell, cites distribution problems as one reason why the company withdrew its Fresh Chef line of refrigerated sauces, soups and salads two years ago. 
Now, Campbell is trying again.In Philadelphia, it is test-marketing Fresh Kitchen, a new line of refrigerated sauces, entrees and desserts. 
Culinova fresh entrees, launched in 1986 by Philip Morris Cos.'s General Foods Corp., hit similar distribution problems.Last December, shortly after Philip Morris bought Kraft Inc., the struggling line was scrapped. 
Last December, shortly after Philip Morris bought Kraft Inc., the struggling line was scrapped.But Kraft General Foods, the offspring of Philip Morris's acquisition, is pressing ahead with the Chillery line of entrees, salads, pasta and desserts originally developed by Kraft. 
Nestle, the Swiss giant, has jumped into the U.S. chilled-food market on two fronts.Its Nestle Enterprises subsidiary, based in Solon, Ohio, is test-marketing a line of upscale entrees and salads called FreshNes. 
Food-industry experts say that those types of products are less temperature-sensitive than fancy entrees.Carnation is looking at broadening its refrigerated-food line, says Richard Curd, a company spokesman, although he too declines to elaborate. 
It's a sport that's now occupying a large part of his life.Until recently a St. Louis-based editor at a successful outdoor magazine, Mr. Kruger moved to the Ozarks to focus on flyfishing for bass -- to write about it, to guide float-trips and to develop a line of lures. 
But they are also trying to soft-pedal the price increases -- by scattering them all over the window sticker, ending discounts on options and putting last year's middle-of-the-lineup name on this year's base model.Consider the strategy General Motors Corp. is using on the soon-to-be-introduced 1990 version of its high-volume Chevrolet Corsica line. 
That averages to about $750 a vehicle, Chrysler officials say.While GM's price increases may not look as steep as its two domestic rivals, that's largely because Ford and Chrysler are making air bags standard equipment on more of their car lines. 
Ford is raising the price of its Bronco II sport utility vehicle $607, or 4.3%, to $14,718, even though sales of the vehicle have fallen about 13% this year and the latest model is due to be replaced next spring by an all-new product.Chrysler, meanwhile, is looking to earn more on its LeBaron line of coupes by loading more equipment -- including a new V-6 engine -- into a "premium" version of the car. 
Oldsmobile's Silhouette, which is virtually identical to the Pontiac, will start at $17,195.By comparison, much of Chrysler's minivan line is less expensive. 
Prime Computer Inc., Natick, Mass., unveiled two computers in its new EXL 1200 line based on multiprocessor computers made by Sequent Computer Systems Inc., Beaverton, Ore. 
The Commerce Department announced last month that it was lifting export curbs on a wide class of desktop computers.But the order carrying out that decision adds not only laptops but other, more powerful versions of International Business Machines Corp.'s PS/2 line than the original announcement covered. 
Nissan Motor Co. is consolidating its Sentra budget car line for 1990 by eliminating some models and making higher-priced versions of others available only as special option packages. 
"The growth is less rapid than expected," an Intel spokeswoman said.Also contributing to the outlook, she said, were start-up costs associated with a line of computers that Intel plans to start shipping in the current quarter and costs of preparing for mass shipments of the company's new 80486 chip in the fourth quarter. 
As part of the restructuring, Interlake also said it intends to focus on its core businesses, including powder metals, aerospace components, and storage and handling products.It plans to divest itself of unrelated lines, but it didn't specify what they are. 
Royce Laboratories, likewise isn't profitable.The company says, however, that it is awaiting approval from the FDA to manufacture and sell 12 generic prescription drugs and it intends to expand its line of over-the-counter drug products to increase revenue. 
Donnkenny Inc. was betting lightning would strike again when it put the name of Diane Von Furstenberg, the jet-set socialite who had a hot designer label in the 1970s, on a line of dresses earlier this year. 
The lawsuit says the name Ivana is widely associated with Mrs. Trump's business dealings, and that Pavion Ltd.'s Ivana lipstick is "an attempt to capitalize on {Mrs.} Trump's celebrity status."The lawsuit, which seeks damages of at least $10 million, also says that Mrs. Trump is using the name for her own line of perfume. 
A decade after its Betamax home-video format lost out to rival VHS, Sony Corp. of America, a unit of the Japanese consumer-electronics giant, is trying to force its way back into the video limelight with its 8mm format, launched four years ago.Sony hopes to popularize "Video 8" through the concept of "personal video" -- video wherever you go -- as exemplified by its Video Walkman line: tiny battery-operated color mini-TVs with built-in videocassette recorders. 
Mr. Tarlow declined to comment, but a Revlon spokesman indicated that the agencies were dropped "for classic client-agency reasons."The only agencies to survive yesterday's cut are Ketchum Advertising, New York, which is working on a major product introduction for a new line of hair-care products; and Peter Rogers Associates, which handles the advertising for Scaasi, a perfume. 
Young & Rubicam continues as agency of record for network and print media buying.Hill Holliday handled advertising for Revlon's Charlie and Trouble fragrances, Clean & Clear hair care line and Nutrasome hair care treatment. 
Analysts say this isn't impossible, given their own projections that Black & Decker earnings could soar to $5 to $6 a share over the same period.Black & Decker's purchase of General Electric's small appliance line in 1985 "was more risky than Emhart," Mr. Archibald declares. 
Hartmarx agreed June 27 to sell Country Miss, based in Easton, Pa., to LB for about $62 million, the filing says.Country Miss, which makes and retails moderately priced sportswear, is on the block because it doesn't fit into Hartmarx's focus on upscale, higher-quality clothing lines. 
The company was devastated in the early 1980s, when virtually all of its businesses were rocked by a deep recession.Once an industrial scavenger that grew through acquisitions and turnarounds of mature, out-of-favor manufacturers, it began shedding virtually all its lines and taking huge write-offs in recent years. 
Taco Bell of Irvine, Calif., another major new client of Foote Cone San Francisco, had previously been at Omnicom Group's Tracy-Locke agency in Los Angeles.A strong creative reputation certainly helps Foote Cone and other West Coast agencies like Hal Riney, whose national accounts include General Motors' new Saturn line. 
The highest-priced car, the 911 Carrera 4 Cabriolet convertible, will remain at $77,800.The added features include driver-side and passenger-side air bags on all of the company's car lines; not all 1989 models had air bags. 
"I think the government wants to use market forces, rather than regulations, to make the companies achieve economies of scale," says Mr. Pinon.Government free-traders hope that producers will cease production of some lines that could more effectively be imported, and turn out more of the models they make best. 
Reebok International Ltd. said it reached an agreement in principle to buy the Boston Whaler unit of CML Group Inc. for about $42 million, signaling a significant broadening of Reebok's product base.Reebok has made several acquisitions in recent years to expand its athletic footwear and sportswear lines. 
Nonetheless, Hewlett-Packard is a huge company with much greater resources than Sun and MIPS.It dominates the RISC market with its line of high-end workstations, and is the leading maker of all kinds of workstations with its recent acquisition of Apollo Computer. 
In the past, RISC/UNIX machines have been very expensive, and limited mostly to scientific and engineering applications.But Sun Microsystems has led a movement to offer less expensive workstations that are beginning to compete with IBM's PS/2 line and with Apple Computer's Macintosh. 
HISPANIC TRACKING: Telemundo Group and Univision Holdings, as expected, signed a contract with A.C. Nielsen for the development of a national Hispanic TV rating service using people meters.NEW ACCOUNTS: Crystal Brands Jewelry Group, New York, awarded its Monet, Trifari and Marvella lines to Margeotes Fertitta & Weiss, New York. 
Capital spending will total about $34 million in the current fiscal year as the company continues to upgrade plants.In fiscal 1989, capital outlays totaled $51 million, with $11 million going to sharply expand production of oat bran at its Cedar Rapids, Iowa, plant, and another sizable amount to launch a line of microwave chili and other entrees in single-serving packs. 
Ametek Inc. said it completed the acquisition of General Electric Co.'s instrument-products unit in exchange for $110 million and the transfer of an Ametek plastics plant to GE.Ametek, a Paoli, Pa., industrial manufacturer, said the acquisition would strongly complement its lines of jet-aircraft instruments. 
That rate was 98%, compared with 39% last year, the company said.The rail-intermodal line, which consists of piggyback trailers, domestic containers and chassis, represents about 60% of the company's business. 
But the sales increase came off relatively weak 1988 results and indicate a generally lackluster retailing environment likely to continue for the rest of 1989, analysts said.In general, department and specialty stores fared better, because of some shift away from bigger ticket purchases such as automobiles to apparel lines. 
At Dallas-based J.C. Penney Co., which has increased its dependence on fashion merchandise, same-store sales rose 9.7% against a 2.5% decrease a year ago.William R. Howell, chairman, said the strongest gains resulted from children's merchandise, but noted that all apparel lines had substantial increases. 
At Minneapolis-based Dayton Hudson Corp., same-store sales rose 6.9% for July and 5.9% for the 26 weeks."The month's sales growth was led by soft lines," said Kenneth A. Macke, chairman and chief executive officer. 
But with the luxury market soft and consumer confidence about making car purchases waning, that may not be enough to establish a strong presence.The line also faces the challenge of forging an identity -- one distinct not only from Lexus's rivals but also from Toyota itself. 
And by borrowing exterior and dashboard-styling cues from Mercedes-Benz, say some experts, Lexus risks getting a "copycat" label instead of a distinct identity.Also, while Lexus's prices compare favorably with those of European cars, they don't look particularly attractive alongside the prices of Ford's Lincoln line and General Motors Corp.'s Cadillac division. 
But IBM posted an earnings gain of 39%; the rise was just 8% after adjusting the year-earlier results for a restructuring charge and a gain on a sale.IBM had its first significant revenue gain in the U.S. in years, and got a strong performance from its AS/400 minicomputer line -- which wasn't yet introduced a year earlier. 
In his letter, Mr. Jacobs said that, like Amway, he would sell Avon's Giorgio Beverly Hills Inc. and Parfumes Stern Inc. units, as well as other operations that Avon may be treating as discontinued.In recent months the New York-based company has been disposing of ancillary businesses to concentrate on its lines of household goods and cosmetics, which are distributed primarily through a direct-sales force. 
So, a number of vintners, large and small, are showing signs of battle fatigue.No. 2-ranked Heublein Inc., a unit of Grand Metropolitan PLC, is registering steep declines in its Almaden and Inglenook lines. 
The sudden recognition worked magic (though it came as something of a shock to the natives, "Who do these New Yorkers think they are, coming out here and beating us at our own game?"), and the very first vintage sold out quickly.There wasn't much of it, however, and the vineyard needed cash flow, so Bruno came up with the idea of a line of inexpensive wines, Proprietor's Reserve Red and White, that were first offered at $2.99 a bottle. 
Sales leaped to 1.5 million cases by 1987, with Proprietor's Reserve Chardonnay leading the pack.In fact, the success of the Proprietor's Reserve line adversely affected sales of Glen Ellen's estate wines, barrel-aged Chardonnay, Sauvignon Blanc, and Cabernet Sauvignon that were sold mostly to restaurants. 
Meanwhile, Glen Ellen Proprietor's Reserve sales continue to soar.The line has now expanded to include a Select Dry White, Sauvignon Blanc, Merlot and White Zinfandel. 
Fetzer's success is largely due to the enormous popularity of its moderately priced varietals, Sundial Chardonnay and Valley Oaks Fume Blanc, which sell for about $7.50 and $6 respectively.Fetzer makes a full line of varietal wines, all excellent value, especially the Barrel Select Zinfandel and Reserve Pinot Noir. 
Data General Corp. introduced a line of personal computers and workstations compatible with International Business Machines Corp.'s PC-AT computers. 
The new models range from a compact desktop machine to a powerful network server and are priced from $2,995 to $8,495.Data General also introduced software that lets PC users communicate with its larger minicomputer line. 
Among other things, the companies had been slow in integrating the marketing of both Firestone and Bridgestone brand tires.For instance, Bridgestone tires only recently were added to Firestone's line at Firestone's chain of MasterCare automotive repair stores. 
BMW's sales dropped 15.6%, while Volkswagen AG's sales fell 11.7%.However, Volkswagen's Audi line boosted sales 61.5% in July to 2,653 vehicles. 
The rebound came in the wake of the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration's announcement in mid-July that it had found no mechanical defect in Audi 5000 models that could have caused the cars to suddenly accelerate out of control.Publicity about sudden acceleration in that now-discontinued model line had stained Audi's image and helped to depress sales for nearly three years. 
So the Japan of the 21st century may be expected to assume the role of a mature creditor country, importing more than it is exporting, and earning more from its foreign asset holdings than it is investing abroad to add to them.Finally, the deep-seated mercantilist orientation of the Japanese economy will probably be buffeted by two strong forces in the international trade arena: formal and informal protectionism in the U.S. and European markets as well as the displacement of Japanese consumer durable products by competing lines from South Korea, Taiwan, Singapore and Hong Kong. 
However, Makita failed to convince the judge that its so-called trade dress is distinctive enough.The ITC's call echoed its 1987 decision upholding an administrative law judge's ruling to dismiss Samsonite Corp.'s complaint that four Taiwanese manufacturers illegally copied one of the Colorado firm's popular luggage lines. 
It is limited only by the creativity of the people who'll relaunch it."Mr. Carosi insists Hasbro has made some advances in the area of line extensions. 
After a swig, Mr. Carosi says, the doll burps.And then there's the Designer Cabbage Patch line that features dolls dressed in trendy fashions. 
He adds, however, that Video Air is starting to try tying in advertisers with movies.For "Rain Man," whose video release will include a national ad for Buick, Video Air is "trying to get local Buick dealers to do a tag at the end of the ad, saying, 'come see our line of Buicks at your local dealer,'" Mr. Mathis says. 
But Wertheim's Mr. Gelles is doubtful."Generally, line extensions just prolong the agony by increasing the reliance on those products, which don't grow as fast as their precursors," he says. 
Notably, before the FDA's procedures were revised by the Waxman-Hatch Act of 1984, the agency made the generic makers go through a battery of additional chemical and other tests to prove their drugs' effectiveness and safety, not just bioequivalence.But Congress wanted to create more price competition in many pharmaceutical lines, and therefore expedited the FDA's treatment of generic drug applications. 
The company has invested more than $4 million in HDTV production gear, says Barry Rebo, president.With 40 employees and about $3.5 million in annual revenue, Rebo produces HDTV programming and is developing a line of specialty equipment for HDTV production. 
Some firms, like Horchow Mail Order Inc. in Dallas and Sharper Image Co. in San Francisco, offer only limited guarantees on merchandise -- a bold departure from a tradition among catalog companies of luring customers away from retailers with lifetime warranties.Some firms, like Spiegel Inc. of Oak Brook, Ill., and Sears, Roebuck & Co., Chicago, discontinued lines with higher return rates. 
Viag's expansion also has focused on aluminum operations, in its Vereinigte Aluminium Werke AG. Viag has increased smelting capacity through the purchase of a 20% stake in a Canadian smelter that is being built.The company also is effectively adding a line, refractory products and industrial ceramics, by boosting its stake in Didier-Werke AG to 49% from 27%. 
Octel Communications Corp., Milpitas, Calif., said fiscal fourth-quarter earnings rose 57%, and announced plans to sell 1.5 million common shares.Octel, citing "good results selling our voice-processing line to large corporate customers," said profit for the quarter, ended June 30, was $3.3 million, or 21 cents a share, compared with $2.1 million, or 15 cents a share, a year earlier. 
"People will turn to the next question: What kind of real momentum will be created by the combination of these businesses?" asks David MacCallum, a New York pharmaceutical analyst for San Francisco brokers Hambrecht & Quist Inc."I don't think there's anything those two organizations will do that will create significant momentum for the top (sales) line." 
Mr. Gumucio said Cray is encountering discount pricing by IBM, particularly in bidding for university contracts.Convex is being aggressive in battling for departmental-sized machines, at the low end of Cray's line. 
But now, its white-collar ranks have ballooned to 31,000.Much of this was the by-product of Chrysler's 1987 acquisition of American Motors Corp. and its hot-selling Jeep line. 
Just yesterday, Chrysler doubled the rebates on those Omni and Horizon subcompacts to $1,500 -- a whopping 23% discount.Such discounting put more pressure on its minivans and Jeeps to generate profit, but those lines are about to be bombarded by new competitors. 
Three years ago, that all changed.Doraville was selected to build a new line of midsized coupes, code-named "GM-10" and costing $5 billion to develop. 
The firm's problems really began in the mid-1980s, when it decided against seeking a share of the new generation of fighters envisioned by the Navy in order to concentrate its technical and financial resources on an overriding goal: winning the multibillion-dollar contract to build a replacement for the bulbous-nosed A-6 Intruder, the Navy's only long-range, all-weather bomber.But the company isn't among the firms picked for that contract, leaving it without a new line of warplanes when production of its battle-tested but aging models is phased out. 
GM is merely suffering -- and hunting for a cure.It is adding four-door sedans to the GM-10 line.It is converting two auto plants to truck production, closing a car plant in Framingham, Mass., this summer, and planning to squeeze production of one of its large-car lines into two assembly plants instead of three. 
But it must also serve existing buyers of its older computers, which provide the bulk of sales."The decline of Data General's existing proprietary products continue to overshadow the transition to the new Unix-based line," said Barry F. Willman, an analyst with Sanford C. Bernstein & Co. 
Boeing Co.'s second-quarter net income jumped 20% on stronger revenue, but the world's leading aircraft maker stressed that it continues "to face significant challenges and risks" in both its commercial and military lines. 
"You still have to convince homeowners that this (Dymetrol) performs better than springs," Mr. Bost says.Industry experts also say that Sears, which of late has been stressing its "everyday low prices," may be hindered in its ability to sell its line, which it has positioned as more fashionable and more expensive than the typical furniture it sells. 
"Sears has the clout and the credibility when it comes to furniture," says Jerry Epperson, a securities analyst at Wheat First Securities.Sears and Du Pont introduced the Lasting Images furniture line at the American Craft Museum here in a model living room similar to the ones that will be set up this fall in 450 of Sears' larger stores. 
